
Thanks.

Tomorrow ?

PLEASE STOP REPLYING TO ALL USERS

i sold 1,000/d of apr/oct @ 3.02 for GD-Y-Gas Daily book. please put in that book. Thanks.

Two things:

1). The below trade did not go into the GD-Y-Gas Daily book, please move it into the corect book.

2). I bot a Nov16-30 TZ6 gas daily swap from Vladi Pimenov @ 3.75 for 10,000/d. did this go into my position, and what book did it go into ?

Thanks

AZ

I sold 2500/d of Nov2/Mar3 @ 3.495 to hedge the above book. can you please put it in that book.

Thanks.

thnk u nothing for now

ttfn

do u have msn instant messenger ?

I'm ok. Things are pretty bleak. I don't know what is going to happen. Asking myself some serious questions about my career.

I think Enron and my career are finished.

John,
Thanks for the note. Yeah things look pretty lousy here at the big E. From first to worst in 4 easy weeks. The untold story is how much money the gas and power trading folks have made that some weenies in three piece in suits in Corp pissed away. Looks like we are going to be bought by Dynegy. Hang in there with ONE. I am agitating for a Christmas visit to Mich by us, so hope to see you then.

Keep on it,
Andy

u sld 50 ngz01 @ 2.935 to John Arnold.

u bot 300 NGZ01 2.925 from John Arnold.

George Bush, minister of the double negative:  "Not over my dead body" will they raise your taxes.

Does that mean yes to tax increases as long as he is alive ?

congrat's Raj: I'm gratified to see that the corportae customers we talked about are finding value in the product and service.

Thought you guys would find this funny:

TOP TEN USES FOR THE NEW ENE BLDG

 1. HEALTH CLUB
 2. LOFTS
 3. PUBLIC STORAGE
 4. HOTEL FOR SEC INVESTIGATION TEAM
 5.SKY RING BAR AND BROTHEL
 6. SCRAP METAL
 7.RETAIL CENTER
 8. MINIMUM SECURITY FEDERAL PRISON FOR EXECUTIVES
 9.PROP IN NEXT HOLLYWOOD ACTION FLICK: IMPLOSION
 10.PERMANENT REMINDER TO ALL INVESTORS: SELL WHEN THEY BUILD A MONUMENT TO SELF

Oy ! Let's talk later today if you have time. hope the family is doing well.

rgds,
andy

magnani@thesearchcenter.com

Can you believe it ? cat sleeping with dogs....

Greg,

I know this has been a tough couple of weeks for you but I thought I would drop you a line and share my impressions:

1). This deal is an ideal opportunity to merge back and mid office support platforms. We have discussed this many times and EnronNetworks was practically set up for this (CommodityLogic et al...)
 
2). I don't know what you folks have in mind but I could see leaving ENE's market making and trading structure intact and having DYN's asset-based trading be just another business unit like EES was. but the key is the tremendous cost savings of the common support platform.

I don't mean to be presumptuous but I hadn't talked to you in a while and wanted to get it off my chest.

Good luck,
Andy

UNBELIEVABLE

Interesting.....Is Lay going to retire????

-- DJ Enron CEO -2: Also To Get Reimbursed For Tax Penalties --

  WASHINGTON (Dow Jones)--Enron Corp. (ENE) Chief Executive Kenneth Lay could
receive a lump sum payment as much as $80 million as a result of Dynegy Inc.'s
(DYN) plan to acquire Enron, according to a regulatory filing released Tuesday
by the Securities and Exchange Commission. 
  Under Lay's employment agreement, which originally extended through Dec. 31,
2003, Lay was entitled to a lump sum payment equal to the number of full
calendar years remaining under his contract multiplied by $20.2 million if he
terminated his employment within 60 days of a change of control. 
  In August, Lay, chairman of Enron, resumed his position as CEO following the
resignation of Jeffrey K. Skilling, Enron's then-president and CEO. At that
time, his contract was extended to Dec. 31, 2005. 
  In addition to the lump sum payment, Lay is entitled to an amount for any
related tax penalties if the payment were held to constitute an "excess
parachute payment," according to the filing. 
  Dynegy plans to acquire Enron in a stock swap valued around $10.12 billion. 
  The deal is expected to close sometime next year, in which case Lay is
entitled to $60.6 million under his contract if he terminates his employment
within the 60 days. 
  Houston-based Enron is a utilities and communications company. -Dan Lowrey;
Dow Jones Newswires; 202-393-7402; dan.lowrey@dowjones.com 
 
  (END) Dow Jones Newswires  13-11-01
  1428GMT(AP-DJ-11-13-01 1428GMT)

Symbols:
  US;DYN US;ENE 

  13-Nov-2001  14:28:54 GMT
Source DJES   - Dow Jones Energy Service
Categories:
  I/ELC I/GAS I/UES I/XISL N/CNW N/DJWI N/DPG N/LNG N/NRG N/WEI M/NND M/UTI
  P/NRG R/NAPW R/NERC R/NME R/TX R/US R/USS MST/I/ELC MST/I/GAS MST/I MST/N/LNG
  MST/R/NME MST/R/US/TX MST/R/US 

There is a lot of confused bullshit floating around.....

Mooney's are great planes and are very fast. I almost bought an MSE a few years ago, which subsequently was called the Allegro, then the Eagle. They are really well built with no incidents of inflight airframe failure ever. Drawbacks are they are quite small and there is a cloud over he comapny as it is in bankruptcy. The bankruptcy isue is around whether the supply of parts will be available going foward. They are probably being discounted which makes it a good buy. Idon't think the parts issue is a real one as someone will step in to take over the manufacturing.

AZ

Errol pleae make sure to put anything not mentioned by Justin into my book. Thanks.

Cal04
S 1500/d at 3.77
B 500/D for 3.78

apr-oct
B 2500/D for 3.02

Cal03 
B 500/D for 3.55

Justin Rostant
Enron Financial Trading Desk.
Phone: 713-853-6460
Mobile: 832-264-6333
Fax: 713-646-3239

wow, three weeks away from the kids ! brave and lucky man. life is very edgy here waiting for this stupid auction to happen. i don't really know what things will look like after even if we do get a bidder who wants to go foward. stay tuned. have a good time in oz.

andy

what about crude straddles ?

We should be watching this...
  <http://www.intcx.com/weather/images/header7.gif>
IntercontinentalExchange is pleased to announce that weather swaps trading will be included in its new version 8 release. These fixed-for-floating financial products will be cash settled on a five-day average temperature, Monday - Friday, for the current week and for the forward week. Temperatures used for the settlement of these products will be those reported by EarthSat, a widely recognized and independent source of weather data. Settlement temperatures provided by EarthSat will be available via the IntercontinentalExchange website. The hub locations for weather trades will be the primary airport weather stations at Chicago-O'Hare, Dallas-Fort Worth, New York-La Guardia, Philadelphia-International and Sacramento-Executive. The standard contract size for all locations will be $10,000 per degree Fahrenheit, with a tic increment of 0.1 degree Fahrenheit or $1,000. There are no payout limits on the contracts. 
The design and development of these new weather products was done under the guidance of Aquila Energy Marketing Corp., a recognized leader in weather product concepts. In addition, IntercontinentalExchange has worked with Aquila and other major weather market participants, including Reliant Energy, Mirant Americas, and El Paso Merchant Energy, to build consensus and support for these new products.
To trade weather swaps you must have our new version 8 release installed on your system. An advisory with details about this new release is being sent to you by separate email. 
We encourage all or our users to take a serious look at the new weather products being offered by the IntercontinentalExchange. Please contact one of our following representatives to find out about the new weather products, or check back on our website product guide:
Patricia Ricci : (646) 792-2624 : Patricia.Ricci@intcx.com <mailto:patricia.ricci@intcx.com>
Mike O'Neill : (646) 792-2626 : Michael.Oneill@intcx.com <mailto:michael.oneill@intcx.com>
Chris D'Ambrosio : (646) 792-2625 : chris.dambrosio@intcx.com <mailto:chris.dambrosio@intcx.com>

I can take this mission. Please advise.

Andy Zipper

sonjay.vishnupad@robertwalters.com

no problem. I just received my copy of the new policy with AIG and will send you proof.

Thanks Jeff. We'll let you know.

Regards,
Andy

Sonjay,

Please give me a call at your convienence.

Thanks,
Andy Zipper

+800 350 2415 Michael Hubley

Jay,

Have received comments that when multi day limit orders are placed, they are not alive after a friday night. I think this might have to do with orders getting wiped out duirng maintenance but I wanted to alert you to this.

AZ

I asked Steve and here is what he sent me.

Hi Andy and happy new year...

I chose one in NJ for my own use.

I did get some recommendations from some other people that were NY lawyers:

Jerry Solomon at Gallet, Dryer & Berkey 212-935-3131.

I have another somewhere, and I'll try to send it along.

steve

A friend who works in New York asked if I could recommend an attorney who
does Will/Estate preparation. Do you have any recommendations ?

Thanks,
Andy

p.s. Happy New Year !!

FYI

Hi Andy,

When it was decided that we would accept multi-day orders, we pointed out to Lavo and John that we do system maintenance for an hour every Friday night.  Their position was anytime we take the system down for any reason, planned or un-planned, we should kill all orders to prevent someone from being unable to cancel an order while the system was down and then having it fill before he can get to it.

We actually have a plan in place to make this much better.  Effectively, we will have dual sites.  The second site will be used both for disaster recovery, as well as a convenient way to manage code releases without an outage.  Unfortunately, purchasing the hardware for this has been put on hold given the present circumstances.

--jay

Jay,

Have received comments that when multi day limit orders are placed, they are not alive after a friday night. I think this might have to do with orders getting wiped out duirng maintenance but I wanted to alert you to this.

AZ

got this from late friday. have you ever heard of him ?
Fuck you, you piece of shit.  I can't wait to see you
go down with the ship like all the other vermin.

Smug, paranoid, unhappy mother fucker.

Eat shit.

__________________________________________________
Do You Yahoo!?
Yahoo! GeoCities - quick and easy web site hosting, just $8.95/month.
http://geocities.yahoo.com/ps/info1

Thanks for the note. Let's talk real soon.

Thanks.

thanks. good luck.

The Lions win !    The Lions win !

Break up the Lions....

Andy

A friend who works in New York asked if I could recommend an attorney who does Will/Estate preparation. Do you have any recommendations ?

Thanks,
Andy

p.s. Happy New Year !!

Let me check on it and get back to you. I had mine done in Houston, but I can probably recommend someone.

Happy New Year,
Andy

Thanks !

Have a safe and happy New Year.

Andy

who are you ?

I got it, whatever it was.

Sorry to see the absorption of TQ by APB. I suppose it is all for the best.  Hope that you guys come out of it allright. The irony is that TQ outlived Enron ! Haven't spoken to you in a awhile and hope that all is well with you and your family. Call me when you get a chance to catch up.

Best Regards for the Holiday Season,
Andy Zipper

See you soon. Will do on the duds.

in Detroit @ 313 881 1166		

Happy Holidays,
Andy

In detroit @ 313 881 1166

Happy Holidays,
Andy

huh ?

Mari,

I will be out Monday thru Wednesday. I will be in from 10:00am Thrus thru Friday.

My cell is (713) 419 0203.
I will be reachable @ (313) 881 1166 through Wednesday.

Happy Holidays,
Andy Zipper

no thank you.

no problem. good luck.

Will do, brother.

  

Ted,
Try these guys. George is excellent. I don't know much about Balal.
Hope all is going well for you and your bride. I know I owe you a phone call, and I will pay the debt soon.

Best,
Andy

Thanks, John.  You still owe me the list of books that you thought I should read.

George

I will keep in touch.  I have a few contacts in the industry and I will check them out.  It was great knowing you George.  Take care and keep in touch.

John Griffith

(713) 527-8743

I don't have email at home but my address is 1503 A Fairview Houston, TX 77006

I had a great time working with the best option trading team in the energy industry.  What I have learned from you will benefit me a lot in my future career.

I will start looking for a new job.  If your friends in other trading house are looking for a junior trader, please let me know.

Deep in my heart I want to be part of your team.  Count me in when the new company starts hiring people.  

Sincerely

George Huan

My contact info:
(713) 682-6005 (H)
(281) 451-5062 (O)
georgehuan@hotmail.com

Hi John,
I hope things are going well for you. Sorry I could not contact you earlier
- had been really busy wrapping up things. Thanks for stopping the other day
and inquiring about me. I have an H-1 visa and have 6 weeks to find a job
after which I will be required to leave the country.

I am attaching a copy of my resume for you to review. I would appreciate
greatly if you could go over it and offer any suggestions on how I can
improve my chances of finding a job.

Thanks,
Bilal

_________________________________________________________________
MSN Photos is the easiest way to share and print your photos:
http://photos.msn.com/support/worldwide.aspx

 - Bilal Bajwa Resume.doc 

I think the note I sent to Steve plus the fact that he came to see me and I told him he was out of line are enough. We will not support the app. It seems kind of draconian to shut off the flow of information. As far as wireless in general it has never been a high priority for me because we never had a commercial basis for proceeding other than "gee, wouldn't this be cool" I think it is time to reassess the wireless angle, in terms of what it would cost to build, who would build it for us, and what we would get from the project. I'm going to ask Dave Forster to do that.

Comments ?

AZ

Let's let Govt. Affairs get some more info before doing anything.

 

New valuation presentation attached.

Stranger than fiction....
Trader: John Hodge
User: ericgraffp
Counterparty: Coral Energy Resources L.P.
Product: US Gas Phy  TCO Pool   24May01    USD/MM
Time: 5/23/2001 8:41:22 am

 

<Embedded Picture (Device Independent Bitmap)>

let's discuss.

Talk to Matt Motsinger for that information. He is in charge of the reporting for that.

If we accept, then yes our IPE shares get converted to ICE shares.

yadda yadda yadda....

the c1 guy's note is just more e-commerce blather...I don't know whether he would add any value or not, but would definitely add buzzwords.

Arvind,

Thank you for the note. We are evaluating the potential value that Techspan could bring to Enron. We will contact you when are ready to enter into a dialogue.
Once again thank you for your interest in Enron.

Andy Zipper
Vice President

experian 1-888-397-3742 done conf#3267747298

equifax  1-800-525-6285

transunion  1-800-916-8800
                 1-800-680-7289

Okay, but you're still sleeping on the couch tonight....

Please see revised market assignments. Addititions are highlighted in blue. 

no interest. thanks.

ok

I don't know.

I need to meet with GM from 12:30 to 2:00, so the early offsite slot works for me. Thanks.

Can you schedule and send out the following note to the EnronOnline origination group:

"Please attend an origination meeting on Tuesday, May 29  from 8:30 to 10:00. The focus of this meeting will doing a walkthrough of an EnronOnline demo for both EnronOnline hosted products and X-online hosted environments. This demo will cover all relevant functionality of the system, similar to what we have been presenting to GM et al."

Send to:

Dave Forster
Michael Bridges
Bob Shults
Dan Diamond
Jake Staffel
John Allario
John Pavetto
Mike Haney
Leonardo Pacheco
Carl Carter

Okay. It wil be Bob Shults. I will put him in contact with Joe.

Please call Joe Robertson of enron Metals in NY to discuss market-making deal with the COMEX.
I would like one of your guys to join Joe Robertson.  Joe knows the contract and the market.  Your guy knows the system and our vision for EOL/market making.  You name the guy.

Joe

Mike,
There are lots of issues around this sort of deal, who do want to negotiate this ? you or us ?

this is the underlying deal. it needs work and i am not sure we would do it. also, no straight through processing would be allowed for our deals.
Mike

I attach a letter of intent which I hope covers all the points we discussed this morning. On the basis that you asked for a memorandum of understanding the attached draft is fairly legalistic in tone. If you wanted something more informal let me know.

Paul - let me know if you have any comments.

Jonathan

 

I AGREE WITH KAL.

I believe the attached note accurately summarizes our position. We do not see anything changing. The deal remains terminated for the reasons below.
On May 22, 2001 HoustonStreet representatives (Frank Getman, John Wyman and David Cuadros) came to Enron to give us a demonstration of the gas interfaces.  HoustonStreet was allowed to load the required .cab files on the demonstration computers prior to the demonstration.  HoustonStreet provided us with a script to follow relative to the demonstration as well as a list of test and production mappings.  During the demonstration we experienced the following:

1 - 8 second delays between a price update on EnronOnline and a price update on HoustonStreet.  With just five products active we experienced a delay of up to 5 seconds.  Due to the delay in price updates, transaction attempts on the HoustonStreet platform resulted in a high percentage of failed transactions with Enron.
When we activated Product ID 16612 (US Gas Basis PEPL Jun-Oct01) the product showed up on EnronOnline but did not show up on HoustonStreet.  HoustonStreet provided us with a list of products which had been mapped in the test environment and this product was included on the list.  HoustonStreet indicated that they had verified the mapping of all the products on this list.  We reviewed the mapping of this product by Enron and confirmed that it was active and mapped.  Incorrect mapping of products has the potential of allowing transactions to occur with mismatched product types.
When we attempted to transact on Product ID 16600 (US Gas Basis NGI Chicago Jun-Oct01) we were unable to complete a transaction even when the bid and offer prices were not changing.  These transaction attempts should have resulted in successful transactions.  We also experience instances where the bid and/or offer price would disappear after a failed transaction attempt and not reappear even thought the price was still present on EnronOnline.  In many cases the price would disappear for up to 30 seconds or more.  Although we did not witness any incorrect transactions, general functionality failure may or may not result in incorrect transactions.  At a minimum this type of behavior would result in frustration on the part of the counterparty when a transaction attempt results in a failure with no subsequent price move or a disappearing price.
A review of the transactions we recorded versus the transactions indicated by HoustonStreet reveals some discrepancies.  In an email from John Wyman dated 5/23 (forwarded seperately), John Wyman indicated that they had cleaned their database just prior to 3:00 PM and gave us just the trade count beginning at 14:58 on 5/22.  Although there has not been a deal by deal reconciliation of the trades, we compared our total trade count beginning at 14:58.  If the deal counts do not match this would result in substantial financial exposure.  Below I have highlighted the HoustonStreet transactions by counterparty versus the EnronOnline transaction count:

			HSE	EOL

	Arizona		 12	 14
	Avista		 03	 03
	Adams		 17	 19
	BP		 57	 58
	
	Total		 89	 94
	
Based upon my review of the demonstration, I continue to believe there significant potential exposure associated with the HoustonStreet interfaces.

Bob Shults
EnronOnline LLC
Houston, Texas 77002-7361
713 853-0397
713 825-6372 cell
713 646-2126
bob.shults@enron.com

I declined to review Drew because I feel I haven't really spent a lot of time with him. The times I have worked with him, he has done a great job and been easy to work with.

Let me make this clear: Accenture is not to speak to anyone other than ourselves regarding what they are doing with EnronOnline. We ahve too much at stake right now.

Thanks
AZ

Who and why ?

Yes, and I would you and I to chime in as well.

Vin,

Glad we could hook up yesterday. 

The gist of what we are interested in is providing EnronOnline's liquidity to local NYMEX traders. I would like to explore the concept of NYMEX's clearing corp or another clearer standing in the middle between Enron and these locals. EnronOnline's architecture provides for a Master user, such as a Clearing Corp, to set up as many sub-users (local traders) as it wants. Each sub-user has trading rights as designated and controlled by the master. We would envision the Clearing Corp. handling it credit arrangements with the locals, and negotiating its relationship with Enron. I know this is pretty simple stuff, but every long journey starts with a small step. Please let me your interest in pursuing this sort of arrangement or a variant thereof.

Thanks,
Andy Zipper
Vice President
Enron Corp.

 
Please review the spreadsheet, and look at Daily Deals Graph.

Justin,
The traders are free to use any platform they like. I do not approve or disapprove; they are in the best position to make that decision. It is EWS policy however that someone from Amita/Lara's group be the master user to montor activity and control what access agreements we accept.

Thanks,
Andy

Lara,
You need to be the master user for the platform. It is EWS policy. Go ahead and get set up and coordinate document acceptance with Justin.

Guys,
Let's get together today to dicuss demo. I would like to demo full capability, including option manager. I think it is very important to also set up an interest rate product, perhaps a swap that is quoted in rate only. No need to convert to dollar ox just yet. Given that the guy who is building their commercial paper platform will be there and seems to be one of the main judges of the merit of EOL I think it behooves us to slant presentation that way.

I'm good from 11:00 to 1:00

Andy

thanks. damned things never work.

millionth trade: eric graff @ Coral, TCO pool day gas, someone on scott neal's desk.

OpenLink is one of the leaders in risk management systems. We used at Coral, and it was then called Abacus. It is strongest in front office risk management. I would view their competition as KioDex. The deal with Duke has been around for awhile.

Frank,

Thank you for bringing your team down to Houston to demonstrate the new version of the system. We appreciate the effort that HoustonStreet has made to upgrade its system, however in our view insufficient progress has been made to change our decision to terminate the Posting Agreement. Once again, thank you the effort your team put in and let's stay touch.

Andy Zipper

I've seen it before. It is Hong Kong Airport and the guy kicked out the crab at the last possible second. He was seconds from riping the gear off.

Mike,

That's fine, but no LOI is to be agreed without EnronOnline's concurrence. If you want to do something without us, go right ahead but if we are to be involved then we need to approve and be involved in the deal from the get go. Bob Shults is contacting Joe in NY as we speak.

Thanks,
Andy Zipper

We will do on Monday morning, but I don't think we need Jay involved.

Kal will be finishing mine shortly. Please be prepared to do the 3 hole punch thing 20 times. Thanks.
REMINDER --

Opening comments start promptly at 8:00 a.m., so please allow plenty of time to arrive at the Houstonian, park and have breakfast.  The Houstonian is located at 111 North Post Oak Boulevard, phone 713-680-2626.  Our meeting will be held in the Cottonwood Room.

Dress code for the day is casual.

If you haven't turned in your presentation yet, please bring 20 copies to the meeting, 3-hole punched at the top.  You will also have to bring your presentation on a CD so I can load it on the laptop.

Tina Spiller
Assistant to Greg Piper
Chief Operating Officer
Enron Net Works LLC
Office 713.853.5746
tina.spiller@enron.com

Okay, fair enough. He would be perfect for the role, but I understand what you are trying to accomplish.

what about London ?

It's fine with me.

CAN YOU SEND David Lebow in IR a copy of the above report on electronic commmodity trading. thanks.

Let me if you receive this email.
Vin,

Glad we could hook up yesterday. 

The gist of what we are interested in is providing EnronOnline's liquidity to local NYMEX traders. I would like to explore the concept of NYMEX's clearing corp or another clearer standing in the middle between Enron and these locals. EnronOnline's architecture provides for a Master user, such as a Clearing Corp, to set up as many sub-users (local traders) as it wants. Each sub-user has trading rights as designated and controlled by the master. We would envision the Clearing Corp. handling it credit arrangements with the locals, and negotiating its relationship with Enron. I know this is pretty simple stuff, but every long journey starts with a small step. Please let me your interest in pursuing this sort of arrangement or a variant thereof.

Thanks,
Andy Zipper
Vice President
Enron Corp.

good !

I'll attend briefly, but you can run it.

Greg Whalley has requested a Trader's Meeting tomorrow morning @ 7:45 a.m. (CST).  The meeting will be held in his office, ECS 06752.  The dial-in number for Portland and Calgary is listed below.

Dial-in #		888.285.4585
Host Code:	869944 (Greg)
Participant code:	107058

Many Thanks,

Liz Taylor
x31935

Epcor Merchant & Capital LLP (formerly Encore)

Contract Contact:	Karen Mikkelborg	phone: (403) 717-8121
Business Contact:	Derek Laishley		phone: (403) 717-4610
						fax: (403) 7174601

ENMAX

Business Contact:	Marvin Mah		phone: (403) 514-2078
						fax: (403) 514-3024
Credit Contact:		Don O'Brien		phone: (403) 514-2073

TransCanada 

Business Contact:	Gwen Wenstrom	phone: (403) 216-2910
						fax: (403) 920-2464

just send the essay at home

I don't know what to do about mom, i don't think fear is the only thing holding her back , i think she is lazy

is there a heart health class in Sudbury that has excercise regimines as well as diets?

when is the last time she saw her doctor

Hi John

How was Thanksgiving?  Was the baby shower fun?

I was wondering if you'd have some time to read over Ali's Chicago essays
later tonight?  He's going to submit them on Wednesday.  Let me know if
that's okay.  Do you have a printer at home?  Can I send them to your home
account?  (I don't think Ali will be done before about 8pm or so tonight).

PS:  We need to talk about mom.  I saw her this weekend -- she's gained a
lot of weight, and hasn't been exercising at all.  Dad's pretty frustrated
because all she does is watch tv.  I had a talk with her yesterday telling
her that she has more risk of having a heart attack if she doesn't walk /
exercise than if she exerts herself when exercising (i think she's afraid
of having a heart attack while exercising).  We need to do something --
she's 170lbs now, and should be at around 140lbs to be healthy.

Livia

 
Here's the way to claim your Internet fees as part of the ClickAtHome Canada program.   Internet fees are reimbursed through payroll with the final processing date being December 15th .  Below are the simple steps to claim your Internet fees  up to December 31, 2001 :

(1)  Enter your Internet payment information on the "Clickathome.enron.com/canada" site.  This initially registers you as an Internet user in the ClickAtHome Canada program and then provides the appropriate information to our accounting department for payment.   You can include your Internet fees from the commencement of the program (June 5, 2001) or for pilot program participants from your commencement date to December 31, 2001. 

(2)  Please complete the first step by  December 15th so your claim can be processed and paid on  December 30th through payroll.   

(3)  Kindly retain a copy of all your claimed receipts as back-up in the event you are asked by Calgary Accounting to provide it. 

** Can't remember your SAP number??  Use this handy site:  <http://isc.enron.com> (follow the instructions for 'SAP or eHRonline password reset' and then 'click here if you have forgotten your personnel number').   Use your SIN number where it asks for Social Security Number and your all set.

If you need assistance with your registration or have questions about your Internet subsidy, kindly contact  Tricia Henry. 

  

to this spreadsheet we should add the $64MM cost for increased operating reserves, the $60MM for taxes and fx

Louise,

Attachment as per your conversation with Rob Milnthorp.

 << File: LAVO P&L_nov15.xls >> 

ENRON CANADA CORP.

Derek J. Davies
Vice President

here is a spreadsheet that captures the eol price data, an analyst here built it, apparently whenever the price changes in eol it gets sent to a file server and then the macro picks up the new data
 

i just talked to mom again.  she was super crusty (and even swore!).  i
asked what was wrong, and she said that it's partially about dad, and
partially about the house.  she said dad isn't doing anything around the
house (vacuum, mop) and then she wants to do it, but gets tired.  i told
her i'd get her a maid, and she said no, but i think we should anyway.
what do you think?

yes but not 100% that the merger will close

Hey, so is that Dynery company buying you guys?

                    John.Zufferli@
I am supposed to talk to her tonight.  What do you think it is?
    -----Original Message-----
   i think something's wrong with mom...she's totally down in the dumps
   (i've
   called for the last few days now, and every time she seems depressed)

   maybe you should give her a casual call, just to say hi and see what's
   up
   (but don't make it a big deal, or else she'll pretend she's happy and
   everything's okay)

   lee

   PS:  i went to pottery barn kids the other day....super cute!  how's
   your
   nursery coming along?

I am supposed to talk to her tonight.  What do you think it is?
i think something's wrong with mom...she's totally down in the dumps (i've
called for the last few days now, and every time she seems depressed)

maybe you should give her a casual call, just to say hi and see what's up
(but don't make it a big deal, or else she'll pretend she's happy and
everything's okay)

lee

PS:  i went to pottery barn kids the other day....super cute!  how's your
nursery coming along?

i think something's wrong with mom...she's totally down in the dumps (i've
called for the last few days now, and every time she seems depressed)

maybe you should give her a casual call, just to say hi and see what's up
(but don't make it a big deal, or else she'll pretend she's happy and
everything's okay)

lee

PS:  i went to pottery barn kids the other day....super cute!  how's your
nursery coming along?

 

it feels like life at work here is still day to day, we are still having credit issues in buying our gas back, it is difficult to be away for so long,  I don't want to let you down and I feel like a complete heel, but I am terrified

thank you sweetie.  you really are a man who has everything.  The Canadian
Life check is here today.  So no worries.

Have you decided for sure whether you are going to TX or not?  Need to know
re:  basement scheduling.  No pressure but sure am glad you decided to come.
:-)

love you, jess
> a fly fishing book, fly-fishing net,
>
>     -----Original Message-----

yeah i am too conservative, but jessica isn't afraid, i wish she would just stay here

You don't want to fly because you're too freaked out?  That's too bad, but
understandable.  I'm not terribly excited to fly anymore either.  Does Jess
still have to go?  I guess it's okay if she's not nervous -- she'll be
fine.

                    John.Zufferli@
I am not going to fly on Thurs, but Jessica wants to go anyway.  I think I
am going to stay.  SHe seems ok with it

    -----Original Message-----
   Hi John,

   How are you doing? Are you nervous to fly on Thursday?  Everything will
   be
   okay -- don't worry.  I'm going to have to start flying to Montreal
   again,
   at least one day a week, because i'm on the new case.

   How's work going?

   Livia

a fly fishing book, fly-fishing net, 

I am dyin' over here!  Have you thought of  anything?
 
DVDs right?  what else?
 
love, jess

I am not going to fly on Thurs, but Jessica wants to go anyway.  I think I am going to stay.  SHe seems ok with it

Hi John,

How are you doing? Are you nervous to fly on Thursday?  Everything will be
okay -- don't worry.  I'm going to have to start flying to Montreal again,
at least one day a week, because i'm on the new case.

How's work going?

Livia

I have a very important video announcement about the future of our company.  Please go to <http://home.enron.com/message/> to access the video.  Thank you.

just baby stuff

What would you like for Christmas?  Clothes?  House stuff?  Both mom and I
are wondering.

                    John.Zufferli@
Still just waiting to see what happens.  Everything is ok though, just a
little slow.  Jessica is doing fine.

Take care

    -----Original Message-----
   Hi John

   How's everything going at work?  Everywhere I turn, there's more dismal
   news about Enron.  What's up?  Hope you guys are doing well.  How's Jess
   feeling?

   Lee

Still just waiting to see what happens.  Everything is ok though, just a little slow.  Jessica is doing fine.

Take care

Hi John

How's everything going at work?  Everywhere I turn, there's more dismal
news about Enron.  What's up?  Hope you guys are doing well.  How's Jess
feeling?

Lee

John Disturnal read/write, the others just read

Hi John,
 
There's some reorganization taking place for drive access approval right now, and although I have you listed as the approver for the Traders directory, the requests for access came through to me (I'll get that fixed so that they go to you). 
 
Meantime, could you please confirm that the following individuals can have read/write access to the I:\secure\Trading directory:
 
John Disturnal
Michael Taylor
Murray Fichten
Tyler Seminuk
 
Thanks!
 
Karen Maskwa
(403) 974-6799
 

can you move 	Ian Cooke in front of Stephan
		Chad Bruce beside Brian Gillis
		Cooper Richey in Ian Cooke's seat beside Chris Dorland
		Bill Greenizan beside Cooper Richey
		Hourly beside Bill Greenizan in Chad Bruce's seat

i'm going to be in the US from nov 15 to nov 24

Hey,  no problem.  Hopefully you not allergic to hanging out with Enron guys.  The week of the 20th is fairly good.  What were you thinking?

Derek

Hi Derek,

Are you still interested in beers today?  I have unfortunately come down
with a nasty flu, I am going to have to bail out.  I feel like a scumbag
since I initiated the get together, but I'm sure you don't want to be
infected.  Would you like to reschedule for the week of November 20th?

Rob

I am not involved in this, it is Rob Milnthorp's domain.

John,
I'm hearing rumblings from Whalley and others that UBS may want to pick up Canadian service contracts from the Estate.  

Can you give me download of these deals?  (high level summary)
Thanks
Frank

Chili and Cheddar Bow Tie Casserole
 
1 (7oz) can chipotle chiles in adobo  sauce
1 tablespoon butter
1 cup chopped red bell pepper
1/2 cup diced Canadian bacon (about 2  oz)
1 cup thinly sliced green onions
2 tablespoons all-purpose flour
1 teaspoon chili powder
1/2 teaspoon salt
1/2 teaspoon ground cumin
2 1/4 cups 2% reduced-fat milk
2 cups (8 oz) shredded reduced-fat sharp cheddar  cheese
2 tablespoons chopped fresh cilantro
8 cups hot cooked farfalle (bow tie pasta) or other  short pasta
Cooking spray
 
Preheat oven to 400 degrees
 
Remove 1 teaspoon adobo sauce and 1 chile from  canned chiles; mince the chile.  Place remaining sauce and chiles in a  zip-top plastic bag and freeze for future use.
 
Melt butter in a large Dutch oven over medium-high  heat.  Add bell pepper and bacon; saut? 4 minutes.  Add onions; saut?  1 minute.  Stir in the adobo sauce, minced chile, flour, chili powder, salt  and cumin; cook 1 minute.  Gradually add milk; cook until thick and bubbly  (about 4 minutes), stirring constantly with a whisk.  Remove from  heat.  Gradually add 1 1/2 cups cheese and cilantro, stirring until cheese  melts.  Add pasta to pan; toss well.
 
Spoon the pasta mixture into a 11x7-inch baking  dish coated with cooking spray.  Sprinkle 1/2 cup cheese over pasta  mixture.  Bake at 400 degrees for 15 mins or until browned.   Yield:  6 servings
 
 
Cooks note:  I could not find the prepared can  of whole chiles with the sauce so I just used the can of diced green chiles I  found in the Mexican food isle and threw in what looked to be the right  amount.
 
Enjoy!
 
 

go ahead

Hi John, this survey looks pretty innocent.  It seems to focus on customer satisfaction.  Do you want to have any input to the responses.  If not, I will respond and submit it.

Mark

Dear Mark  :

Here is the Customer Satisfaction Survey promised in my October 31, 2001 letter. Your input will help improve Customer Service at ESBI Alberta Ltd.  Our consultant, Praxis Research, has worked with us to develop an easy-to-use online survey that should only take about 5-10 minutes to complete.

You may complete the survey online or fax a completed printed version of the web survey to 1-403-249-8983.  If you would prefer to complete the survey via telephone, please call Praxis Research at 1-888-882-1285.

To access the online survey, please click on the following Internet link: www.praxis.ca/eal/eal_survey1.htm.

We have assigned you an individual password: mad98  which you need to access the survey.   If you do not complete the survey at one sitting you can use your password to re-enter the survey and finish your partially completed survey or revise your responses. (Up to Nov. 30 at which time the response period terminates and we analyze the input).

Your responses are confidential. Praxis, the independent research firm collecting the information, will aggregate all data. Comments will always be aggregated by Praxis to maintain individual confidentiality. If, however, you choose to identify yourself, EAL will be glad to respond to any specific comments you make. If you have any questions or concerns about the online survey please contact David de Lange at Praxis Research at 1-888-882-1285 or by email at delange@praxis.ca.

All participants will receive an executive summary of the survey.  In addition, early in 2002 we intend to host a workshop to, among other things, develop customer service improvement initiatives in response to the survey findings.

Your participation in this survey is greatly appreciated.

Sincerely,

Vincent Flynn
President and CEO
ESBI Alberta Ltd.

looks ok to me

Kindly terminate all payroll deductions for non-registered plans with Canada Life

Thank you

The canadian sap # is 	p00565421
the us sap # is		p00503799

rumor on cnbc is that dynegy is buying enron

 
 

Untitled Attachment 

Congratulations to Cyntia and Dan Di Stefano on their new son!  Peter Angelo was born at 9:44 p.m. on Sunday.  He weighs 9 lbs 2 oz and is 22" long.  Everyone is doing well.

Just contact me at this e-mail address or 403-974-6749 re your interview

It's 2200 miles to Houston, to far to drive

home (403) 685-4817
Crap?stop reading the papers?you just stop that right now.  Hey?please send me your home number.

http://www.cnn.com/2001/US/11/05/gen.attack.on.terror/index.html

CNN) -- Seven airport security workers have been suspended after police said a man made it through a security checkpoint at Chicago's O'Hare International Airport with knives, a can of Mace and a stun gun. 
Security screeners took two knives from Subash Gurung, 27, after he initially went through the checkpoint Saturday night, authorities said. Gurung then was allowed to pass through. Seven more knives, Mace and a stun gun were found in his carry-on luggage during a random search before boarding a United Airlines flight, police said. 
The suspect, who told authorities he is from Nepal, was arrested Sunday night by the FBI and will be arraigned Monday on a federal charge of unlawfully taking a weapon aboard an aircraft. He originally had been arrested Saturday by local police, charged with two misdemeanors and released on bond. 
CNN has learned of a possible connection between Gurung and a man who is being held as a material witness in the September 11 terrorist attacks. Gurung listed the same West Hollywood Avenue address in Chicago as the detainee. (Full story </2001/US/11/05/inv.ohare.security.breach/index.html>) 
In the U.S.-led retaliation for the terror attacks, Taliban forces were leaving their southern Afghan stronghold of Kandahar on Monday as U.S.-led airstrikes intensified. 
After a quiet day Sunday -- allied planes dropped a single bomb southeast of the city -- CNN's Kamal Hyder reported heavy bombardment of rural districts around Kandahar as well as military targets to the northeast, southeast and west. 
There were reports of further attacks overnight on the Kajaki Dam area, where a hydroelectric plant is located that provides power to Kandahar. 
Taliban frontline positions north of Kabul also were hit Monday, and there were reports of intense fighting near the strategic northern city of Mazar-e Sharif. 

http://www.cnn.com/2001/US/11/05/gen.attack.on.terror/index.html

CNN) -- Seven airport security workers have been suspended after police said a man made it through a security checkpoint at Chicago's O'Hare International Airport with knives, a can of Mace and a stun gun. 
Security screeners took two knives from Subash Gurung, 27, after he initially went through the checkpoint Saturday night, authorities said. Gurung then was allowed to pass through. Seven more knives, Mace and a stun gun were found in his carry-on luggage during a random search before boarding a United Airlines flight, police said. 
The suspect, who told authorities he is from Nepal, was arrested Sunday night by the FBI and will be arraigned Monday on a federal charge of unlawfully taking a weapon aboard an aircraft. He originally had been arrested Saturday by local police, charged with two misdemeanors and released on bond. 
CNN has learned of a possible connection between Gurung and a man who is being held as a material witness in the September 11 terrorist attacks. Gurung listed the same West Hollywood Avenue address in Chicago as the detainee. (Full story </2001/US/11/05/inv.ohare.security.breach/index.html>) 
In the U.S.-led retaliation for the terror attacks, Taliban forces were leaving their southern Afghan stronghold of Kandahar on Monday as U.S.-led airstrikes intensified. 
After a quiet day Sunday -- allied planes dropped a single bomb southeast of the city -- CNN's Kamal Hyder reported heavy bombardment of rural districts around Kandahar as well as military targets to the northeast, southeast and west. 
There were reports of further attacks overnight on the Kajaki Dam area, where a hydroelectric plant is located that provides power to Kandahar. 
Taliban frontline positions north of Kabul also were hit Monday, and there were reports of intense fighting near the strategic northern city of Mazar-e Sharif. 

http://www.cnn.com/2001/US/11/05/gen.attack.on.terror/index.html

CNN) -- Seven airport security workers have been suspended after police said a man made it through a security checkpoint at Chicago's O'Hare International Airport with knives, a can of Mace and a stun gun. 
Security screeners took two knives from Subash Gurung, 27, after he initially went through the checkpoint Saturday night, authorities said. Gurung then was allowed to pass through. Seven more knives, Mace and a stun gun were found in his carry-on luggage during a random search before boarding a United Airlines flight, police said. 
The suspect, who told authorities he is from Nepal, was arrested Sunday night by the FBI and will be arraigned Monday on a federal charge of unlawfully taking a weapon aboard an aircraft. He originally had been arrested Saturday by local police, charged with two misdemeanors and released on bond. 
CNN has learned of a possible connection between Gurung and a man who is being held as a material witness in the September 11 terrorist attacks. Gurung listed the same West Hollywood Avenue address in Chicago as the detainee. (Full story </2001/US/11/05/inv.ohare.security.breach/index.html>) 
In the U.S.-led retaliation for the terror attacks, Taliban forces were leaving their southern Afghan stronghold of Kandahar on Monday as U.S.-led airstrikes intensified. 
After a quiet day Sunday -- allied planes dropped a single bomb southeast of the city -- CNN's Kamal Hyder reported heavy bombardment of rural districts around Kandahar as well as military targets to the northeast, southeast and west. 
There were reports of further attacks overnight on the Kajaki Dam area, where a hydroelectric plant is located that provides power to Kandahar. 
Taliban frontline positions north of Kabul also were hit Monday, and there were reports of intense fighting near the strategic northern city of Mazar-e Sharif. 

Here is the position summary as of Feb 2, 2002

 

During this critical time, it is imperative that our management team remain focused on our business and continue to address the challenges currently facing our company.  For that reason, I have decided to postpone the Enron Management Conference.

The Conference will now be held Friday, February 22 - Saturday, February 23, 2002 at the Westin La Cantera Resort in San Antonio.  While the Saturday meeting allows some Enron executives who cannot be away from the office during business hours to attend the Management Conference for the first time, I also recognize that it requires many of you to forfeit additional personal time on behalf of Enron.  I truly appreciate your sacrifice and I sincerely encourage your attendance.

The new agenda, while still being finalized, will be abbreviated but every bit as informative and worthwhile as previously planned.  We'll be in touch soon with more details.

Regards,
Ken Lay 

A ok for me

Could you kindly provide me with your revisions, if any, as soon as possible.

Thanks, Nella
Gentlemen, you have recently received hard copies of the 3rd quarter soft targets.  Attached for your reference are the electronic versions of the soft targets.

Paul, your hard copies will arrive on Monday.

Regards, Nella

 << File: Q3SoftTargets.xls >>  << File: 3Q Orig Detail.xls >>  << File: 3Q Counterparty Detail.xls >> 

 << File: MidMkt.Orig2000 vs. 2001a.xls >>  << File: EOL 2000 vs. 2001 Sep.xls >>  << File: New Counterparties.xls >> 

jzufferli@shaw.ca, it has changed from jzufferli@home.com

Zuf:

what is your home email address again?

in hoc,
smith

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com/intl.asp

can you explain to me what data you are pulling for canadian fixed price positions in the report, it showed chris lambie selling 1200 contracts yesterday.   my records indicate chris sold 145 nymex contracts yesterday.  in general the data (i.e including the var calc) is questionable relative to my reports.

That is good

How's 11:30 or so Nov 15 and I can buy you lunch?
If not, pick a time that day as I'm fairly open.

Cheryl

Looks ok

    -----Original Message-----
   Thanks for the information, John,
   I want to set up a meeting with you for mid-November to show you how we
   are
   representing market activity and talk to you about forward open
   interests.

   How does November 15 or so look for you?

   Cheryl

   -----Original Message-----
   **********************************************************************
   This e-mail is the property of Enron Corp. and/or its relevant affiliate
   and
   may contain confidential and privileged material for the sole use of the
   intended recipient (s). Any review, use, distribution or disclosure by
   others is strictly prohibited. If you are not the intended recipient (or
   authorized to receive for the recipient), please contact the sender or
   reply
   to Enron Corp. at enron.messaging.administration@enron.com and delete
   all
   copies of the message. This e-mail (and any attachments hereto) are not
   intended to be an offer (or an acceptance) and do not create or evidence
   a
   binding and enforceable contract between Enron Corp. (or any of its
   affiliates) and the intended recipient or any other party, and may not
   be
   relied on by anyone as the basis of a contract by estoppel or otherwise.
   Thank you.
   **********************************************************************

Looks ok

Thanks for the information, John,
I want to set up a meeting with you for mid-November to show you how we are
representing market activity and talk to you about forward open interests.

How does November 15 or so look for you?

Cheryl

When you get it can you come talk to me about this

Thanks
Attached is the summary of PMA's for Sept to be included in the DPR for Oct.
Let me know if you have any questions

Mark

 << File: Oct_PMA.xls >> 

the phone number for the conference room in calgary is 403-974-6983

Here is the article I mentioned.  love, jess
 - How Enron Blew It.doc 

In the event that your vision is clearing, here is another stick in the eye.

John

October 26th, 2001

WATT-EX ANNOUNCES EQUITY FINANCING AND MARKET-MAKER AGREEMENT

Dynegy to Enhance Liquidity in Canadian Electricity Market

Calgary, Alberta, Canada (Oct. 26, 2001) - Alberta Watt Exchange (Watt-Ex)
today announced significant advancement in its long-term business plan with
the execution of two definitive agreements. ENTx Capital Corporation and RAW
Energy Ltd. have agreed to purchase treasury shares in OXEN Inc., the parent
company of Watt-Ex. The new capital will be used to broaden the range of
services offered by Watt-Ex and for general corporate purposes.

Watt-Ex also announced that Dynegy Canada Inc., a wholly owned subsidiary of
Dynegy Inc. (NYSE: DYN), has agreed to provide market-maker services. Under
the terms of the agreement, Dynegy Canada will maintain bid and offer prices
in Alberta electricity forward contracts traded on the online Watt-Ex
system.

Dynegy Canada's market-maker service will serve as a platform for enhancing
liquidity in the Alberta electricity market. The increased liquidity will be
available to suppliers and users to manage price risk, reduce financial
uncertainty and bring greater economic performance into the Alberta
electricity market.

Watt-Ex is an independently owned and operated online trading system for
electrical energy in the Alberta market. It allows market participants to
buy and sell contracts for firm forward commitments in the real time or spot
electricity market, as well as providing for the trade of ancillary
services.

ENTx Capital Corporation is a private equity investor, specializing in
emerging, innovative and financially sound small cap operating companies in
the electric power industry.

RAW Energy Ltd. is a private company, active across most aspects of the
energy industry.

Dynegy Inc. is a leading energy merchant and power generator in North
America, the United Kingdom and Continental Europe. A Fortune 100 company,
Dynegy in 2000 established its communications business, Dynegy Global
Communications, which is engaged in providing network solutions and
connectivity to wholesale customers worldwide.

Dynegy has been an active participant in Canadian energy markets since 1994.
With headquarters in Calgary, Alberta, Canada, Dynegy Canada is one of the
country's largest marketers and traders of natural gas, electricity, crude
oil and natural gas liquids.

For further information please contact:
Alberta Watt Exchange Limited
Suite 200
1055 - 20th Avenue NW
Calgary, Alberta, Canada
T2M 1E7
Phone (403) 210-2144 Sheldon Fulton - President

Certain statement included in this news release are intended as
"forward-looking statements" under the Private Securities Litigation Reform
Act of 1995. These statements include assumptions, expectations, prediction,
intentions or beliefs about future events. Dynegy cautions that actual
future results may vary materially from those expressed or implied in any
forward-looking statements. Some of the key factors that could cause actual
results to vary from those Dynegy expects include changes in commodity
prices for energy or communications products or services, the timing and
extent of deregulation of energy markets in the U.S., Canada and Europe;
general capital market conditions; the effectiveness of Dynegy's risk
management policies and procedures; the liquidity and competitiveness of
wholesale trading markets for energy commodities, including the impact of
electronic or online trading in these markets; operational factors affecting
Dynegy's power generation or Dynegy's midstream natural gas facilities;
uncertainties regarding the development of, and competition within, the
market for broadband services in the U.S. and Europe; and uncertainties
regarding environmental regulations or litigation and other legal or
regulatory developments affecting Dynegy's business. Moreover, statements
regarding expected delivery dates of new liquids carriers are subject to
various construction risks that could cause such delivery to be delayed or
prevented, such as a failure to obtain financing or the failure of
third-party contractors or perform their contractual obligations. More
information about the risks and uncertainties relating to these
forward-looking statements are found in Dynegy's SEC filings, which are
available free of charge on the SEC's web site at http://www.sec.gov.
<http://www.sec.gov>
Back to top of page...

i have a pcmcia card and the password is jessi

have an ethernet card?
also -- what was the password again?

Yes

Is this planned maint schedule for 2002?

Sundance 3:	Aug. 16 to Sept. 13
Sundance 4:	Jul. 12 to Aug. 6

Sundance 3: Aug.16 to Sept.13
Sundance 4: July 12 to Aug 6

Sundance 3:	Aug. 16 to Sept. 13
Sundance 4:	Jul. 12 to Aug. 6

Today marks the completion of the 2 week commissioning period for ADMS.
Effective October 26th at 16:00 the System Controllers will no longer follow
up ADMS dispatches with a voice confirmation unless a ADMS message has timed
out because of technical difficulties or the System Controllers have been
notified that a participant is having technical difficulties receiving ADMS
dispatches and directives.

The time out period will be adjusted from the 10 minutes to 5 minutes. We
intend to further reduce the time out to 2 minutes following a reasonable
delay and reassessment based on our operating experience.

We are currently reevaluating the ADMS dispatch procedures with regards to
the Interconnections. Any changes to the Interconnection procedures will be
conveyed to participants well in advance of implementation.

Thanks to all of you for your patience during our implementation of this
valuable new tool.

Sincerely,

Don Adair
Manager, System Coordination Center

Rick & Laura Figueroa
210 Windrift Ct.
Sugarland, TX 77479

Brian & Amy Brewer
11927 Canyon Mills Dr.
Houston, TX 77095

Carrie Grin
3502 Burlington St #3
Houston, TX 77006

Mik Cadena
5610 Island Breeze
Houston, TX 77041

Can't wait to see you guys.  Sorry if I sounded scatter brained when we talked on Wed, I was trying to watch the gas screen and trade at the same time.

Hope all is well.

John

http://www.quantrisk.com/workshop.htm

Gentlemen,

Besides the upcoming workshop we are organizing in Calgary, I would like
to bring to your attention some of the software technologies we are
developing for Energy Risk management in Calgary.

Our technology is Modular (multithreaded C++ DLLs) and can be integrated
into yours with great ease.
More generally, the cost of software development is quite lower in
Canada, I would also like to explore the possibility of outsourcing some
of your development: we have a strong analytics team: 3 PhD in Numerical
and applied math (all of us are well established Profs at the
University), and a software team ...

I have included a document describing our products.

Regards,
ali lari lavassani
--
           Dr Ali Lari-Lavassani,  President and CEO
                QuantRisk.com  (www.quantrisk.com)
Suite 1700, East Tower, Energy Plaza
311, 6th Avenue S.W.				Tel: (403) 714 0746	
Calgary, Alberta, Canada T2P 3H2 		Fax: (403) 714 0404
Download Workshop Information and Registration:  in PDF Format (Requires Adobe 4.0 +)    in Word Format   
[IMAGE]
 - QuantRisk.pdf 

I have no memory of receiving this info.  Can you send me another?

Hi John 
 
The Critical Illness packages were delivered Oct.12 and should be an entire policy in a clear plastic zip bag.  If you can not find the policy at home or around your desk I will gladly request a new policy from Unum.  Unfortunately this is not a generic form, but one that had been preprinted by the Insurance Company.   Let me know...
 
Thanks,
Michelle 

There is nothing in my inbox.  I have no form to sign.  Could you deliver me one please?

 
If you are reading this message, you owe me a form.
 
Critical Illness policies have been distributed for a week and a half.  There is a Premium Notice & Authorization form in each Critical Illness package.  Please sign and return to me immediately to ensure your coverage is not delayed.  All forms need to be sent to me by October 29th, 2001. 

Thanks,

 Michelle Wells

Payroll & Benefits

Phone: (403) 974-6977 
Fax: (403) 974-6985
michelle.wells@enron.com 

 

Gentlemen,

First, my condolences on your stock price.  All I can say is that I
empathize: AES fell 49% in one day a few weeks ago.  I suspect the market
will bounce back for both our companies before very long.

I attach a speadsheet with slightly revised performance numbers, and per
our last conversation, I have added numbers on ramp rates and start times
to help you better model the optionality.  When the forwards improve (as a
developer, I MUST be optimistic!), you can use this updated information to
update your pricing.  I look forward to resuming our discussions.

Regards,

Derek Denniston
Vice President
AES Calgary
o: 415.395.7886
f:  415.395.7891
m: 415.786.3773
ddenniston@aesc.com

 - Tolling Inputs 10-23.xls 

derek can you forward me the e-mail for the management conference?  my e-mail puked and deleted everything in my inbox.

I want to install some reporting measures on position limits and VAR metrics here in Canada.  Can you give Brian Gillis the necessary access so that he can prepare the reports for me.

If you have any questions give me a call ?
John, as we discussed, we need access to the O:/erms/controls/rmsdata/~0RMSDBS97a.ldb database in order to run our VAR metrics model here in Calgary (enabling to report Return on VAR, efficiency ratings etc.)  If you could follow up on this on our behalf that would be great.

FYI - I have attached the last e-mail chain where I made the request.

 

Looking for access, eh?
Database users have gone nuts last few months and even myself, who has access, is being told that I can't run queries I used too.  I'm thinking about putting perf report requirements into a "gooey" so IT can program.

I'll continue prodding Bharat to give you the query, and I'll see what I can do regarding the database?
Frank

Frank, I have no problem cc'ing you on the report - and it is basically the package of info that Bharat sent to us (RoVAR, Efficiency, Sharpe, etc.).  But Rob and John are not seeing any of these stats yet since we don't have access to the database and therefore do not have current information.  Are you the one to authorize the access?

Brian
What stats are Rob and John seeing?  Any chance you can cc me on report?
Frank

Debbie, 

I was wanting to get access to the following database for myself and Chelsea Bardal:

O:/erms/controls/rmsdata/~0RMSDBS97a.ldb

We need this access so that we can query and load the VAR information for the Calgary gas desk by trader.  This information will be used to generate a weekly set of performance measures for Rob Milnthorp, the president of ECC, and John Zufferli, the head of ECC trading.

Please let me know if there will be any problems with this.

Brian

looks neat, maybe needs some other coloured wall paint to personalize it

The guy in some of the shots is the vendor.  The place was kinda messy
yesterday when i visited it, but it'll give you an idea.

Livia

(See attached file: Exterior_optimized.jpg)(See attached file:
Bedroom_2_optimized.jpg)(See attached file: Bedroom_3_optimized.jpg)(See
attached file: Bedroom_optimized.jpg)(See attached file:
Dining-Room_optimized.jpg)(See attached file: Bathroom.jpg)
 - Exterior_optimized.jpg << File: Exterior_optimized.jpg >> 
 - Bedroom_2_optimized.jpg << File: Bedroom_2_optimized.jpg >> 
 - Bedroom_3_optimized.jpg << File: Bedroom_3_optimized.jpg >> 
 - Bedroom_optimized.jpg << File: Bedroom_optimized.jpg >> 
 - Dining-Room_optimized.jpg << File: Dining-Room_optimized.jpg >> 
 - Bathroom.jpg << File: Bathroom.jpg >> 

There is nothing in my inbox.  I have no form to sign.  Could you deliver me one please?

 
If you are reading this message, you owe me a form.
 
Critical Illness policies have been distributed for a week and a half.  There is a Premium Notice & Authorization form in each Critical Illness package.  Please sign and return to me immediately to ensure your coverage is not delayed.  All forms need to be sent to me by October 29th, 2001. 

Thanks,

 Michelle Wells

Payroll & Benefits

Phone: (403) 974-6977 
Fax: (403) 974-6985
michelle.wells@enron.com 

 

Due to the continuing threat of viruses over the Internet, and the constant attacks to your broadband connections, we have made Norton Anti-Virus updates and BlackIce Security software available for use with your Clickathome computer.  You can download the software free of charge through the U.S. ClickAtHome Portal Internet site.  Below are instructions on how to get there.  PLEASE NOTE, the BlackIce software will not work on an Enron-imaged pc or your office pc.

Go to Internet Explorer (version 5.0 or greater), type in the address "clickathome.net", and enter.  Next, click on Create an id and password.  Any name and password you choose will do, as long as it is not a duplicate.  Click on "Remember User Name and Password" for convenience.  

Once you are logged on to the Portal, click on the TOOLS button at the top.  Next, click on the section entitled "Security".  You will see the links to the software.  Once you click on either BlackIce or Norton AntiVirus, you will be given detailed instructions on how to download. 

Please note that the ClickAtHome Portal is U.S. focused, and the benefits and some of the information are for US employees only. Due to the fact that Enron is developing a Global Enterprise-wise Portal, we were not allowed to move forward in completing a Canadian Portal.  Next year, the Global Portal will have information specific to Canadians.

If you have any questions or difficulties, please contact us by email at "clickathomecanada@enron.com".
 

Here's the newest generation....
Apols I was not able to get to this on Friday Dawn.

Yes, we do have a new trading game, link below, essentially you can play with up to 10 people and they play against each other.  Go and have a go!

http://xgame.corp.enron.com

Sophie

I never wrote nor implied that I was intending to hedge currency exposure with a third party.  I implied that I will hedge with you guys when and where I deem appropriate in the term structure.

John, 

I don't have all the facts around this transaction, but I don't think you are authorized to hedge currency exposure with outside counterparties as you've outlined in your email to Hickerson, etc.  I'd appreciate some information.

Jeff

You will violate Enron policy if you do that.

Gary

Given the volatility in the gas market (which is the sole impact on the Canadian power book's US dollar exposure) and the exhorbitant cost involved in hedging multi-year cashflows (i.e. as evidenced by Friday 10/19/2001 trade of -$1,200,000 Cdn new deal value for the 14 year swap that I entered into), I will manage the currency exposure of this book myself, I will hedge appropriately when I see fit and will not accept hedges forced on Enron Canada because of arbitrary position limits set by your department.

John Zufferli

Since Alberta Power trades 15 times/day and East and West power trade in excess of 1000 times/day, I believe that a 10% allocation for my desk is inappropriate.  I would be willing to settle for 5% and I believe that this is more that generation/

Given the volatility in the gas market (which is the sole impact on the Canadian power book's US dollar exposure) and the exhorbitant cost involved in hedging multi-year cashflows (i.e. as evidenced by Friday 10/19/2001 trade of -$1,200,000 Cdn new deal value for the 14 year swap that I entered into), I will manage the currency exposure of this book myself, I will hedge appropriately when I see fit and will not accept hedges forced on Enron Canada because of arbitrary position limits set by your department.

John Zufferli

Once again , the EOL report is ignoring the new customer list that I have given twice now.  They seem to insist that the the Canadian subs that are now tradinig Alberta power that have traded other products on EOL are not new customers. I have all but given up on this issue.

In terms on of # of trades/day for Alberta Power, the numbers for Aug and Sep are low:

August is 24 trades/day not 22 trades/day
Sep is 13 trades/day not 8 trades/day

I will check the gas info later

Gentlemen, you have recently received hard copies of the 3rd quarter soft targets.  Attached for your reference are the electronic versions of the soft targets.

Paul, your hard copies will arrive on Monday.

Regards, Nella

 << File: Q3SoftTargets.xls >>  << File: 3Q Orig Detail.xls >>  << File: 3Q Counterparty Detail.xls >> 

 << File: MidMkt.Orig2000 vs. 2001a.xls >>  << File: EOL 2000 vs. 2001 Sep.xls >>  << File: New Counterparties.xls >> 

Can you spend time with your replacement before you leave? I'll let you know on Monday who that will be.  

Good luck in your future endeavours, it is sad to see you go.

John,
This note is to officially announce that I will not sign the contract with UBS. I feel it is time for me to start something new and a great opportunity was presented to me in  Montreal. I want to thank you for everything you and this company did for me. I sincerely wish you all the success you deserve in this new adventure.

After having talked to Dawn, I will be in the office until Thursday Feb-21. It was understood that I will be paid for any unused vacation days.

Once again, thank you for your support and good luck with UBS!

Yours Truly,

Stephane Brodeur

Where is my preliminary P&L for Oct 16?

I plan to attend

 
It is apparent that the recent September 11th terrorist attacks in the United States has caused havoc in the airline industry with cancelled flights and the rescheduling of numerous flights.  In this regard, I am now looking into chartering a flight from Calgary to San Antonio (and back to Calgary, of course) for the staff invited to the management conference in November.  Could you kindly confirm whether you will be attending the management conference in San Antonio in order that I may provide this information to the airline charter companies with respect to selecting the appropriate sized aircraft.  
 
Paul, I am not sure if you would like to join the individuals travelling from Calgary or if you would prefer to fly directly from Toronto.  Please let me know your thoughts on this.

Regards, Nella 

PS:  I would suggest that anyone who has already booked their flights to cancel same. 

Looks ok to me from the trading side
Gentlemen, attached are the recent Enron Americas Management Summary Reports and Hot List for your review.

Regards, Nella

Please find attached the final Management Summary and Hot List for 3rd quarter.

Thanks
Misti
x39525

 << File: MgmtSum-3Q_2001_0928-FINAL.xls >>  << File: Hot List 0928.xls >> 

I agree, I feel the same.  It feels like we are getting left behind.
John, I need you to give some thought to us intervening, from a competition law standpoint on:
1) Westcoast/Duke Merger (b.c. trading implications)
2) TCGS/Mirant Transaction (market power implications - control of ~8bcf/d supply)

It might be worthwhile for you, me, lambie, hemstock, and keohane to discuss. 

Unfortunately, the timing does not work for me
Hey John, I sent you a letter last week in regards to TD Capital Private
Equity putting on a presentation this Thursday 10/18/2001 at 12 noon.
This is a limited partnership strategy which invests in a portfolio of
leading North American and European venture capital, leveraged buyout
and industry-specialized funds.
I think you would be interested in attending.
Please RSVP to the letter or myself.

Thanks, Mike.

I don't have the P&L summary with post ID's for my gas books as of 10/12

An update from the ADaMS implementation team...

Last week was quite hectic with training and last minute fixes. My thanks to
all of you for your patience and participation and apologies for some
appointments missed.

1. This afternoon we implemented the System Controller portion of the AdAMS
software. All real dispatches will continue 'voice only' until this Thursday
at 14:00.

2. Our development/ test  system will be available until Thursday afternoon
for training dispatches. Al Gulutzan (403-233-4685) is in charge of
participant training.

3. On Thursday at 14:00, we will enable the Participant portion of the ADaMS
software. We expect that you have your people logged in and we'll begin the
parallel operation period where all dispatches will be sent electronically
and will be accompanied by voice dispatch. This period is expected to last 2
weeks. We fully expect that some participants will need longer than 2 weeks
and some will need less.

4. Please advise by return-email if you do not wish to be on this
distribution list or if you want someone else to be on the list

Jerry Mossing

Also, instead of sending me the P&L via e-mail, arrange to have someone here to put the P&L and new deal reports on my desk as usual.

Thanks
Please find attached the file containing the P&L for Oct 9.

 << File: pwrdpr.xls >> 

Also, where are my gas reports
Please find attached the file containing the P&L for Oct 9.

 << File: pwrdpr.xls >> 

Also, instead of sending me the P&L via e-mail, arrange to have someone here to put the P&L and new deal reports on my desk as usual.

Thanks
Please find attached the file containing the P&L for Oct 9.

 << File: pwrdpr.xls >> 

can you make it more official looking, ideally a fax, signed by you, no worries, there is no liability

Dec 19 marks for small volume  
 - Book2.xls << File: Book2.xls >> 

The currency P&L is missing from the preliminary again.  We shouldn't post P&L to the executive management reports with missing components.

Please find attached the file containing the P&L for Oct 9.

 << File: pwrdpr.xls >> 

BTW, I think I have a bye on this video.

sorry guys - I didnt really read this the first time. I thought it was regarding the video for the management conference (which they also are short volunteers for). Please disregard and I will find out what the attached is about.

Sorry for the confusion, rob. 

Guys - any volunteers or should we "draw straws"

We have unsuccessfully attempted to find sponsors for the project list you gave to me in our meeting.  I would therefore like to start the game again but starting from zero and working our way up. Assuming we are starting with no budget for IT development, please could you sit down with each of our Business Sponsors and agree a number with them.  They are:

Tim Belden (or his appointed person) for West Power
Lloyd Will for East Power
Geof Storey for Gas 
Laura Luce for Peoples and Global Net
Chris Gaskill for Gas Fundys
Rob Milnthorp (or his appointed person) for Canada.
Mark Haedicke/Greenberg (or his appointed person) for Legal.

Each of the above will be allocated their charge for IT development and capital (apart from Geof who will allocate across the desks) and therefore is the best person/people to decide on the costs.  Please could you arrange a short meeting/discussion with each and agree a budget as the process so far is not working.

I am assuming its zero at the moment.

Thanks

Louise

I am not sure what New Start is? Any details?

Guys - any volunteers or should we "draw straws"

We have unsuccessfully attempted to find sponsors for the project list you gave to me in our meeting.  I would therefore like to start the game again but starting from zero and working our way up. Assuming we are starting with no budget for IT development, please could you sit down with each of our Business Sponsors and agree a number with them.  They are:

Tim Belden (or his appointed person) for West Power
Lloyd Will for East Power
Geof Storey for Gas 
Laura Luce for Peoples and Global Net
Chris Gaskill for Gas Fundys
Rob Milnthorp (or his appointed person) for Canada.
Mark Haedicke/Greenberg (or his appointed person) for Legal.

Each of the above will be allocated their charge for IT development and capital (apart from Geof who will allocate across the desks) and therefore is the best person/people to decide on the costs.  Please could you arrange a short meeting/discussion with each and agree a budget as the process so far is not working.

I am assuming its zero at the moment.

Thanks

Louise

What is the asking price of this vehicle?

Hey Jim and Greg, Jessica and I sent a card to Chris's wife asking about his well-being and this is the unfornate response.

 Sent: Friday, October 05, 2001 3:04 PM

This is correct, except that a significant portion of his cost should be reapplied to Enron Direct

I am just wanting to confirm information I received from Tricia Henry earlier this week -  that Sean Lalani should be getting charged to Cost Center 107083 - Power Trading.

To date he has been costed to 150156 - Power Originations.

Please advise whether it is correct to reclass all previous transactions to 107083.

Thanks
Kate Panchuk
Enron Canada Corp
Ph: (403) 974 6798

Dear ClickAtHome Participant,

ClickAtHome is interested in making sure you have the latest security tools available to you.  As part of the ClickAtHome program, you may download and update Norton Anti-Virus and BlackICE Defender software from the ClickAtHome Portal.  

Norton AntiVirus software repairs computer virus infections automatically.  It scans and cleans your hard drive, diskettes and both incoming and outgoing email.  
BlackICE Defender is an industrial-strength anti-hacker system that protects your PC by scanning your DSL, cable modem, or dial-up Internet connection looking for hacker activity. When it detects an attempted intrusion, it automatically blocks traffic from that source, keeping intruders from accessing your system. 
By installing and updating both Norton AntiVirus and BlackICE Defender, your ClickAtHome PC will have the latest security offered by these two products.  
Instructions for accessing the Portal and downloading the software are provided below.
If you have any questions or wish to provide feedback, please email clickathome@enron.com.  Thank you for your participation in ClickAtHome.
The ClickAtHome Team!
__________________________________
To download the software:
1)  Visit the ClickAtHome Portal at www.clickathome.net from your ClickAtHome PC.
2)  Logon to the Portal with your personally created Portal User ID and Password, or create a new account if you have not created a user ID and password by selecting "Create a NEW Account" at the top left corner.  The Portal User IDs and Passwords are created by you.  The Enron Help Desk is not able to assist with Portal support, but if you need any assistance, please send an email to "clickathome@enron.com".
3) Once you have logged on, select "Tools" from the top menu bar.
4) Under the "Secure Download" heading, click on "BlackICE" or "Norton" and log on to the download page using your SAP ID and Date of Birth.
5) Follow the directions provided on screen.

That is the Saturday after the management conference in San Antonio, I was =
planning to stay down there for the US thanksgiving.  So tentatively, I won=
't be there

Conference is Nov 14-16

Reminder, tomorrow is the deadline to RSVP to the Company Christmas Party.

 << File: Invitation.doc >>  << File: Invitation Form.doc >>=20

Angela McCulloch

YES

John and Chris, Rob would like to meet with you both to further discuss the issues relating to ECC's wholesale offer to Enron Direct.  I have scheduled this meeting on Tuesday, October 9th at 2:00 pm in Rob's office.  Does this date and time work for you both?

Regards, Nella

Guys - I understand that you met with Cross et al to discuss wholesale offers to retail. My original position on the matter has not changed. That is, the wholesale desks need to show a wholesale offer to retail. In other words, the offer shown to our retail affiliate, at a minimum, should equal the offer that would be shown in our wholesale business (either through EOL, brokers or the offer given to originators for wholesale customer deals). 

There has been a great deal of discussion with respect to the margins retail is adding to the wholesale offer. From a wholesale perspective, this is irrelevant. The retail business requires large margins due to its nature - small vol, high credit, commission, call centre, invoicing, etc. 

The retail margin only becomes relevant if prices need to be tighter. In those particular cases, both parties need to work together to make sure that our price is ultimately competitive. This may involve one or both parties reducing their imbedded margins and/or offer. 

I am looking to the two of you to help build the retail business. Your leadership and assistance are crititcal to the success of the retail initiative. Without your cooperation, the business is dead. You are both in a position of power to make or break the retail business in Canada. It is very clear that EES Houston is relying heavily on Lavo and his folks to push forward the retail business in the US - it seems to be working. We need to ensure that we are doing the same. I can guarantee you that your efforts will not go unnoticed. 

I understand that sharing the margin was discussed as an option. This option will not work. From an external perspective, it is imperative that Enron demonstrate its retail capabilities as well as retail earnings. If a portion of retail margin remains in wholesale, it does nothing for expanding the stock multiple. I am convinced that the key lever to expanding our stock multiple lies with retail and therefore retail earnings.

If you have any questions or concerns, I would be happy to discuss this further - at the end of the day, it is imperative that we are all on the same page. 

Regards
Rob

The import/export units are fine, here is the SD3 SD4 info

 - EnronCanada_ENBC.doc << File: EnronCanada_ENBC.doc >> 
 - EnronCanada_ENE1.doc << File: EnronCanada_ENE1.doc >> 
 - EnronCanada_ENE2.doc << File: EnronCanada_ENE2.doc >> 
 - EnronCanada_ENSK.doc << File: EnronCanada_ENSK.doc >> 
   

Frank, I forgot about Lon Draper and the options, here is an update.

 

I'll call him, I have to arrange to be there when he can come since it requires me to lift the TV with him.

He called this morning to arrange a time to deliver  that last piece.  I copied down the number but does not seem to be  correct.  I have 713-8914.  I can't find the card with his number on  the back.  Do you have it?  If so, I can call and schedule with  him.
 
love, jess

Take the TransCanada Hwy 1 west to Calgary.  This becomes 16 Ave N in the city.

Take Highway 2 south (Deerfoot) when you get in the city.

When you come to the Deerfoot/Glenmore intersection take Glenmore Trail East.

On Glenmore, you'll pass under Macleod Trail (there is a big mall Chinook centre on your right), you'll pass over the Glenmore reservoir.

When you get to Glenmore and 37 st get in the inside lane of Glenmore.  After 45 st, Glenmore will split in 2, stay in the inside (i.e. leftmost lanes).

This fork will lead you to a stop light where you turn left onto Highway 8 Bragg Creek.

On highway 8 you will pass 69st, after the light get in the outside lane and take your next right on Lower Springbank Rd.  At the the stop sign turn left onto Lower Springbank, you should now be going parallel to Highway 8.  After 85 st and before 101st there is a gravel entrance road on your right, take this road, it is 100 feet long and leads to Slopeview Dr, turn left when the gravel road joins the pavement and go to 133 Slopeview Dr.

Please provide directions.  Thanks - Jess
> Hi Guys,
>
> How are you feeling Jess?  Guess what -- I had a dream last night that I
> was 7 months pregnant!! It was so weird -- it totally felt real.  My
> parents didn't know, and they were coming up for a visit so I was trying
to
> hide it with a baggy sweater!  Suffice it to say, when i woke up this
> morning, I reached for my belly and was very happy to see it quasi-flat.
>
> Anyway, I was wondering if you or John could send me directions of how to
> get to your house.  My friend Josh will be driving in from Saskatoon on
the
> Friday afternoon.  I'm clueless as to which highways to take -- I'm sure
he
> can find his way to Calgary, but may just need to get around the city.
>
> Thnx.  I'll call you guys before i leave for Calgary on Wednesday.  I'm
> pretty nervous to fly -- but i'll be more nervous on the way back because
> I'll be alone (my colleagues are going back on Thursday).
>
> talk to you soon,
> lee
>

I don't have time to go to your office, you have to come here.  I am in the process of setting curves between 3 and 4. I never know when I am done since I am dependent on Houston currency and gas curves.  So if you could be here at 4 that would be good.

Would like to grab an hour to discuss different go-forward EDCC/ECC pricing scenarios.

Just get with me when you are in
John,
I don't disagree with any of the comments you made in my performance review, but would still like to meet with you. I'd like to discuss some stuff relating to career development, how I can improve, some learning objectives, etc. Can we set aside a half hour sometime this week or early next week? Please e-mail me the times that would work best for you.
-Tyler

Not material so don't do anything.

ESBI have reduced the MCR on SD3 & 4 for use in the RGUCC charge.  Accordingly, the charge reduces from $274060 to $272,670 in total.  Do you want us to change this in EnPower for 
the rest of the year ?
the remainder of the PPA term
or not at all ?

Let me know what you think

Mark

When is the interview date at Wilfred Laurier, Guelph and Waterloo?

Can they all be put on at the same time, either on or off-campus?

Do you still have the forms for the 4 hourly people (Tyler, John, Mike, Murray). I tried to go into the PEP and get them but it is closed.

My understanding (from HR in Houston) is that Lavo has asked for a list of outstanding reviews.  There's still a chance to slip under the radar if you get your outstanding reviews to me by tomorrow!

Thanks.....

John,

I would like to talk to you about this EES-Canada position we have.  I have attached the spreadsheet which outlines the Retail Transaction and the hedge position.   My thought is that we should be handling this position out of the Calgary office, I am working on booking of this transaction in a system where we can value it, as it stands right now we have it in an excel spreadsheet.

I will give you a call sometime later this morning.

Thanks,
Jeff Richter

503-464-5101

 

one of you guys should go to this

September 25, 2001

The ESBI Alberta Ltd.(EAL) would like to invite you to a presentation of the
results from the Powertech study to be held at EAL's offices from 2:00 pm to
4:00 pm on Tuesday October 9, 2001..  EAL commissioned Powertech Labs of
Vancouver earlier this year to carry out studies to derive Total Transfer
Capabilities (TTC) for both imports and exports across the AB-BC
interconnection.  These studies have now been completed and work is underway
to revise existing operating policies (ie.  Specifically OP-333 and OP-328).
The studies confirm that there is an increase in export capability from
additional generation in the Calgary area.

This presentation will focus on the technical results of the Powertech
studies and the impact on TTC for the AB-BC interconnection.  To make the
most of this meeting, please give some consideration to questions of
clarification around TTC you may require.  Please confirm your attendance at
this meeting with Debbie Nering at (403)-705-5210 or e-mail at
debbie.nering@eal.ab.ca <mailto:debbie.nering@eal.ab.ca>  no later than
Thursday October 4, 2001.

Yours truly,
TRANSMISSION ADMINISTRATOR OF ALBERTA

Katie Johnson
Commercial and Regulation
ESBI Alberta Ltd.

To my knowledge we are not building a power plant in Ontario.  I have been meaning to give you a call.  I will try sometime this week.

Talk to you later
Zuf:

How's things in canuckland?

I heard through the grapevine a little zuf will be in calgary soon!

congrats to you and jess.  exciting news.

do you know anything about an enron power plant being built in ontario?

my brother scott wants to find out where & when- he is in the plumbing biz
and wants to see if he can get on a contract with them?

Do you have any thoughts on how he could find out details?

give me a call sometime. 206-399-4597-cellular.  give jess a big kiss for
me!

in hoc,

pb smith :)

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com/intl.asp

Sorry for the delay, I had to do it twice since excell blew up on me and I didn't save it.

I hope that this is comprehensive enough. 

My fax is 403-974-6706

Hard copy only. I will have Christina follow up with you to get a fax number and she will send you the document.
 
SRM
 
I received a spreadsheet from Richter but do you have any contract documentation? 

ok
It would probably make sense to have all operational correspondence sent to me.

Thanks

Mark

This is operational stuff I received from the Power Pool.  

I seem to be receiving a lot of this kind of stuff and I think it is now appropriate for Enron to change our designated contact person with the Power Pool from me to someone who is more operationally focused.  Please let me know who you want to do that and I will advise the Power Pool of the change. 

Please see attached documents.  Thank you.

 <<EnronCanada_ENBC.doc>>  <<EnronCanada_ENE1.doc>>
<<EnronCanada_ENE2.doc>>  <<EnronCanada_ENSK.doc>>
<<EnronCanadaCorp_SD3.doc>>  <<EnronCanadaCorp_SD4.doc>>

 <<ADAMS Cover Letter 2.doc>>  <<ADAMS POP 102 Draft1.doc>>  <<ADAMS POP 404
Draft1.doc>>

Quen Tan
Participant Services Rep.
Phone:  (403) 538-3434
e-mail:  quen.tan@powerpool.ab.ca

 - EnronCanada_ENBC.doc << File: EnronCanada_ENBC.doc >> 
 - EnronCanada_ENE1.doc << File: EnronCanada_ENE1.doc >> 
 - EnronCanada_ENE2.doc << File: EnronCanada_ENE2.doc >> 
 - EnronCanada_ENSK.doc << File: EnronCanada_ENSK.doc >> 
 - EnronCanadaCorp_SD3.doc << File: EnronCanadaCorp_SD3.doc >> 
 - EnronCanadaCorp_SD4.doc << File: EnronCanadaCorp_SD4.doc >> 
 - ADAMS Cover Letter 2.doc << File: ADAMS Cover Letter 2.doc >> 
 - ADAMS POP 102 Draft1.doc << File: ADAMS POP 102 Draft1.doc >> 
 - ADAMS POP 404 Draft1.doc << File: ADAMS POP 404 Draft1.doc >> 

Assume that the interview was final round

What did you have in mind, John?  (3 hours??)  I was thinking that he should go through the same interviews as the other candidates.  Any thoughts?

Dawn,

In addition to my prior e-mail, I have already had an interview with John Zufferli, John Disturnal, Mike Cowan, and Chris Lambie on September 13, 2001.  The interview lasted for 3 hours!  I have not heard back from any of them yet.  Just wondering, would that then be considered as my first round of interview, or would that be already my "Super Thursday (Saturday)"?

I would also like to thank you for putting me as one of the potential candidates.  I have attached a copy of my updated resume and a copy of my online academic record.  My GPA is back to where I used to be, around the 3.3 range.  Let me know if you would like me to fax in a transcript to you as well.

If you would like more information, please don't hesitate call me at 605.7568 (cell) or e-mail me at school vbleung@ucalgary.ca.

Have a wonderful week ahead!

Victor Leung
Enron Canada Corp.
3500 Canterra Tower
400 - 3rd Avenue SW
Calgary, Alberta
Canada T2P 4H2

Main: 403.974.6700
Direct: 403.974.6947
Fax: 403.974.6706
 << File: Resume.PDF >>  << File: Transcript.pdf >> 

I received a spreadsheet from Richter but do you have any contract documentation?

This was pretty amazing.  It has sound too so if you have it on your
computer...

>
>

Return-Path: <diane.korach@verizon.net>
Received: from  rly-xb01.mx.aol.com (rly-xb01.mail.aol.com [172.20.105.102]=
) by air-xb03.mail.aol.com (v80.17) with ESMTP id MAILINXB35-0919205809; We=
d, 19 Sep 2001 20:58:09 -0400
Received: from  smtp007pub.verizon.net (smtp007pub.verizon.net [206.46.170.=
186]) by rly-xb01.mx.aol.com (v80.21) with ESMTP id MAILRELAYINXB19-0919205=
011; Wed, 19 Sep 2001 20:50:11 -0400
Received: from verizon.net (pool-162-83-168-56.ny5030.east.verizon.net [162=
.83.168.56])=09by smtp007pub.verizon.net  with ESMTP=09; id f8K0n2j25889=09=
Wed, 19 Sep 2001 19:49:05 -0500 (CDT)

I know it's getting tough with all the forwards, but I really thought
you might be moved by this.  I certainly was.

Love,
Diane

Return-Path: <shstack@yahoo.com>
Received: from web11505.mail.yahoo.com ([216.136.172.37])          by mp001=
.verizon.net (InterMail vM.4.01.03.00 201-229-121)          with SMTP      =
    id <20010919222844.EOOZ12984.mp001.verizon.net@web11505.mail.yahoo.com>=
          for <diane.korach@verizon.net>; Wed, 19 Sep 2001 17:28:44 -0500

http://home.earthlink.net/~hankinhsd/thankyou.htm

finally, pictures that don't show destruction

It's good to know that we are thought of around the world!

__________________________________________________
Terrorist Attacks on U.S. - How can you help?
Donate cash, emergency relief information
http://dailynews.yahoo.com/fc/US/Emergency_Information/

 
Further to Ken Lay's announcement this morning, Enron Canada will also match 2 for 1 all donations made to relief organizations in response to the United States disaster.  Please use the attached form to enable us to track and match your donations.  Forward to Megan Scott for processing.

<<Matching Gift Form.doc>> 
Here is the Canadian Red Cross website for donation information.  

<http://www.redcross.ca/index_english.html> 

Thank you. 

As most of you already know I am leaving Enron after five years to go to Harvard MBA School.  My times at Enron have been beyond the expectations that I had when I stepped into trading hourly power at odd hours of the night  when  I first became an Enron analyst.  Since the very beginning, Enron has given me the chance to demonstrate my talents and the chance to prove myself.  No other company would have given those chances at such a young age.  I like to think that I repaid the favor to at least some degree and am leaving Enron a little stronger than it would have otherwise been.  

Even though I contemplated several other opportunities to leave over the last five years, I never left for another company.  I came to realize that the people that work here are the best, and I have always strived to be among the best.  Aside from the professional skills and energy, the people here have become good friends of mine.   Enron is among the best corporations in the world because of the high quality of people that we have attracted over the years.

Special thanks to Jim Fallon, Jeff Golden, Mark Muller, Dave Delainey, Kevin Presto, and Rogers Herndon, all of  whom have provided me direction and excellent leadership during my time here.

Please find my forwarding email address, phone numbers, and address.  If any of you need anything or come to Boston please look me up, I will always buy the first beer!  Good luck to you all.

Your friend,

John

John Berger
520 Beacon Apt. 2F
Boston, MA 02115

617-424-7141 HM
713-417-3548 Cell
wberger@mba2003.hbs.edu

I don't remember my userid and password for the e-mail 4-life

I have got my page set-up in excel to print all the info.  The info is there.  I just don't think that Kim has her excel page setup to print the info (I assume she is the one printing it out for you).  Do you want me to call her?

john

this isn't rocket science.  can you put 10 or 20 analysts on trying to get the aeco basis trades to print on the same page.

 << File: HedgeSummary.xls >> 

TransAlta

Business Contact:	Chris MacDowall	phone: (403) 267-6949
						phone: (403) 267-6905

Stephane Brodeur should be removed from the list.
I am not sure about Chris Lambie, whether he is joining the company.
Garrett Trip should be added as the Ontario Power trader (that market won't open until May 2002)

John,

Please review the list below and let me know if there are any changes for Stack Manager access.

Ryan Watt	RWATT	AECO Cash Trader	
Mike Cowan	MCOWAN	AECO Cash Trader	
Chris Lambie	CLAMBIE	AECO Term Trader	
Stephane Brodeur	SBRODEUR	BC Cash Trader	
Chad Clark	CCLARK5	BC Cash Trader	
Chris Dorland	CDORLAN	BC Term Trader	
Lon Draper	LDRAPER	Options Trader	
Cooper Richey	CRICHEY	Power Trader	
John Zufferli	JZUFFER	VP-Canada Trading	

Thank you,

Stephanie Sever
EnronOnline
713-853-3465

John Lavorato asked me to contact you regarding any and all info you have on the Owens Corning transaction in Alberta.  

Please return my call at 403-974-6749

Have you reviewed that ladies resume that I gave you 2 weeks ago?

If so what do you think?

Corporately, we are not allowed to trade currency outside of Houston.  In the same way, we can't make markets on other traders' markets.  If EOL has enough products in currency, we may be able to post our numbers on the screen inside of the Houston currency traders' two-ways.  I am unsure if we are even allowed to do this.

Hi John,

I am interested in started a currency trading desk in this office. The ultimate goals of this would include providing tighter two-ways for our traders as well as improving our bottom line.   This would open up opportunity for investing in money markets outside of Canada and the US.   The Swiss Franc rose 5.5% versus the US dollar last week and I think that we are currently missing out on excellent opportunities to increase our income.  I think I could make money at currency trading, and this area shouldn't be overlooked. I understand that a substantial amount of preparation is required before this could happen.  Let me know whether or not you think this may be feasible and we can take it from there.

Thanks,
Ian 

This is pretty amazing.

Peter, click on link at bottom of message.

Scott Negraiff
Macleod Dixon
(403) 267-8175

How big were the World Trade Center towers?  Click here for comparison to Calgary skyline:
                http://www.alpinenine.com/wtc
 

This letter is good , just get Sharon to give me a copy to sign.

Attached is draft letter to Power Pool:

 << File: Ltr.Power Pool re Sundance 3 and 4 dispatch.doc >> 

As most of you know, American Airlines Flight 11 from Boston to Los Angeles was hijacked yesterday and then crashed into the north tower of the World Trade Center in New York.  We are very sorry to report that we believe an Enron employee was on board that flight.   Nick Humber, a director in Enron Wind's commercial origination group, was listed on the flight's manifest, and although his family has not received official confirmation that he boarded the flight, they have been unable to contact him.  Nick was based in Boston and was traveling to Los Angeles for a meeting.  We have talked with Nick's family and offered our full support.  Please continue to keep Nick's family and everyone affected by this horrific event in your thoughts and prayers.

I traditionally send them on Tues morning.  I will send it tomorrow.

Please send John's report today.

Becky Young
x30622

This is my uncle David in Monterrey.  I thought Cooper might find this
interesting.  My dad sent it to me.

love, jess
> Does this look like a hobby I would enjoy?

 - david on spitzkoppe2.JPG 

Can you grant Chris Dorland all requested access for EOL trading.

John Zufferli

Just replace me with you

They have you listed as golfing tomorrow

Open the attachment if you are golfing in Banff.

(See attached file: APMA meeting sept 7 golf.xls)
 - APMA meeting sept 7 golf.xls << File: APMA meeting sept 7 golf.xls >> 

that was our plan but I am not sure whether UBS has the proper Canadian corporate structure to allow to do that yet

John,

Can you confirm whether or not you guys had planned to launch physical gas from day 1?

Dave

I have forwarded you e-mail to John Zufferli.  I don't know who in Canada had input into the Cdn. Operations timetable but I would have thought we would have wanted some physical day 1.  We have 5 of  8 traders here who are very, very, physical in what they have typically traded.  Hopefully John can give you some further insight.

Chris.

Chris,

Do you guys want to trade physical gas (and power?) from day 1?

If so, I note that Cdn. Operations timetable identifies this as a post day 1 item, as they think physical trades will not start until later.

Dave

i will attend

This is a friendly reminder that a representative of Financial Dynamics will be attending our office on Monday, September 10th at noon Calgary time (lunch will be provided), 2:00 pm Toronto time, to give a presentation on financial structures, innovative solutions to tax, retirement and other financial planning issues.

Kindly confirm/reconfirm your attendance in order that I may make the appropriate arrangements for this presentation. 

Regards, Nella 

PS:  The Toronto office will be video conferenced in if Aleck, Paul or Chris are interested in participating.

Alberta Power Markets Association (APMA),  Banff Meeting, September 7, 2001

Location:
Rocky Mountain Resort, Banff
Summit Room (Main Building)

Agenda:
9:00      Coffee
9:30      Opening remarks
10:00     Discussion of the Alberta Power Market with the Minister of
Energy, Murray Smith
11:30     Move to Banff Springs Club House
11:45     Lunch (optional)
12:40     First Tee Time

Note about the meeting:
Our suggestion regarding the tone of this meeting is to forge a stronger
relationship between the market (the members of the APMA) and the
Government (the Honorable Minister of Energy Murray Smith).  The meeting
has been positioned with the minister's office as a discussion forum around
certain key fundamental topics (see points 1 to 4 below)

If you would like to discuss other topics that interest your company please
feel free to air these issues in the discussion.

We are suggesting that everything discussed in this form is held "off the
record"

Directions:
From Calgary, follow the Trans Canada Highway West to the first Banff exit
(Banff/Lake Minnewanka sign).
Turn left onto Banff Avenue and proceed towards downtown Banff.
The Banff Rocky Mountain Resort is the first hotel on the left, at the
corner of Banff Avenue and Tunnel Mountain Road.

Business casual or golf attire

Potential subjects, as relayed to the minister's office:

1. What is the Government planning to do with the Electricity market?

Over the past 12 months intervention by the government and governmental
agencies drastically affected the market for electricity.  These actions
caused dramatic sudden changes in forward market prices.  The APMA members
are concerned that this behavior (often given the idiom 'reactionary
regulation') will persist.

2. What is the Governments view on transmission lines to the US markets?

The prospect of transmission lines that would directly connect the Alberta
market with US market is an interesting subject to most power marketers.
What is the current position of the government on the how the building,
owning and marketing of these hypothetical transmission lines would work in
the new market?

3. What is the government planning to with the remaining unsold PPA?

Last years decision by the Balancing Pool to sell energy from the unsold
Power Purchase Arrangements in a single auction dramatically affected the
forward market for electricity.  With the balancing pool still the
custodian of the unsold PPAs ? What is the plan going forward for the
release of the unsold PPAs into the market.

(Embedded image moved to file: pic10607.pcx)

(Embedded image moved to file: pic03278.pcx)
 - pic10607.pcx 
 - pic03278.pcx 

For the trading group, not including back-office staff .....

V.P.		1 - John Zufferli	
Director		3 - Mike Cowan, John Disturnal, Chris Lambie
Manager	1 - Bill Greenizan
Associate	2 - Cooper Richey, Rob Downer ( probably Chad Clark and Stephan Brodeur)
Analyst		7 - Ryan Watt, Lon Draper, Fabian Taylor, Ian Cooke, Carlos Torres, Chad Clark, Stephan Brodeur
Non-Commercal	4 - Murray Fichten, Mike Taylor, Tyler Seminuk, John Messenger

We probably need two more analysts

Not sure if you have seen this or not, but I thought it was cute.....

 On July 26, 2000, two friends, Jim and John, each received a $1000 bonus
 at work.
 (They both work for Nortel Networks, where in the summer of 2000, there
 was LOTS of money around for bonuses). Jim, being an intelligent,
 financially conscientious person, put the whole $1000 into Nortel
Networks stock. With his $1000, and the transaction cost of
 $35, he was able to purchase 7 shares at $123 each. Having watched the
 Nortel stock climb and climb, he felt very good about this investment,
 happy that he is preparing for the future.

 John, being a more care-free sort, did something slightly different with
 his $1000. John borrowed a friend's truck, and proceeded to the
  Beer Store, where he purchased 33 cases of beer. John also felt very
good about his investment: 33 cases x 24 = is 792 bottles of beer! John,
also
 being an intelligent guy, although perhaps not as forward-thinking as
Jim, calculated that he could drink about 15 bottles per week, and he
wouldn't
 have to buy beer for a whole year.

 Jim, of course, was appalled by John's purchase, and berated him
 constantly about it. As months went by, Jim excitedly watched the
 stock prices, and saw it start to dwindle. "It'll go back up", he'd say
to Jim.  Jim, who has been reaping the benefits of his investment
on a daily basis, would reply, "Ya, it will.  Hang in there buddy "burp".

 Months went by, and the value of the stock continued to fall, and there
 was the beginnings of a noticeable dent in the beer pile. Midwinter came,
 Jim's stock had fallen to about half of it's original value, and John's
 beer was about half gone. Jim, being sure that the
 stock had hit rock-bottom, still was berating John for his frivolous
 purchase, telling him "Your beer will be gone in six months! Who knows
 what my stock will be worth!!".

 Well, summer has come, and hard times at Nortel continue. Bad news: Both
 John and Jim have been affected by the layoffs.  Last week, in order to
 raise some cash to help through the rough time, Jim sold his 7 shares, at
 that day's value of $12, and got $84, then after paying the $35
 transaction fee, he only had $49.

 Jim stopped by John's house later that day (everyone needs their friend's
 during rough times), and as luck would have it, there were
 two bottles of John's beer left. John, being a good, compassionate
friend, offered to share his last two bottles of beer with his friend.
 Jim appreciated the gesture, and enjoyed the cold beer on the hot
summer's day, but he felt a bit guilty.

 "At least I got fifty bucks back out of it - you have nothing now.", he
 said. "That's ok.", replied John.  "Perhaps you can help me, I need to
 return all these empties.", he added as his other friend with the truck
 pulled in. So, they loaded up the truck, and proceeded off to the beer
 store.

 Upon arrival at the beer store, they unloaded the empties, feeling a
 little grim. John went to the counter, and collected his refund for the
 bottles. "33 cases x 24 bottles, at 10 cents per bottle, that comes to
 $79.20", the friendly Beer Store clerk said to John as he handed him the
 money. Jim was speechless. Poor guy. Can you imagine  how you would feel
 if you just discovered that over the course of the
 last year, your $1000 stock investment left you with $50, and taking same
 $1000, buying beer, and drinking it, would leave you with $80. I'll leave
 it up to the reader to come up with they're own "moral to the story".

http://www.canadatrader.com/trader/result/affich.asp?sid=61XYHJQ2200250&rubno=4000&pa=17&pr=5

This afternoon is busy for Derek and I but we should be able to squeeze in a few minutes

Gentlemen, as you may be aware, we are looking at replacing the old desking furniture from Smed with new Smed trading desks.  The new desking system will allow us to add more people in your area.  Do you have time this afternoon to review and discuss a new floor plan using the new trading desks ?  

Regards, Nella

I talked to Milly yesterday, he was ok with the concept of covering the 1 month salary.  I talked to Trish and the easiest/non-tax affected way to handle it is to submit expense forms.  The problem is if you sell the car at a loss, then the loss compensation is tax deductible, if you import the car, then the transport costs/imports duties can be submitted as an expense and is not exposed to taxes. I talked to Trish about exactly what you have proposed and she wasn't sure from an equity standpoint between what was given to other employees that she could do that. However, don't worry about it I'll do my best so that you are kept whole in one way or another.  The easiest position for me to push is if you actually want to keep your car, then you can expense the duty.

John,

Did you have a chance to talk to Dawn / Milly? Even if you want to work the flight / hotel / movers the usual way and then pay the balance as a "signing bonus" or something that would probably work. I am going to take a bath on my car in a big way. The option of moving my it back to Canada is out of the question as I just found out I would have to pay 6.1% import duty, 7% GST and about $400 in excise taxes and permits. Let me know.

Chris

 
Now that we can post numbers inside other market maker's numbers on EOL I expect no one to go the broker market for products that you are not the primary market maker.  Please mandate this policy with your traders.  As you always do, let me know if you disagree. 
 
With love
 
John

No I don't know about a power plant in Ontario.  How is it going in Seattle?  

Hope all is well.  Give us a call sometime.

You may want to reply directly too.  Sounds like he did not get our messge.

jess
> Hi Kids:
>
> Hope all is well.  What is John's email @ enron?
>
> John do you know anything about a power plant Enron Canada is building
> in Ontario?  where exactly?
>
> In hoc,
>
> pb smith :)
>
>

I understand that the car has 130,000 km.  Has the engine been rebuilt? When were the brakes last changed? How is the clutch and transmission?

number 1

We are in the process of confirming that all traders are set up correctly and ready to trade when the system goes live. 

We need to make sure that your Stack Managers are accessing the correct database. In order to do this, we need to know how you access Stack Manager:

1) Through Terminal Server (the one that opens up a desktop within a desktop and it actually appears that you have two Start buttons). 
or
2) By opening the Stack Manager directly from your "native" desktop.

Please reply to this message with either a corresponding "1" or a "2" in the subject field.

If you're not sure which one you have, please contact myself x39673, Teresa Mandola x39807 or Jennifer McQuade x53614 and we'll come by your desk to help you.

Thank you,

Dan Diamond

I'll send it Tues morning

don't forget to send the hedge report for the week.

k

Hi John.Here are some more pictures of the 1988 PORSCHE 930 TURBO-FACTORY
WIDE BODY.      philmur auto sales  (416)663-3782.

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com/intl.asp

 - Mvc-002f.jpg 
 - Mvc-005f.jpg 
 - Mvc-007f.jpg 
 - Mvc-008f.jpg 
 - Mvc-011f.jpg 
 - Mvc-012f.jpg 
 - Mvc-013f.jpg 
 - Mvc-014f.jpg 
 - Mvc-015f.jpg 
 - Mvc-017f.jpg 
 - Mvc-016f.jpg 

Here are some more pictures of this beast.......

_________________________________________________________________
Get your FREE download of MSN Explorer at http://explorer.msn.com/intl.asp

 - Mvc-019f.jpg 
 - Mvc-018f.jpg 
 - Mvc-020f.jpg 
 - Mvc-021f.jpg 
 - Mvc-022f.jpg 
 - Mvc-023f.jpg 
 - Mvc-024f.jpg 
 - Mvc-025f.jpg 

We can have you sit down with John Disturnal, Chris Lambie and Mike Cowan in informal interviews.

John

I am interested in joining the gas trading team next summer as I will be graduating from the U of C in April.  I don't know if I should try going through the fall recruiting or try a different route.  I have not talked to neither my superior (Peggy) nor Kathy yet.  

I've been with Enron since October, but I was (will be again this fall) doing support work for Ryan Watt, and sometimes for Mike Cowan during the weekends.  I work with their supply and demand models, calculate their positions, schedule gas on the Nova pipelines, and work with the Suncor and PetroCanada accounts together with the outsourcing team.  Over the summer, I had the opportunity to work with Kathy's group to get some experience on the slightly more complex deal types that Enron offers.

I had an interview with McKay back in early June.  However, I guess back then I was doing summer classes, the interview did not go as well as I hoped.  Now with summer classes over, I was just wondering if I could try again.

Please let me know what you think and I look forward to your reply.

Kind regards,

Victor Leung
Enron Canada Corp.
3500 Canterra Tower
400 - 3rd Avenue SW
Calgary, Alberta
Canada T2P 4H2

Main: 403.974.6700
Direct: 403.974.6947
Fax: 403.974.6706

CAN YOU SET UP GREG BERRY IN DUNCAN CROASDALE'S OLD SEAT.

THANKS,

JOHN

John Zufferli
Bill Greenizan
Cooper Richey
 
of Enron will attend

One of us will attend

I will be attending this and would encourage attendance by our commercial g=
uys also.

Attached for your information is the proposed program for the upcoming Pool
workshop focusing on the Intra Day Market scheduled for August 28, 2001 fro=
m
9 a.m. to 2 p.m. Please RSVP to Kristin Link at kristin.link@powerpool.ab.c=
a
or by phone at (403) 543-0380.

 <<WorkshopAgendaItems.doc>>

 - WorkshopAgendaItems.doc << File: WorkshopAgendaItems.doc >>

Give me a call after 3:00 PM MST tomorrow

Hi  John,
 
Nice to meet you by email and thank-you very much  for making yourself available as a source of further info and assistance!   I'm sure you have gotten a "download" that sets the context for us to  have a conversation (or two...) over the next little while.  I am  actually flying to Calgary tonight, so I was going to try calling you tomorrow  morning - however, as a trader, would you prefer NOT to receive any calls during  business hours?  If so, when is a good time to be on the phone for  ~25min?  Please let me know.
 
Per your (relayed) request, I have also attached a  current resume.  In addition, I have pasted in some bullet points from a  recent cover letter that outline what I am interested in pursuing and what I  bring to the table.  I'm primarily interested in tapping you for some  energy industry knowledge and a sense of your experiences.  We'll see what  else can happen from there.
 
Thanks again for making yourself available and  hopefully we can hookup soon.  Have a great day!
 
Andy Crysdale.
 
 
 
What I bring to  the table:

Capabilities: I have developed a broad set of analytic,  communication and project management skills and experience. I have leveraged  these skills extensively in realising successes as a technology salesperson  and project manager, an MBA student and management  consultant.  
Capacity to Learn: Three years ago, I had never heard of  WACC.  I had written a 90th percentile GMAT and was on my was to  Ivey.  In the time since, I have completed the MBA, achieving top marks  in Finance, Marketing and an overall Dean's Honour List standing, I  have taught business courses in Russia, I have worked at two top consulting  firms, consulting on a range of projects in various industries, I have paddled  the Yukon River and my wife and I have bought a house and enjoyed the  arrival of our first child. I am a proactive learner with few  limits.  
Commitment: My personal mission statement is to  positively impact people by creating and facilitating positive change.   This core value keeps me highly motivated and interested in being a catalyst  for change.

 
What I am interested in  pursuing:
 
Strategic Planning and  Analysis:  Following on what I was doing at Monitor, I'm looking around for  companies that have an active corporate planning/internal consulting  group.  For the prospective employer, I bring a valuable set of skills  and the rigorous, hard-working disposition that is a by-product of the Monitor  pedigree.  For me, an internal planning or consulting group allows me to  keep growing my experience with various businesses or business units in  various industries.  It also allows me to network, learn an industry and,  with the right company, transition into line management in the  future.  
Business Development: I am also attracted to the  idea of growing a business, primarily because I like generating impact.   I would be interested in "business development" roles that combine an element  of selling with involvement in the strategic planning process; basically, the  processes of figuring out what to do and where, and then doing it.  
Growing, Changing Industries:  I am primarily  looking in the financial services, pharmaceuticals and energy  industries.

 - Andy Crysdale 2001 e-Resume.doc << File: Andy Crysdale 2001 e-Resume.doc >> 

I don't have a need for traders here in Calgary now.  I don't have a softcopy of the application.  He should think about Harvard and MIT

hey john,

a few more things.  do you think Enron may be hiring any traders any time?
if so, maybe you could let ali know (he's still figuring out what to do).
also, do you have a soft copy of your UChicago MBA application?  ali's
going to write his GMAT in Sept. and start to apply to bus school.  He's
thinking of applying to Chicago, Columbia, Wharton, Kellogg, and Stanford.
Any thoughts on those?

lee

John.Zufferli@enron.com on 08/21/2001 03:32:02 PM

Yes and send me his resume

    -----Original Message-----
   Hi John,

   Remember i told you about the guy at work who got fired last week -- he
   has
   a brand new baby and just bought a new house?  Anyway, he wanted to
   speak
   to people in the oil and gas industry (his wife is originally from
   Calgary
   and they may be interested in moving back).  I think he just wants
   general
   info about the type of work you do (or others in the field) and what he
   should think about in terms of applying to firms.  Is it okay if i give
   him
   your number?  If so, would you prefer work or home?

   livia

I'll be there

Rob has requested a meeting be scheduled on Thursday, August 23rd at 3:00 pm Calgary time, 5:00 pm Toronto time to discuss ideas on raising Enron Canada's natural gas volumes, EOL transactions and the number of customers on EOL between now and year-end.

Could you kindly confirm your attendance by replying to this E-mail as soon as possible.

Regards, Nella

Note:  Eric Le Dain and Steven Burnham will be video conferenced in from Toronto.

can you call me regarding this

My apologies if this has been done, but I'm in process of assembling list of products that UBS will be trading.  If this list has been compiled, please direct it to me.  

I'm interested in getting the greatest granularity possible breaking it out by VaR portfolio name, trader, trading book, commodity, instrument, location, tenor, relative liquidity for each instrument expressed in contract/day (i.e. could impact holding period for VAR) and best risk mitigator.  (Regarding best risk mitigator, I'm not looking for liquidating position comments, but rather best hedge given curve location.)  This will help in directing correlation efforts for VAR.  See attached spreadsheet for suggested format.

Thanks,
Frank

 << File: Trading Universe.xls >> 

Hi Everyone,
A friend of mine scanned in some new pictures of Stefi, so I thought I
would send them out for everyone who might be interested.   For those of
you downloading at home, I hope this does not (did not) take too long.
Have a great day!
Kate :-)

Katherine Kurtz
DB2 Solution Integration Centre
email: kkurtz@ca.ibm.com
phone: 448-3588
Notes: Katherine Kurtz/Toronto/IBM@IBMCA
T/L: 778-3588

Doug Doole
08/21/2001 10:53 AM

Ready for mailing...
(See attached file: c0131-23.jpg)(See attached file: c0129-19.jpg)(See
attached file: c0130-03.jpg)(See attached file: c0130-09.jpg)(See attached
file: c0130-19.jpg)(See attached file: c0131-12.jpg)(See attached file:
c0131-17.jpg)(See attached file: c0129-07.jpg)
________________________________________________________________
Doug Doole
DB2 Universal Database Development
IBM Toronto Labs
doole@ca.ibm.com
(905)  413-2347

 - c0131-23.jpg 
 - c0129-19.jpg 
 - c0130-03.jpg 
 - c0130-09.jpg 
 - c0130-19.jpg 
 - c0131-12.jpg 
 - c0131-17.jpg 
 - c0129-07.jpg 

Yes and send me his resume

Hi John,

Remember i told you about the guy at work who got fired last week -- he has
a brand new baby and just bought a new house?  Anyway, he wanted to speak
to people in the oil and gas industry (his wife is originally from Calgary
and they may be interested in moving back).  I think he just wants general
info about the type of work you do (or others in the field) and what he
should think about in terms of applying to firms.  Is it okay if i give him
your number?  If so, would you prefer work or home?

livia

I agree they both need to be tighter.

It will be easier to convince Frank Ermis to take Nov-Mar Malin to a .05 cent two way if the Sumas market tightens as well.  Let me know what your thoughts are.

Grigsby

Good for me
John, does this work for you?

Thanks, Nella

How about 5 pm eastern time (3 pm Calgary) this Thursday and I'll video in from TO.
Your list of people is correct.

Rob is unavailable on Monday (27th).  Does Wednesday (29th) work for you?

Nella,
I'm in Toronto Wed through Fri this week, but would like to attend this mtg as I have ideas on the subject.  How about next Monday.  Thanks

Nella, please set up meeting this week with Le Dain & Zufferli's gas teams to brainstorm ideas on raising our nat gas volumes/eol transactions/# customers on EOL  between now and year-end.

I have given Bill Greenizan formal authority to be your direct supervisor.  Bill will be the point person for any questions, development issues and concerns that your group may have.  You are still welcome to approach me at any time.  However, I feel that given my increased responsibilities with the gas group, it would only be fair to the four of you, in terms of career development, to have more frequent and detailed interaction with Bill.

Thank you.

P.S. I would like to make this announcement in person but as you know it is difficult to get all four of you at the same time.

We can put him in sean's seat

can you procure a seat for greg somewhere near the trading floor - preferably close to colin?

Looking forward to it

John/Cooper:

Just to keep you informed, we are progressing towards launching the AIS Demad Swap. As discussed I have a target date of Sep 30, 01 to launch this product.

Per your suggestions, we have changed the product from a peak to flat (7x24).

John, we are planning to meet and educate counterparties in Alberta to market this product. Do you think brokers are going to play a role in this? Please let me know. If yes then we will educate them on this product as well.

If you think of some thing that we need to take care of at this time, please let me know.

Thanks,

Sanjeev

											
Sanjeev K Khanna				Email: 	Sanjeev.Khanna@enron.com
Director						Tel: 	(713) 853-3849
Enron Global Markets				Cell: 	(713) 594-1832
1400 Smith Street, Suite 3004F			Pager: 	(877) 497-1217
Houston TX 77002					Fax: 	(713) 646-3220
											

_

Sure.

John,

Leah and I are planning a trip to Florida, and I will need 4 weekday shifts off, Oct 15-18th. Can you let me know if I can use this as part of my vacation days.

Thanks alot,

John

I'll be there

Things are ok.  How is the new family addition doing?

Hey, just checking in and seeing how things were going. What do you think about Skilling. Are you next in line for that job?

John

ok

Peggy & John
The estate's DPR reporting requirement to risk controls in Houston is going to be twice a week.  Consistent with this I would also like to change our internal DPR reporting process for ECC Power-Estate from DAILY to twice per week.  Note that curves and an official calc will still be required daily.
 
I would like to make this change starting Feb 1.  Please let me know if you are okay with this.
 
Kathy
 
As a follow up to this email, we will start reporting the DPR's on Wednesday's and Monday's, for Tuesday and Friday valuations.  The first Wednesday will be the 30th of January.  Each day we should expect to report the positions, P&L and PRMA of only those transactions we expect to fulfill.  With the exception of Gas, Susan Trevino will be sending the benchmarks to each of the groups for their review.  
 
If anyone anticipates any problems with this time frame, please call me or Shona to discuss.
 
Chris
 
Fallon has requested a DPR be prepared 2X a week for positions that we are executing on (active/live positions only, no terminations or deals we are not executing on).  We have put together the shell of how this DPR will look.  To start this process we are planning to present to him positions (column E) and PRM value (column X) as of 1/23.  To do this, we have laid out the following steps:
 
- we need to get the PRM values directly from you (column X)
- we will run the benchmarks and need to work with you to ensure you are happy with the benchmark numbers we have pulled from RMS (the exception is gas, we need the gas risk group to provide the gas bench to us)
- we need all of then exceptions/qualifications to your numbers
- we will need the other information in the schedule to be reported to us starting next week, but not for this exercise
 
Please confirm to me/Shona that you can get us this info by 230 pm today.
 
Lastly, I am attaching the unofficialized book list as these books will not make it into the benchmarks and need you to confirm that there are no 3rd party positions in these books.
 
Thanks in advance

Chris Abel 
Manager, Risk Controls 
Global Risk Operations 
chris.abel@enron.com <mailto:chris.abel@enron.com> 
713.853.3102 

 
 

I don't have any immediate needs.  I don't know if anyone would want to come work for Canadian Pesos anyway.

Sorry I couldn't be more help.

See you

John, 

Do you have any positions to fill?  There are a couple Directors down to Sr. Specialists from EBS who might be looking for positions.  I'd only recommend good people who have found themselves in difficult positions.

How about that Skilling announcement?

Let me know bubba.

-Greg

 
Attention:                        Power Pool of Alberta
                             Kenneth Burgoyne
 
Thank you for your interest in Enron Online.
 
Following is a guest password that will allow you temporary view only access to EnronOnline. Please note that the Guest User ID and Guest Password are CASE SENSITIVE.
 
Guest User ID:                   GNA22899
Guest Password:              KL39PQ68
 
Please contact us if you have any questions regarding the EnronOnline website.
 
Best Regards,
 
Danny Lee
EnronOnline
713-853-HELP(4357)

No problem

Hi,
Did you go away this weekend?  Mom kept trying to call you all weekend.

I took the cousins out all weekend -- they had a good time.  Just wondering, it
was kind of an expensive weekend (i took them out for 2 meals, plus all parking
/ other stuff).  Would you and Jess mind contributing $100-150 to the cause?  I
hate to ask, but i'm trying to keep expenses down given all recent events.

Livia

Infield
6 tickets what day and are you looking for Infield or regular seating.

2002, Monday, July 5th to the Sunday July 14th

Power Trading will need about 6 seats.

July  [Angela]  5 th -  [Angela]  14 th are the dates for 2002 Stampede

Tickets for the 2002 Stampede Rodeo go on sale Monday, August 20 through Ticket Master.  I am enquiring how may tickets we would like.  Eric talked about possibly sitting in the Infield seats for our customer event or renting a suite.  Suites will not be determined until the beginning of 2002 once the major corporate sponsors have decided on if they wish to lease the suite for the day.  If you could please try to get back to me by Wednesday with ticket numbers.  I will order tickets on Monday when Ticket Master opens.  

Infield apx $55
Regular Rodeo Seating apx $32

Suite cost about - 
Super Suite - 2001 prices
Rodeo Only includes 50 suite tickets for Afternoon Rodeo only
July 6-13	$13,520	
July 14-15	$14,870	
Chuckwagons Only includes 50 suite tickets for Chuckwagon Races only
July 6-13	$6,760	
July 14-15	$7,435	

Thanks for your request for information on the Calgary Stampede's Infield
Suites.  The Stampede's inventory of Infield Suites for the entire 10 days
of Stampede are held by our major corporate sponsors who have licensed the
suites as part of long-term contracts.

Each year, however, a very limited inventory of suites are offered back to
us from some of our 10-day suiteholders in "whole-day packages" -- what that
means is we receive back both the rodeo performance and chuckwagon race
performance to be sold as a package.

This "return" of suite dates does not traditionally occur until the new
year, when the companies begin to firm up their plans for the upcoming
Stampede.  Until then we maintain a waiting list of companies wishing to
lease suites for a single day or days.

To be added to the wait list, I require a request in writing with all
company details and preferred dates for Infield Suite use.

Please let me know if you have any other questions, I would be happy to
assist.

Ken Knight
Premium Seating Manager
Calgary Stampede
Infield Suites & Ranahans
Phone: (403) 261-0423   Fax: (403) 264-0299
kknight@calgarystampede.com

Angela McCulloch
Enron Canada Corp.
Phone: (403) 974-6738
     Fax: (403) 974-6991

Just respond to Angela with how many seats you think you'll need.
July 7th - 16th are the dates for 2002 Stampede

Tickets for the 2002 Stampede Rodeo go on sale Monday, August 20 through Ticket Master.  I am enquiring how may tickets we would like.  Eric talked about possibly sitting in the Infield seats for our customer event or renting a suite.  Suites will not be determined until the beginning of 2002 once the major corporate sponsors have decided on if they wish to lease the suite for the day.  If you could please try to get back to me by Wednesday with ticket numbers.  I will order tickets on Monday when Ticket Master opens.  

Infield apx $55
Regular Rodeo Seating apx $32

Suite cost about - 
Super Suite - 2001 prices
Rodeo Only includes 50 suite tickets for Afternoon Rodeo only
July 6-13	$13,520	
July 14-15	$14,870	
Chuckwagons Only includes 50 suite tickets for Chuckwagon Races only
July 6-13	$6,760	
July 14-15	$7,435	

Thanks for your request for information on the Calgary Stampede's Infield
Suites.  The Stampede's inventory of Infield Suites for the entire 10 days
of Stampede are held by our major corporate sponsors who have licensed the
suites as part of long-term contracts.

Each year, however, a very limited inventory of suites are offered back to
us from some of our 10-day suiteholders in "whole-day packages" -- what that
means is we receive back both the rodeo performance and chuckwagon race
performance to be sold as a package.

This "return" of suite dates does not traditionally occur until the new
year, when the companies begin to firm up their plans for the upcoming
Stampede.  Until then we maintain a waiting list of companies wishing to
lease suites for a single day or days.

To be added to the wait list, I require a request in writing with all
company details and preferred dates for Infield Suite use.

Please let me know if you have any other questions, I would be happy to
assist.

Ken Knight
Premium Seating Manager
Calgary Stampede
Infield Suites & Ranahans
Phone: (403) 261-0423   Fax: (403) 264-0299
kknight@calgarystampede.com

Angela McCulloch
Enron Canada Corp.
Phone: (403) 974-6738
     Fax: (403) 974-6991

Power Trading will need about 6 seats.

July 7th - 16th are the dates for 2002 Stampede

Tickets for the 2002 Stampede Rodeo go on sale Monday, August 20 through Ticket Master.  I am enquiring how may tickets we would like.  Eric talked about possibly sitting in the Infield seats for our customer event or renting a suite.  Suites will not be determined until the beginning of 2002 once the major corporate sponsors have decided on if they wish to lease the suite for the day.  If you could please try to get back to me by Wednesday with ticket numbers.  I will order tickets on Monday when Ticket Master opens.  

Infield apx $55
Regular Rodeo Seating apx $32

Suite cost about - 
Super Suite - 2001 prices
Rodeo Only includes 50 suite tickets for Afternoon Rodeo only
July 6-13	$13,520	
July 14-15	$14,870	
Chuckwagons Only includes 50 suite tickets for Chuckwagon Races only
July 6-13	$6,760	
July 14-15	$7,435	

Thanks for your request for information on the Calgary Stampede's Infield
Suites.  The Stampede's inventory of Infield Suites for the entire 10 days
of Stampede are held by our major corporate sponsors who have licensed the
suites as part of long-term contracts.

Each year, however, a very limited inventory of suites are offered back to
us from some of our 10-day suiteholders in "whole-day packages" -- what that
means is we receive back both the rodeo performance and chuckwagon race
performance to be sold as a package.

This "return" of suite dates does not traditionally occur until the new
year, when the companies begin to firm up their plans for the upcoming
Stampede.  Until then we maintain a waiting list of companies wishing to
lease suites for a single day or days.

To be added to the wait list, I require a request in writing with all
company details and preferred dates for Infield Suite use.

Please let me know if you have any other questions, I would be happy to
assist.

Ken Knight
Premium Seating Manager
Calgary Stampede
Infield Suites & Ranahans
Phone: (403) 261-0423   Fax: (403) 264-0299
kknight@calgarystampede.com

Angela McCulloch
Enron Canada Corp.
Phone: (403) 974-6738
     Fax: (403) 974-6991

This sounds fine.

I had Frank Ermis talk to Cowan about having an open line on our box to you guys. I also asked Frank to talk with Cowan and Calrk each morning to discuss the market.  We have a wed fundies meeting each week at 3:30.  I would like you guys to call in for this meeting.

Let me know what you think.

Grigsby  

I sent a request to reactivate the PowerPool of Alberta's view access to EOL Alberta Gas and Alberta Power.

The request was sent to the help e-mail address 1 week ago.  To date the powerpool has not received access.  Can you inform me
how long it will take?

Thank you.

Nella, the trade volume info looks correct.  It is the new counterparty info that is incorrect

in Q1 - we had 8 new counterparties for the Alberta Power product
in Q2 - we had 2 new counterparties for the Alberta Power product

Have you got you Enron Online reactivated yet?

Derek,

Can you help us out, our guest access expired.
I somehow don't have John's card, so I thought I'd try you.

Please advise.
Cheryl

Attention:	Power Pool of Alberta
		Kenneth Burgoyne

Thank you for requesting guest access to EnronOnline.  Unfortunately, we
are unable to give you guest access at this time. EnronOnline is
exclusively for those companies who can transact wholesale energy
commodities and related products on their own behalf.

If you do transact wholesale energy commodities on your own behalf,
please feel free to contact our Call Center at 713-853-HELP (4357).

Sincerely,

Kathy Moore
EnronOnline

Feb 1

AEC Marketing physical gas
Calpine Canada Natural Gas Partnership (Encal) physical gas
El Paso Merchant Energy physical gas
Williams Energy Marketing 

Here is a copy of the script.  Let me know if you have any comments.

We can meet at my house at around 7:30 PM tonight.  

133 Slopeview Drive
phone:	685-4817

Can every dress up in as bushman or farmer outfit as you have.

It might be funny for Rob to wear a hockey jersey with the letter C on it.

Does anyone have a chalkboard?

Kyle can you bring you abacus?

 

This seems fine.

Here is a draft of an extremely simple termination letter.

 << File: 01-Termination Letter.doc >> 

This is kinda funny.  love, jess
> Maybe you guys have all seen this missive already, but it was new to me
> today.  I thought some of these lines were funnier than any of the awful
> jokes that get forwarded to me.  (But if you don't think so, I apologize
> for filling your inbox unnecessarily.)
>
> virge
>
>
>
>
> >>>>Subject: Windows Error Message Haiku
> >>>>
> >>>> >Tokyo, Japan, May 20 - Sony has announced its own computer operating
> >>>> >system now available on its hot new portable PC called the Vaio.
> >>>> >Instead of producing the cryptic error messages characteristic of
> >>>> >Microsoft's Windows and DOS systems, Sony's chairman Asai Tawara
> >>>> >said, "We intend to capture the high ground by putting a human,
> >>>> >Japanese face on what has been -- until now -- an operating system
> >>>> >that reflects Western cultural hegemony. For example, we have
> >>>> >replaced the impersonal and unhelpful Microsoft error messages with
> >>>> >our own Japanese haiku poetry." The haiku messages are just as
> >>>> >informative as Microsoft's and they make you pause just long enough
> >>>> >that you're able to fight the impulse to put a fist through the
> >>>> >screen. The chairman went on to give examples of the error messages:
> >>>> >
> >>>> >A file that big?
> >>>> >It might be very useful.
> >>>> >But now it is gone.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >You seek a Web site.
> >>>> >It cannot be located.
> >>>> >Countless more exist.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >Chaos reigns within.
> >>>> >Stop, reflect, and reboot.
> >>>> >Order shall return.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >ABORTED effort:
> >>>> >Close all that you have worked on.
> >>>> >You ask way too much.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >Yesterday it worked.
> >>>> >Today it is not working.
> >>>> >Windows is like that.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >First snow, then silence.
> >>>> >This thousand dollar screen dies
> >>>> >So beautifully.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >With searching comes loss.
> >>>> >The presence of absence.
> >>>> >"June Sales.doc" not found.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >The Tao that is seen
> >>>> >Is not the true Tao
> >>>> >Until you bring fresh toner.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >Windows NT crashed.
> >>>> >The Blue Screen of Death.
> >>>> >No one hears your screams.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >Stay the patient course.
> >>>> >Of little worth is your ire.
> >>>> >The network is down.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >A crash reduces
> >>>> >Your expensive computer
> >>>> >To a simple stone.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >Three things are certain:
> >>>> >Death, taxes, and lost data.
> >>>> >Guess which has occurred.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >You step in the stream
> >>>> >But the water has moved on.
> >>>> >Page not found.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >Out of memory.
> >>>> >We wish to hold the whole sky,
> >>>> >But we never will.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >Having been erased,
> >>>> >The document you are seeking
> >>>> >Must now be retyped.
> >>>> >
> >>>> >Serious error.
> >>>> >All shortcuts have disappeared.
> >>>> >Screen. Mind. Both are blank.
>
>
>                                      ******************************
>                                      "Never attribute to malice
>                                       that which is adequately
>                                       explained by stupidity."
>                                                  ... Hanlon's Razor
>                                      ******************************
>

Sorry Nella, I replied a while ago directly to Rob Milnthorp

Gentlemen, on July 25th I had forwarded to you a memo and the results of the second quarter soft targets for Enron Americas.  I have not heard back from you with respect to the accuracy of the information in the reports.  Could you kindly let me know if changes should be made to these reports in order that I may forward our corrected information to Houston.

Regards, Nella

As a policy we only provide this info to customers who do business with us.  

John,

My neighbour is an equity trader with Peters & Co. and is looking to get a morning commentary on the naural gas market. Do we have anybody in the office who provides this sort of information ? Let me know.

Thanks,

John

yes

John,

Are we papering ECC's financial trades with BP Corporation North America (BPCNA) under the ISDA that we have between ENA and BPCNA and just back to backing our trades between ENA and ECC???  I am not trying to be a pain in the butt...but... I just want to make sure we are covered.  Please advise.

Wendy

No problem.  Just arrange it with Angela.

I was looking in to the up-coming training sessions for the new etag system that OATI is rolling out on October 25, 2001.  They have two different training sessions, a one day workshop that is for experienced users and does not include any hands-on training, and a two day training session that includes hands-on training.  The two day session however, includes a second day of training on NERC Policy 9 regarding congestion management that may not be overly important to Calgary operations.

OATI says that version 1.7 is drastically different from the current software and training is highly recommended.  I was thinking that it would be a good idea to send one of us to the 2-day training session and then that person could pass on the information to the other 3.  I think, by the sounds of it, we would only need to attend one day since the second day deals with the NERC policy for the eastern interconnect only.

There is a training session that runs on October 1-2 in Minneapolis.  I am off those days, and would be more then happy to attend.  I can take care of all the registration and travel planning with Angela if you would like.

The cost of the session is $250 for 2 days, or $150 for the first day only.  There are only 8 spots left for this session.

Let me know what you think.

Mike

  

Can you re-activate the Alberta Power Pool Access to EnronOnline.  Although this entity doesn't trade, it is important that they have access to the Alberta Gas and
Alberta Power product for view only.  This is a government entity that controls important gas generators in the province. They use our info about AECO gas in dispatching these units and they are an advocate for electricity trading in the province.  Therefore, they need to see the Alberta Power market data on EOL.

Thank You 

John Zufferli

Derek,

Can you help us out, our guest access expired.
I somehow don't have John's card, so I thought I'd try you.

Please advise.
Cheryl

Attention:	Power Pool of Alberta
		Kenneth Burgoyne

Thank you for requesting guest access to EnronOnline.  Unfortunately, we
are unable to give you guest access at this time. EnronOnline is
exclusively for those companies who can transact wholesale energy
commodities and related products on their own behalf.

If you do transact wholesale energy commodities on your own behalf,
please feel free to contact our Call Center at 713-853-HELP (4357).

Sincerely,

Kathy Moore
EnronOnline

Looks right

August 16 @ 12:24 on United 1104?

Dave

Do you have our flight info?

John,

Thanks for the offer of the back seat (or was it the trunk?) of your rental car from Denver. I'd like to take you up on it.

I'll meet you and Kyle at the Calgary airport on the 16th.

See you then,

Dave

I didn't see accumap added to the new list that was sent by chris behney,

the nova, oasis and power pool of alberta accounts that were added in yellow were inappropriately added as these are 
not data sources that require purchasing, they are simply accounts to set-up much like a membership account

 
 

 Untitled Attachment 

Clare and Derek Davies welcomed the arrival of their second son. 

Alex Davies was born Sunday, August 5th at 4:50am, he is  7lb  12oz and 50 cm in length. Everyone is doing well. 

Do you have our flight info?

John,

Thanks for the offer of the back seat (or was it the trunk?) of your rental car from Denver. I'd like to take you up on it.

I'll meet you and Kyle at the Calgary airport on the 16th.

See you then,

Dave

Call us from London when youget there

Hey guys,

Sad day.  Monitor North America is laying off people today -- ali got fired this
 morning (he was intending to come back to work this month)
Anyway, it happened fairly quickly and without notice.  My job is safe for now,
but who knows.  I'm going to start looking
around I guess...not sure at what.  Ali's not sure what to do -- maybe apply for
 an MBA program.  John -- would you
be able to give him pointers on what he should include for a Uof Chicago
application?

I'm going to see mom tonight in London.  Her surgery is tomorrow, and she's
pretty nervous.  This is just working out to be
a fantastic week.

Liv

Jason can you make a power point slide with the following spreadsheet.  Just use the number of trades and volume of trade columns (i.e. the first two)

 

can you update slides 13-16 as of end of July
 

We should make reservations for:

John Lavorato
Rob Milnthorp
Derek Davies
John Zufferli
Eric LeDain
John MacKay
Chris Lambie
John Disturnal
Mike Cowan

I am sure that John Lavorato will want to see a presentation for the Alberta Power Fundamentals.  To save the hassle of develop powerpoint slides.  Is there a way
that we can simply tie a projector to the computer and run it off of our website.  Additionally, can you enter the new known generation in the database. I am sure that he will want to see this as well.  He will be in the office on Wed afternoon.

these are all ok

John,

We are working on an EnronOnline Website Audit.  We have noticed that many traders have duplicate ID's and are not using some of them.  In an effort to reduce risk, we would like to inactivate all ID's that are no longer valid for traders.  Please note that inactivating these ID's will not effect matrix trades.  Please review the following information and let us know if these are valid books and ID's.

Canada-Power-Basis book
User ID:  ADM53947

Canada-Power-GD book
User ID:  ADM26160

ECC Canada Power book
User ID:  ADM41651

Enron Canada Power book
User ID:  ADM21625

HedgeCDN book
User ID:  ADM46053

HedgeUS book
User ID:  ADM32569

Thank you,

Karen O'Day
EnronOnline
713-345-4135

The balancing pool committed in the their beginning of year release to dispatch Milner as follows:

70 MW @ $0
50 MW @ $35.49

Milner has been down for maintenance until recently.

Since coming back from maintenace, the 50 MW block @ $35.49 has disappeared.  We analyzed the offer stack and it appears
that Milner has the full 120 MW @ $0

I called Doug Heath to discuss this.  He hasn't called me back. 

The issue I raised last week about Sherness dispatch is OK. I received a justified answer.  However, this Milner issue is harder for th pool to defend.

Can we pursue this.

Thanks

John

unsubscribe pjm-customer-info

one thing, we should wait before we dole out all 250 until we hear from others

I was talking to John Lavorato just this morning and he said that he e-mailed you a memo that described the topics that he wanted to talk about next week. 
Do you have a copy of that?

John, you will see that a number of topics that Lavo wanted to cover with you and your trading group can be illustrated through the use of the performance metrics that are being put together. You may want to use these v. creating new ones.

We should have everything except the Profitability vs VAR report.  I am working with Frank Hayden in Houston on this, but we may not have it next week.  Let me know if that's a problem.
Thanks
Peg

Peggy, Grant: I would like to use the performance metrics when Lavorato is here next week (august 9/10). Will they be in final form by then. pls advise. thx

oops, forgot you in my initial mailout John.....

Can you look at this and see if it makes any sense.  Have you seen this before?  This came from Houston - I'm not sure it's the same one that the UK is working on but I should find out more next week.....
 

http://enrontradinggame.corp.enron.com/.

I am interested

 << OLE Object: Microsoft ClipArt Gallery >> 

Jose Marquez will be in the office on Friday to give Weather Tutorials. We will be having one in the morning and one in the afternoon. Times will follow shortly.
If you are interested please let me know.

Mya Johnsen
Enron Canada Corp.
phone: (403) 974-6729
fax: (403) 974-6706

Looks pretty cool.  I think we can use it

oops, forgot you in my initial mailout John.....

Can you look at this and see if it makes any sense.  Have you seen this before?  This came from Houston - I'm not sure it's the same one that the UK is working on but I should find out more next week.....
 

http://enrontradinggame.corp.enron.com/.

I recognize that Aug 17 is Jason Garvey's last day, I am fine with that date.

Karim , this is the deal that I was talking about this morning.  Albert is saying that it should have appeared in Friday's P&L.  Can you check this with him and let my know today.  When you said it was in tonights P&L, I think Albert was talking about the Telus deal not the Cisson deal.
Here is the latest Enron Direct deal that was previously entered.  The total volumes is about 5700 Mwh, and the P&L impact is about positive 53K.  If you have any questions, please let me know.  

Albert.

 

It didn't, check with Karim and let me know today.

Thanks

The sisson deal should have appeared on Friday.  The value may have changed, but it should have showed up on Friday's Calc.  

AL

Will the Telus and Cisson deal appear tonight?  Because I haven't seen the Cisson deal of +53K yet?

Hello.  Here is the Enron Direct Deal (Telus Convention Center) that was done on July 27.  This deal will show up on tonight's calculation.  If you have any questions, please call me. 

Albert.

 << File: Telus Center Deal Calculation.xls >> 

Will the Telus and Cisson deal appear tonight?  Because I haven't seen the Cisson deal of +53K yet?

Hello.  Here is the Enron Direct Deal (Telus Convention Center) that was done on July 27.  This deal will show up on tonight's calculation.  If you have any questions, please call me. 

Albert.

 << File: Telus Center Deal Calculation.xls >> 

Not really, maybe 0.5 HR in Aug only, rest in unchanged

I understand that prompt (aug)  east power is coming off drastically and implied heat rates are coming in.  Are you also seeing this in West?

Frank

who at UBS should we talk to?
The contracts might have been from Calgary, I just don't know if anyone from Calgary is talking with the contracts group from UBS?
Does anyone know?

Danielle
1 user of accumap

 I'll look into the other issues, I just thought that you may know who may be handling it, we may just do it directly from Calgary

John:

I have not found anyone who was trying to renew these contracts.  I am meeting with IHS on Thursday so I will make sure we add Accumap.  How many user of Accumap will you need?  I will forward the cost to you prior to sending the contracts to UBS.  

Do you know who managed the contracts with NOVA, Power Pool of Alberta, OASIS or ESBI so that I can gather contact information and begin the contract management of these applications.

Thanks,

Danielle  

I have no knowledge of anyone looking into the resources listed.

Chris

Chris / Lloyd:

To answer John's question do you know if anyone is looking into NOVA, Power Pool of Alberta, OASIS, or ESBI ? 

Thanks,

Danielle

Danielle, in general we need everything that Houston gets in addition to the info that is listed as Calgary on your spreadsheet.  One information source in not listed on your sheet.

IHS Accumap		Priority 2	Contact: Carmen (403) 770-4503 phone, (403) 874-4218 cell

Can you tell me if anyone in Houston is working on setting up accounts with NOVA, Power Pool of Alberta, OASIS, ESBI?  These are gas and power related entities that we have to have accounts with the schedule physical gas and electricity.

John:

Here are the contracts we are currently creating with UBS.  Please verify that we have not missed any applications/publications or subscriptions.  

Highlight in Red the systems you will need and mark the priority from 1-5,  1 being critical.

Thank you,

Danielle 

 << File: md.xls >>   

sure

Guys, are you interested in attending this meeting.  If you are, please let me know.

Regards, Nella

The above-captioned meeting/presentation scheduled in August has been cancelled and is now scheduled for Monday, September 10, 2001 at noon (lunch will be provided).  Murray Greenberg of Financial Dynamics will be giving the presentation.

Again, could you please let me know if you are available at this new time and date.  

Regards, Nella
Kevin Rome of Financial Dynamics is available to attend our office on Wednesday, August 29th at 3:30 pm to give a presentation on financial structures, innovative solutions to tax, retirement and other financial planning issues.

Please let me know if you are available at this time and date to attend this presentation.

Regards, Nella

Good afternoon, all.  

We are exploring ways to assist you with your financial planning needs and have asked a financial planner to meet with you 'en masse' to discuss financial structures that are out of the norm - innovative solutions to tax, retirement and other financial planning issues.  His name is Murray Greenberg and he's associated with the firm, Financial Dynamics.  Murray has extensive experience dealing with senior managers at companies that include Northstar Energy, Deloitte & Touche and Toronto Dominion. 

If, as a result of this meeting, you are interested in what Murray has to offer - you may approach him individually and arrange for personal financial planning.  You are responsible for any fees associated with future arrangements.

Please let me know if you are interested in attending this meeting or if you would like further information.  Nella and I will pull together some potential meeting dates within the next 2 weeks.

Thanks.....

From the beginning of the year to July 25

No of Trades:		1247
MWH:			6,537,273
Notional Value:		CDN$ 570,602,236
Counterparties (10):	Aquila Canada
			Conoco Canada
			Duke Energy Marketing Ltd
			Dynegy Canada
			El Paso Merchant Energy
			Engage Canada
			Enmax Energy Corp
			Idaho Power Company
			TransAlta Energy Marketing
			TransCanada Energy Financial Products
			

My wife and I will be there

You and your guest are cordially invite for a Power Group Dinner
Saturday, August 4th, 2001
@
La Dolce Vita Ristorante
916 - 1st Avenue NE
Cocktails at 6:00 p.m.
Dinner at 6:30 p.m.
Reservations are under Enron - Private Dining Room Upstairs

Please RSVP to Angela.McCulloch@enron.com ASAP

Angela McCulloch
Enron Canada Corp.
Phone: (403) 974-6738
     Fax: (403) 974-6991

I'll be there

Friendly reminder.

Kindly confirm your availability to attend an Analyst and Associate Recruiting Meeting scheduled for Thursday, July 26th at 2:00 p.m. (4:00 p.m. Toronto time).  This meeting should not take more than one hour.  The Toronto office will be video conferenced in.

Regards, Nella

Thanks for making the changes on the P&L and fixed price positions report.  Can you also change the natural gas basis position by trader report from MacKay to Lambie?

This is to confirm our recruiting meeting tomorrow, Thursday, July 26 at 2:00 pm (4:00pm in Toronto) in the videoconference room.  Please review attached agenda and associated background and bring to the meeting: 

    

Does this resume interest you?
John: as requested here is a copy of my resume.  I am looking for a
sales/marketing position with your power or gas group. Thanks and I will
follow-up with you shortly.
Cathy

 - Resume.doc 

Congrats, Harvard is OK not as good as Chicago though. Just joking

John,

I got into Harvard last week!  Jim had Skilling write a letter and I got in.  Kristen and I are now making the big move and will be busy moving to Boston.  I will forward my info to you guys soon.  Unfortunately, this means that we cannot make it up to see you guys this summer, but we will try sometime in the spring.  Hope all is well.

John

Can you change John MacKay's name in the Natural Gas Fixed Price Positions by Trader, Natural Gas Basis Positions by Trader, Natural Gas P&L to Chris Lambie.
John is being relocated to Houston and Chris Lambie is now in charge of the Alberta Gas Term Desk.  Additionally, can you merge the P&L under  MacKay and
Add. Trading into one line item and call it Lambie. Therefore Lambie should be (41,480) as of yesterday's report.

I won't have it until tomorrow morning because of a deal entry error in my 2002 position

john,

could you please send me the report for the week.

thanks

k

 << File: HedgeSummary.xls >> 

when? i am free anytime this aft
Guys, I got the following approved by Whalley. We should sit down and discuss next steps asap

Greg/Louise - I would like your approval for a pool of $$$ to try to get all of the outstanding commercial staff in Canada signed. I would like approval for up to U.S. $250K/$250K to sign up the following "hold-outs":

1) Howard Sangwine
2) Grant Oh
3) Dean Drozdiak
4) Garrett Tripp
5) Steve Burnham
6) Lon Draper

Each of the above are highly marketable and have competing offers in hand. They have also been talking to their U.S. counterparts and know that there are funds available. Please advise. 

Lance Armstrong
>
>
>
>
> Throughout the Tour de France, a Colombian rider on the Kelme - Costa
> Blanca Team, Santiago Botero,had been keeping a diary for the newspaper.
>  Each day the newspaper published his diary from the previous day.
>  Unfortunately, this is the only diary entry I have seen. It is worth the
> read.
> "There I am all alone with my bike. I know of only two riders ahead of me
> as I near the end of the second climb on what most riders consider the
> third worst mountain stage in the Tour. I say 'most riders' because I do
> not fear mountains. After all, our country is nothing but mountains. I
> train year-round in the mountains. I am the national champion from a
> country that is nothing but mountains. I trail only my teammate, Fernando
> Escartin, and a Swiss rider. Pantani, one of my rival climbers, and the
> Gringo Armstrong are in the Peleton about five minutes behind me. I am
> climbing on such a such a steep portion of the mountain that if I were to
> stop pedaling, I would fall backward. Even for a world class climber,
this
> is a painful and slow process. I am in my upright position pedaling at a
> steady pace willing myself to finish this climb so I can conserve my
energy
>
> for the final climb of the day. The Kelme team leader radios to me that
the
>
> Gringo has left the Peleton by himself and that they can no longer see
him.
>
> I recall thinking 'the Gringo cannot catch me by himself'.
> A short while later, I hear the gears on another bicycle. Within seconds,
> the Gringo is next to me - riding in the seated position, smiling at me.
>  He was only next to me for a few seconds and he said nothing - he only
> smiled and then proceeded up the mountain as if he were pedaling
downhill.
> For the next several minutes, I could only think of one thing - his
smile.
> His smile told me everything. I kept thinking that surely he is in as
much
> agony as me, perhaps he was standing and struggling up the mountain as I
> was and he only sat down to pass me and discourage me. He has to be
playing
>
> games with me. Not possible. The truth is that his smile said everything
> that his lips did not. His smile said to me, 'I was training while you
were
>
> sleeping, Santiago'. It also said, 'I won this tour four months ago,
while
> you were deciding what bike frame to use in the Tour.
> I
> trained harder than you did, Santiago. I don't know if I am better than
> you, but I have outworked you and right now, you cannot do anything about
> it. Enjoy your ride, Santiago. See you in Paris.'
> Obviously, the Gringo did not state any of this. But his smile did dispel
a
>
> bad rumor among the riders on the tour. The rumor that surfaced as we
began
>
> the Prologue several days ago told us that the Gringo had gotten soft.
His
> wife had given birth to his first child and he had won the most difficult
> race in the world - He had no desire to race, to win. I imagine that his
>  smile turned to laughter once he was far enough not to embarrass me. The
> Gringo has class, but he heard the rumors - he probably laughed all the
way
>
> to Paris. He is a great champion and I must train harder. I am not
content
> to be a great climber, I want to be the best.
> I learned much from the Gringo in the mountains. I will never forget the
> helpless feeling I had yesterday. If I ever become an international
> champion, I will always remember the lesson the Gringo taught me.

ok

It seems Tuesday next week is also a problem.  I now propose Friday July 27 @ 1:30 Calgary time.  Please advise.

Some people cannot attend the call today at 1:00 pm Calgary time.  In view of this I have rescheduled the call to Tuesday July 24 at 2:00 pm Calgary time.  Could you please advise by reply email whether you are available.

Also, if you have not confirmed your acceptance by email of the terms under which our four companies have agreed to a share the TCA costs please do so in your reply to this email.

Regards,

Rob

Attached is the revised draft paper that reflects our conference call with Bob Fagan earlier this week.  I propose we have a conference call with Bob Fagan on Fri July 20 at 1:00 pm Calgary time to discuss any areas of concern/confusion you may have.

Also, would those of you who have not responded to me via email confirming your acceptance of the terms upon which our four companies have agreed to assume cost responsibility for the TCA work on this.  Attached is the letter I originally sent to you on May 10 in this regard. 

 << File: Tabors Conflict Letter Alberta Export 050901.doc >> 

Regards,

Rob

Rob,

This draft reflects the changes we discussed during our call the other day.
I've also included a redlined draft showing changes.

Regards,
Bob

 <<Alberta Transmission Access and Pricing Analysis_0712 .doc>>
 <<Alberta Transmission Access and Pricing Analysis_0712 redlined .doc>>

 - Alberta Transmission Access and Pricing Analysis_0712 .doc << File: Alberta Transmission Access and Pricing Analysis_0712 .doc >> 
 - Alberta Transmission Access and Pricing Analysis_0712 redlined .doc << File: Alberta Transmission Access and Pricing Analysis_0712 redlined .doc >> 

Same price as other volume, start date is fine, e-mail me for confirm

Hi John,

We have determined that there was a small portion of power that was underhedged for Co-op. Lori Poffenroth has asked me to purchase this to balance our exposure.

EDC buys from ECC:

Quantity: 0.05823 MW
Flat block 7x24 financial fixed price
Start date: July 20, 2001 (or as early as possible), HE 1:00 (MPT)
End date: December 31, 2005 HE 24:00 (MPT) 

Please advise me of Price and Start Date.

Thanks. Mark. 

Your numbers amount to a adjustment of (1,746,675), were the total 2nd order from Jun 29 was (1,891,851), now I understand that I would receive a some negative 2nd order to explain some of this difference I just thought that (145,176) difference (i.e. (1,891,851-1,746675) which should be the true 2nd order) was a bit high.

I wanted to update you on what we have found regarding the liquidations for the financial options and the 2nd order. The problem began at the end of June when coding in enpower was changed for how the delta was reported for put options only. This change to the delta did not carry through to the liquidation values for and as a result the options were liquidating showing a loss instead of a gain. This resulted in large losses in 2nd order because the p/l that could not be explained due to the incorrect liquidations was placed there. The IT group is working to fix the problem which should be done in the next day or two. Until then, Karim and myself will manually reflect the correct liquidations and p/l in the DPR until Enpower is fixed going forward starting with July 18th p/l.

Karim and I have figured the p/l adjustment that needs to be made for July and the last day of June. The total adjustment is $1,746,675 as follows:

July = $1,529,869 (July 1 - 17)
June 29th = $216,806  

The July adj was captured on July 17th p/l. The June adjustment needs to be captured as PMA adjustment. As result of the DPR being incorrect for June against the financial liquidations report, the liq rec should be out of balance by at least the adjustment noted above. An FYI for accounting, the financial liquidations report is reporting the correct liquidations numbers for any financial put options!!! The problem lies within the Enpower portcalc not the Financial liq report and that is why the lic rec should be out of balance.

John

The total 2nd order up to and including July 16 is (1,891,851)

John,

I just got of the phone with Postlethwaite and he said we will make the adjustment tommorow morning before the final dpr #'s, the correction should add approx. $1.5 million in P&L.  Sorry for the delay in resolving the issue.

I also found out that you had no liquidations in June
and had $22,000 in liquidations in May in your options book (these amounts do not take into consideration any premiums)

Do these #'s seem right to you??? ( I am going off what Postlethwaite has told me).

Karim, I don't want to wait till month end, let's adjust the numbers now and for the June 29 2nd order, lets take that value into June since it relates to July puts.

Hi everyone,

I just got of the phone with Hai and he told me how to make an adjustment on a day to day basis in regards to incorrect liquidations but he also explained this is just to make the daily P&L #'s right, if nothing were done the month end P&L would still somehow work out because adjustments would be made. Does this mean that for June and for a certain portion of July we should not do anything and just make adjustments on a going forward basis (and assume everything will work out at month end)?
If this is the case I would like someone to walk me through June to see if the numbers did really work themselves out as there was a large swing in second order on June 29 that was not adjusted for.

Let me know if one of you could help me do this.
Karim.

Evidently, this a problem that Stacey White has been aware of for a couple of months now. There was a change made in the coding for the delta position and this has somehow messed up the liq value.

John

John, Karim,

I'm now looking closely at the option liquidation problems. I believe that there might be a sign-flipping problem for PUTS that 's causing this whole issue. I'll keep you posted.
Karim - this's likely the explanation to your other question... I'll get back to you as soon as I have more info (hopefully later today)

Marcelo L. Meira
Sr IT Developer
Enron Networks - Houston, TX
(713) 345-3436

The post id I am looking at for Calgary is 11608. I am looking at the option liquidation report and all of the $65 puts are in the money and the $75 call is also in the money. Shouldn't all the liquidation values from the beginning of the month be a negative (representing positive liquidation) for the puts? The liq value for the call is CORRECT.

John

Karim, I don't want to wait till month end, let's adjust the numbers now and for the June 29 2nd order, lets take that value into June since it relates to July puts.

Hi everyone,

I just got of the phone with Hai and he told me how to make an adjustment on a day to day basis in regards to incorrect liquidations but he also explained this is just to make the daily P&L #'s right, if nothing were done the month end P&L would still somehow work out because adjustments would be made. Does this mean that for June and for a certain portion of July we should not do anything and just make adjustments on a going forward basis (and assume everything will work out at month end)?
If this is the case I would like someone to walk me through June to see if the numbers did really work themselves out as there was a large swing in second order on June 29 that was not adjusted for.

Let me know if one of you could help me do this.
Karim.

Evidently, this a problem that Stacey White has been aware of for a couple of months now. There was a change made in the coding for the delta position and this has somehow messed up the liq value.

John

John, Karim,

I'm now looking closely at the option liquidation problems. I believe that there might be a sign-flipping problem for PUTS that 's causing this whole issue. I'll keep you posted.
Karim - this's likely the explanation to your other question... I'll get back to you as soon as I have more info (hopefully later today)

Marcelo L. Meira
Sr IT Developer
Enron Networks - Houston, TX
(713) 345-3436

The post id I am looking at for Calgary is 11608. I am looking at the option liquidation report and all of the $65 puts are in the money and the $75 call is also in the money. Shouldn't all the liquidation values from the beginning of the month be a negative (representing positive liquidation) for the puts? The liq value for the call is CORRECT.

John

unable to attend at that time due to a prior appointment,  I can meet with you individually later some time

OK, now that I've got your attention - I really am offering free lunch!  I would like to informally get together with you on Wednesday, July 18 at 11:45 am - 1:00 pm (max) to talk about your recruiting experience with Enron Canada.  We're gearing up for our 2001/02 recruiting campaign and we think your experience will help us define what works best and what can be improved in our process.

For those of you in Toronto, I apologize for not being able to schedule this over your lunch time!  However, if you can wait til 2:00pm to eat, go ahead and grab something and expense it!  We'll hook you guys in by videoconference.

I've booked Videoconference Room # 1.  Please let me know whether or not you can attend so I can order enough food.  Thanks!!

should be ok

Kindly confirm your availability to attend an Analyst and Associate Recruiting Meeting scheduled for Thursday, July 26th at 2:00 p.m. (4:00 p.m. Toronto time).  This meeting should not take more than one hour.  The Toronto office will be video conferenced in.

Regards, Nella

Lets try before Fri, as I am planning to take that day off

Attached is the revised draft paper that reflects our conference call with Bob Fagan earlier this week.  I propose we have a conference call with Bob Fagan on Fri July 20 at 1:00 pm Calgary time to discuss any areas of concern/confusion you may have.

Also, would those of you who have not responded to me via email confirming your acceptance of the terms upon which our four companies have agreed to assume cost responsibility for the TCA work on this.  Attached is the letter I originally sent to you on May 10 in this regard. 

 << File: Tabors Conflict Letter Alberta Export 050901.doc >> 

Regards,

Rob

Rob,

This draft reflects the changes we discussed during our call the other day.
I've also included a redlined draft showing changes.

Regards,
Bob

 <<Alberta Transmission Access and Pricing Analysis_0712 .doc>>
 <<Alberta Transmission Access and Pricing Analysis_0712 redlined .doc>>

 - Alberta Transmission Access and Pricing Analysis_0712 .doc << File: Alberta Transmission Access and Pricing Analysis_0712 .doc >> 
 - Alberta Transmission Access and Pricing Analysis_0712 redlined .doc << File: Alberta Transmission Access and Pricing Analysis_0712 redlined .doc >> 

NO

Hi John,

With reference to Article 5, section 5.1 (b), are we going to propose an alternative planned outage to TAU for next year?  

Thanks,
Mike

> The purpose of this email is to address some of the questions you may
> have regarding the gold sector:
>
> *	"Gold stocks are way ahead of the gold price - what's going on?"
>
> *	"The US dollar remains strong - how can gold rally?"
>
> *	"How can gold stocks rally when inflation remains so tame?"
>
> The following charts (found in the attached Word document - sourced
> from Bloomberg) illustrate the relationship of gold stocks and bullion
> to several other important variables: $US, CRB, CPI, and TSE Metals
> and Minerals Index.
>
> We hope that you will agree with our conclusions that based on the
> response of these variables at the end of the last recession:
>
> 1) It is reasonable to see bullion lag the gold stocks in this
> economic environment (end of Fed easing).
>
> 2) Gold/gold stocks CAN rally in the face of a strong US dollar.
>
> 3) Gold/gold stocks rise on the threat of inflation - not necessarily
> the appearance of inflation itself.
>
> Chad Williams
> TD Newcrest
> 416-308-2360
>
>  <<Bloomberg_gold_charts.doc>>

 - Bloomberg_gold_charts.doc 

1 user of accumap

 I'll look into the other issues, I just thought that you may know who may be handling it, we may just do it directly from Calgary

John:

I have not found anyone who was trying to renew these contracts.  I am meeting with IHS on Thursday so I will make sure we add Accumap.  How many user of Accumap will you need?  I will forward the cost to you prior to sending the contracts to UBS.  

Do you know who managed the contracts with NOVA, Power Pool of Alberta, OASIS or ESBI so that I can gather contact information and begin the contract management of these applications.

Thanks,

Danielle  

I have no knowledge of anyone looking into the resources listed.

Chris

Chris / Lloyd:

To answer John's question do you know if anyone is looking into NOVA, Power Pool of Alberta, OASIS, or ESBI ? 

Thanks,

Danielle

Danielle, in general we need everything that Houston gets in addition to the info that is listed as Calgary on your spreadsheet.  One information source in not listed on your sheet.

IHS Accumap		Priority 2	Contact: Carmen (403) 770-4503 phone, (403) 874-4218 cell

Can you tell me if anyone in Houston is working on setting up accounts with NOVA, Power Pool of Alberta, OASIS, ESBI?  These are gas and power related entities that we have to have accounts with the schedule physical gas and electricity.

John:

Here are the contracts we are currently creating with UBS.  Please verify that we have not missed any applications/publications or subscriptions.  

Highlight in Red the systems you will need and mark the priority from 1-5,  1 being critical.

Thank you,

Danielle 

 << File: md.xls >>   

Offer price is $61.50
Hi John;

I have a commitment (signed application) from the client to contract for power from Enron Direct. I now need to fix the price with you. I had given the attached spreadsheet to Jason last week and the load following ratio was calculated at 1.12 to the flat block pricing. 

The power flow date is July 20, 2001 and ends at 0:00 A.M. on August 1, 2002.

The data on the spreadsheet is the notional quantity of power in kW, for each day, by hour ending, by month. 

Total annual consumption is 3,778,235 kW.

Normally I would get Jason or Shawn to give me the price but I understand they are out of the office for the afternoon.

Please advise me if you need anything else.

Thanks,
Mark Dickin.

  << File: Capri-Trading Price July 11.xls >> 

Dear Participants:

I'm writing to provide you with an update on our progress to launch the
Automated Dispatch and Messaging System, or 'ADaMS' for short. In my May 25
note I outlined the efficiency benefits of the new system, and attached a
copy of our tentative implementation schedule.

Since then, we've been busy testing the product to make sure it meets the
Power Pool's standards for quality, and the expectations of our
participants. And to be frank, at this point in time it doesn't quite
measure up. We feel we'd be jeopardizing the quality of the product to meet
the timeline. And that's not the way we do business. Instead, we've decided
to shift the launch to early September 2001. The change will also provide
additional time for participants to prepare, especially during the summer
holiday season, and allow for more one-on-one training with individual
participants as requested.

Our technical staff will be contacting you in July, to ensure you can
connect to the system and receive test dispatches.  Also, we will contact
you with a firmer implementation schedule as we approach September.

In the meantime, if you have any questions please feel free to contact
either myself at (403) 233-6491, or your respective Participant Liaison
listed below.

Company Name:   A-E  Elizabeth Vergara (403) 233-6405
elizabeth.vergara@powerpool.ab.ca

				F-Z  Karen Mazuryk (403) 705-8509
karen.mazuryk@powerpool.ab.ca

Thank you for your cooperation.

Sincerely,
POWER POOL OF ALBERTA

Alastair Stewart,
Manager, Customer and Corporate Services
alastair.stewart@powerpool.ab.ca

 

This is not just a July 6 issue.  Before June 29, my 2nd order effects have been less thatn 15000 CDN$.

For the following days, my 2nd order effects have been:

June 29		C$ (216,729)
July 2		C$ (140,533)
July 3		C$ (212,285)
July 5		C$ (117,156)
July 6		C$ (385,535)
July 9		C$ (264,504)

What is going on?  Can you explain ?

The following is a summary of our findings regarding the high 2nd order for option deal 638008 , effective date July 6, previous date July 5:

The total deal daily change: -172899 is correct.
The historical greeks and curve shift are correct. They add up to -62084
The daily liquidation value  [196872] is not correct, and is pushing the 2nd order to a very high (highly negative) amount. Upon examining the option liquidation report, we find that there is $43680 in liquidation and $153192 in expiring options. 
This totals to $196872. The issue is, the expiring options are no longer part of the option's effective date value, and they were part of the previous date's value (since they hadn't expired yet). Therefore, the liquidation values should be:
Liq: $43680
Expired: -$153198

which totals to a negative value of -109512. If we use this value (-109512) in the daily liquidation column (which arguably could be split between liquidation and expiry) instead of the current value (196872), which results in a second order value of -1297.

We are still discussing the causes and implications of this issue. Please let us know if you have any further questions or if you have any issues with this explanation.

Regards,

Marcelo L. Meira
Sr IT Developer
Enron Networks - Houston, TX
(713) 345-3436

Can you explain this in english to me??

This just talks about July 6, what about the days since June 29.

I hope that the curves for today came down ok.
The following is a summary of our findings regarding the high 2nd order for option deal 638008 , effective date July 6, previous date July 5:

The total deal daily change: -172899 is correct.
The historical greeks and curve shift are correct. They add up to -62084
The daily liquidation value  [196872] is not correct, and is pushing the 2nd order to a very high (highly negative) amount. Upon examining the option liquidation report, we find that there is $43680 in liquidation and $153192 in expiring options. 
This totals to $196872. The issue is, the expiring options are no longer part of the option's effective date value, and they were part of the previous date's value (since they hadn't expired yet). Therefore, the liquidation values should be:
Liq: $43680
Expired: -$153198

which totals to a negative value of -109512. If we use this value (-109512) in the daily liquidation column (which arguably could be split between liquidation and expiry) instead of the current value (196872), which results in a second order value of -1297.

We are still discussing the causes and implications of this issue. Please let us know if you have any further questions or if you have any issues with this explanation.

Regards,

Marcelo L. Meira
Sr IT Developer
Enron Networks - Houston, TX
(713) 345-3436

John,

I lost the following on 2nd order in the options book (in Canadian $):

June 29: 	(216,759)
July 2:		(140,533)
July 3:		(212,285)
July 5:		(117,156)
July 6:		(385,535)
July 9:		(264,504)

Total		(1,336,772)

Prior to June 29, the largest 2nd order was <15,000 

I think you need to do this.  They want the info today for PRC reasons.
Hi John,
As I mentioned in my voice mail, Louise has asked that we confirm the information on the attachment, and if appropriate, allocate funds to everyone involved with these deals. We initially assigned the funds to your name because there were not any names listed in the Risk Books for these deals. (please refer to Canada-Zufferli on the Originator tab.)

If you could, please let me know your thoughts by the end of day today per her request.  I'm at x30352 if you have any questions. Thanks!

Hi Louise,

As requested, attached is a file that contains June YTD Originations by Originator.

We've arranged the file in the following sorts:

by team
by Originator (sorted alphabetically)
by Originator (sorted by value)
Top 10 Overall Originators by Value
Top 10 Originators- Gas
Top 10 Originators- Power

An item to note is that not all deals had a related individual's name (such as Enduser)- we left the listing as it appears in the Risk Book in these cases.

We'll send you an update if the DPR amounts move (the DPR isn't final yet.)

Please let me know if you need any additional information!

 

home number is (403) 685-4817

Here is the hedge summary for July 3/01.

Two things to note are: 	1) I bought 125 MW of Cal 02 flat from Mirant for a 10 GJ/MWh heat rate
			2) There is now a 20 year AECO basis curve, so the fixed price AECO gas from cal 15 on is generated off this curve.  Before the AECO basis
				curve stopped at Cal 14 

according to the packet that was distributed in the meeting today with BC, it appears that Calpine, El Paso, Williams, AEC Marketing, AEC Storage are all FEB 1, this doesn't jive with what you just sent, wassup?

Further to our meeting today, please find attached the list of contracts ECC is taking the view are properly terminated and the dates of such termination (in ECC's opinion).  This list was last updated on January 9, 2002 before I went away, so Bryan, if there are any other counterparties that should be added to the list, can you please let Kyle, Eric, John and myself know as soon as possible?

Thanks
Greg

 << File: terminated agreements.Jan9.doc >> 

I sent you an update of the Hedge Summary for July 3, 2001.

In that I mentioned that I bought 125 MW of Cal02 at 10 HR flat.  I am long over 500 MW at this heat rate.  The biggest risk in this position is a large hydro year that
tanks the Mid-C (i.e. uncorrelated event with gas).  Mid-C off-peak is $47 USD, Nymex fixed price for Cal02 is $3.79 USD and Sumas basis is $0.16 for Cal02.  This implies a heat rate of close to 
11.9 for the off-peak Mid-C.

I am thinking about buying back some AECO gas hedge for Cal02, then selling Mid-C off-peak to replace the gas hedge.  Perhaps as winter blow-out protection, buy some Jan-Feb Sumas basis.  

The trade for a 25 MW long Alberta flat position would be:
			a) sell 25 MW of Mid-C off-peak
			b) buy 0.25 contracts /day of AECO fixed price Cal02 gas (i.e. to unwind the off-peak Alberta portion of the the gas hedge)
			c) buy 0.25 contracts/day of Sumas Jan-Feb basis

See what you think??

I sent you an update of the Hedge Summary for July 3, 2001.

In that I mentioned that I bought 125 MW of Cal02 at 10 HR flat.  I am long over 500 MW at this heat rate.  The biggest risk in this position is a large hydro year that
tanks the Mid-C (i.e. uncorrelated event with gas).  Mid-C off-peak is $47 USD, Nymex fixed price for Cal02 is $3.79 USD and Sumas basis is $0.16 for Cal02.  This implies a heat rate of close to 
11.9 for the off-peak Mid-C.

I am thinking about buying back some AECO gas hedge for Cal02, then selling Mid-C off-peak to replace the gas hedge.  Perhaps as winter blow-out protection, buy some Jan-Feb Sumas basis.  

The trade for a 25 MW long Alberta flat position would be:
			a) sell 25 MW of Mid-C off-peak
			b) buy 0.25 contracts /day of AECO fixed price Cal02 gas (i.e. to unwind the off-peak Alberta portion of the the gas hedge)
			c) buy 0.25 contracts/day of Sumas Jan-Feb basis

See what you think??

Here is the hedge summary for July 3/01.

Two things to note are: 	1) I bought 125 MW of Cal 02 flat from Mirant for a 10 GJ/MWh heat rate
			2) There is now a 20 year AECO basis curve, so the fixed price AECO gas from cal 15 on is generated off this curve.  Before the AECO basis
				curve stopped at Cal 14 

FYI

Enron Canada Corp.
3500 Canterra Tower
400 - 3rd Avenue S.W.
Calgary, Alberta
T2P 4H2
Tel:=09(403) 974-6717
Fax:=09(403) 974-6706

This information is provided to you pursuant to your request and is provide=
d solely for informational purposes and without prejudice or limitation to =
any rights of Enron Canada Corp. or any of its affiliates.  This informatio=
n reflects internal calculations made by Enron Canada Corp. which may or ma=
y not have been calculated in accordance with the provisions of any agreeme=
nts between Enron Canada Corp. or any of its affiliates and you, and such i=
nformation is subject to change at any time.  Further, Enron Canada Corp. a=
nd its affiliates make no representation or warranty, and shall have no lia=
bility whatsoever, relating to the accuracy, currency or completeness of th=
is information and no person receiving this information shall, or is entitl=
ed to, rely on this information in any manner whatsoever.  This information=
 is not intended to, and shall not in any way, bind or otherwise impose any=
 legal or equitable obligation on Enron Canada Corp. or any of its affiliat=
es (which are expressly released).

      Just a note as I had spoken to each of you over the course of the
      last year on our Oatt. I have attached copies of our news release
      from yesterdays announcements. Our web site should be populated later
      today and have many of the documents and  a time line on the opening
      of our system.

      If you have questions please call me at 306 566 3794, or Ted Quade at
      306 566 3075

      John Mckenzie
      Manager Stategic Corporate Development
      Saskpower

      (See attached file: OATTquestionsWS.doc)(See attached file:
      tariff.wpd)

 - OATTquestionsWS.doc=20
 - tariff.wpd

Hello!  toddjanzen@home.com has just sent you an Egreetings.com card!

To view your greeting, simply click on this pickup window link:

http://www.egreetings.com/view.pd?i=30458652&m=7157&rr=y&source=eg999

If your e-mail doesn't recognize the above address as a link, simply copy and paste it in your browser address window.
If you need further help, visit our Help pages at http://egreetings.custhelp.com/.

Your Friends at Egreetings.com

Okay, I feel like a bit of a spaz... I was trying to send an e-greeting out
and forgot to include the date & venue.... Those who get the email tomorrow,
here's the missing details... BTW, you will be getting another on the 6th...
sorry!!

Lauren Janzen's First Birthday Party
Saturday July 14, 2001
Start time - anytime after 2:00 pm, she will be awake by then

Please do not bring anything, especially presents, you should see how much
our house looks like a toy store already.  If you can, send me a qick reply
if you can make it.

 <<...OLE_Obj...>> 

The implementation of the Automated Dispatch Messaging System (ADMS) from
the Power Pool of Alberta is proceeding on schedule, however, the processes
for implementation and training are changing slightly as described below.
The purpose of this memo is to inform all of the participants who have been
contacted for the implementation of ADMS of the processes over the next few
weeks and the requirements for the implementation at your dispatch
locations.

Beginning the week of July 2, 2001 and continuing through July 13, 2001,
Power Pool staff will be contacting you individually to provide you with
your username and password and ensure that you are able to log into the web
site.  This initial web site will be on a development system that is not
connected to the active market system.  This will enable participants to log
onto the system to become familiar with the screens and user features as
well as receive test dispatches.

Beginning the week of July 16, 2001, the Power Pool will turn off the
development system web server and transfer to the active market system.  The
System Controller area will contact each participant and "walk you through"
the screens and answer any questions that you may have regarding use of the
system.  Once you are familiar with the system through this conversation,
future active dispatches will then be provided over the ADMS system.  The
sequential addition of participants to the system will enable the orderly
transfer from the voice dispatch process to the automated process with a
minimum of disruption in the dispatch process.

The above process changes the manner in which training will be provided.  In
reviewing the user screens, we believe that participants will be able to
understand how to use the system simply by having access to the system prior
to the implementation.  If there is any difficulties encountered using the
system, the System Controllers will be available to assist you with any
questions as your users begin to use the dispatch system.

The majority of you have indicated that your computer equipment is in place
and that you are ready to start implementation.  If you are unable to start
the implementation process on July 2, 2001, please let the Power Pool
contact know and he will arrange to schedule your user names, passwords and
access closer to July 16, 2001.

The implementation of digital certificates to enhance the security of the
system will be delayed for a short period of time to enable a newer and
simpler digital certificate system.  We believe that by implementing without
the digital certificates, fewer implementation problems will be encountered
and will also simplify the digital certificate installation process with
users at a later date.  Our implementation of username and password
protection combined with server certification provides adequate security in
the short term before the digital certificates are incorporated.

As we discussed, the system provides audible alerts for the users when a
dispatch is received.  I am attaching six files that contains audible alert
sounds for you to load on your computers.  To install these .wav files on
your computers, create a folder
			C:\\PPOA\admin_sounds
and copy these files to the new folder.  Your internet browser will then use
these files for the audible alerts that are provided by the system.  You can
review this with the person who will be contacting you with usernames and
passwords if there is difficulty implementing these alert sounds.

As the implementation portion of the ADMS project moves to the operational
area of the Power Pool, contact points with the Power Pool will change.
Effective immediately, would you please use the following contact names for
work on the ADMS implementation.

		Primary contact:
				Jack Kelly
				(403) 233-6410
				jack.kelly@powerpool.ab.ca
<mailto:jack.kelly@powerpool.ab.ca>

		Secondary contact:
				Jerry Mossing
				(403) 233-6409
				jerry.mossing@powerpool.ab.ca
<mailto:jerry.mossing@powerpool.ab.ca>

Thank you very much for your cooperation in getting this system underway.

Barry Rushford

 <<directive.wav>>  <<energy.wav>>  <<load_shed.wav>>  <<regulation.wav>>
<<reserve.wav>>  <<interchange.wav>>

 - directive.wav 
 - energy.wav 
 - load_shed.wav 
 - regulation.wav 
 - reserve.wav 
 - interchange.wav 

Colleagues
Arising from comments received from Friday to yesterday, Watt-Ex has
incorporated a number of changes into this executable Version 1 of the
referenced document.

We are attaching a blackline copy and clean copy of this document for your
perusal.  We believe we have been able to accommodate most of the change
requests -- but not all.  We would be pleased to respond to any comments you
may have on the changes as well as those we have not included.

The key modifications from Draft 3 to this Version 1 relate to the
following:
	1) 3011. and 3209.  Failure to Supply:  Liquidated damages have been capped
both for non-System Events and System Events.  The original context of costs
attributable to liquidated damages included WSCC penalties -- the caps serve
to limit the total amount of liquidated damages claimed against the failed
supplier.  In addition, the penalties under (b) (i) in both sections have
been removed.
	2) 204.  Code of Conduct:  This section has been beefed up to provide a
directive concerning any potential market manipulation that could cause WSCC
penalties to be applied.
	3) 116.  Mediation and Arbitration Procedure: The Mediation procedure has
been modified to allow the parties the option of proceeding directly to
arbitration if they so wish and have applied a finite completion time on the
process.
	4) Schedule 6, 6000.  General:  Applied direction of applicability of
sections to Transmission Administrator
	5) 6004.08  Additional Security:  Due to exposure on liquidated damages,
Watt-Ex is requiring that Sellers post security for same within 90 days
(this is roughly timed for October trading) unless there is sufficient
Receivables to cover.

We would again request your indulgence to review and execute this Version 1
as soon as possible.  In this regard, we request that customers complete
pages 1-3 of the document plus individual Schedule 2's for each Ancillary
Service Facility and fax a signed copy of pages 1-3 plus the Schedule 2's to
Watt-Ex to immediately activate your trading privileges.  Please mail the
originals to Watt-Ex, we will execute and return your file copy.

If there are any outstanding items you wish to have considered/reconsidered,
Watt-Ex will accept such written comments for consideration in a future
version of this Customer Document.

Watt-Ex is also prepared to provide any of the following documents if it
will assist you in attaining comfort with all the attendant infrastructure
surrounding the operations of the Exchange.  Please advise if you wish a
copy of any/all of these documents.

	1) Alberta Securities Commission Exemption Order
	2) The NCM insurance binder document for the credit backstop arrangements
	3) Deposit Agreement with Watt-Ex's Trustee, Royal Trust Corporation of
Canada
	4) Confirmation of ESBI Alberta Ltd.'s Credit Approval to $20 million.

If you have any questions or comments, please contact the undersigned by
return e-mail or call 403-210-8222, 403-210-2144 or 780-940-2820 (cell).
Thanks
Doug Andrews

 - Blackline Ancillary Services Market Agreement ver1 final .pdf 
 - Ancillary Services Market Agreement ver1 final.pdf 

yes thanks John

Thanks for checking. Did you get my other message about your OR positions for Jan 11?

Yes, he said to leave the reports the same as it is now

John, did you have a chance to talk to John L about the exec reports setup?

John

To continue getting familiar with Ontario, please review the document OEFC_demandSupp_UBS.ppt on your I:/common/OEFC directory.  It is a presentation we gave to OEFC in the fall.

Here is a spreadsheet with additional information.
 
Some intertie information may vary from source to source.  This is due to the IMO's regular small adjustments to the capacity numbers.

GT

Yes, he said to leave the reports the same as it is now

John, did you have a chance to talk to John L about the exec reports setup?

John

 Enron Canada bids a fond farewell to Jon McKay who is heading back to the =
trading group in Houston later this summer.  This will be Jon's second tour=
 of duty south of the border.  During his time with us, Jon has contributed=
 significantly to Enron Canada and will be missed.  Congratulations and bes=
t of luck, Jon!

Effective today, John Zufferli will be assuming responsibility for Gas Trad=
ing in Canada in addition to his responsibility for Power Trading.  John st=
arted his career with Enron in the U.S. but came home to his native land at=
 the end of 2000.  Congrats on your new role, John!

<Embedded Picture (Metafile)>

I tried to answer you but my response was returned undelivered.  Basically, the pool is agnostic, it pays power producers for the pyhsical energy delivered to the grid and it charges power consumers for energy taken from the grid.  Any financial arrangements between the buyers and sellers are not known to the pool.  The only mechanism the pool uses for physical power transactions is the direct sale mechanism.  The terms and volume of these direct sales are entered in the pool's trading system.  The pool then subracts the volume of the direct sale from the consumers and producers meter and pays/charges the producer/consumer on the net volume (i.e actual production-direct sales or actual consumption-direct sales)

John,

Can you shed some light?

Derek/John,
 
Quick question... from what I have read, it  appears as though the way the Power Pool works, the Pool settles with the buyers  and sellers each month.  However,what happens when we contract with a  counterparty directly?  Does the pool collect payment due for energy  delivered under a bilateral contract and then forward payment onto the  supplying party?  Or does the financial settlement occur directly between  Enron and the counterparty?  Please advise,
 
Thanks,
 
Wendy
 
 
PS-Please reply to my email address at work.   wendy.conwell@enron.com << File: mailto:wendy.conwell@enron.com >> .
 
PSS-  Hey John...The Rimrock was beautiful and  dinner was incredible!  Thanks for the  recommendation.

I just need the positions aggregated, I don't need the desks broken out

Here are you curves for Jan 11. Let me know how you want to see your positions.

John

 << File: Energy Curve 0111.xls >>  << File: Op curve 0111.xls >> 

ESBI is holding an open forum on the development of its 2002 and 2003 - 200=
x tariffs on Wed from 1:00pm - 4:00 pm.  Included on the agenda is a discus=
sion of the proposed project plan for the development and implementation of=
 a congestion management mechanism. =20

I will be attending.  You are welcome to send any of your guys also. =20

On a related note, I went through my comments with Bob Fagan on Friday and =
he expects to turn around a revised version of his paper by Tuesday that we=
 will be able to send to Engage, TAU, and Encore.

Regards,

Rob

=20

 <<invitataionstakeholdersJune27.doc>>  <<Agenda.June20.doc>>
<<planphase1June20.doc>>  <<planprioritiesJune20.doc>>
<<prioritiesJune20.doc>>

 - invitataionstakeholdersJune27.doc=20
 - Agenda.June20.doc=20
 - planphase1June20.doc=20
 - planprioritiesJune20.doc=20
 - prioritiesJune20.doc

Hello! david & gretchen has just sent you a greeting card from Bluemountain.com.

You can pick up your personal message here:

http://www5.bluemountain.com/cards/boxe225657b3/egm8xf6rzng3hp.html

Your card will be available for the next 90 days

This service is 100% FREE! :) Have a good day and have fun!

Send FREE Blue Mountain cards to friends and family (and attach gifts too!)
http://www.bluemountain.com

Financial settlement occurs between Enron and the customer.  The pool is agnostic to what its participants do (i.e. generators that do 3rd party physical hedge are still paid by the pool, consumers of electricity who do 3rd party physical hedges also pay the pool)

Derek/John,
 
Quick question... from what I have read, it  appears as though the way the Power Pool works, the Pool settles with the buyers  and sellers each month.  However,what happens when we contract with a  counterparty directly?  Does the pool collect payment due for energy  delivered under a bilateral contract and then forward payment onto the  supplying party?  Or does the financial settlement occur directly between  Enron and the counterparty?  Please advise,
 
Thanks,
 
Wendy
 
 
PS-Please reply to my email address at work.   wendy.conwell@enron.com << File: mailto:wendy.conwell@enron.com >> .
 
PSS-  Hey John...The Rimrock was beautiful and  dinner was incredible!  Thanks for the  recommendation.

I will attend

TransAlta is having a Stampede Party.  Everyone should have received an invitation.  Details are as follows

TransAlta's 1st Stampede Celebration

DATE:			MONDAY JULY 9, 2001

TIME:			5 P.M. UNTIL 11 P.M.

LOCATION:		MASCALERO'S
			1315 - 1ST STREET SW

PLEASE LET ME KNOW IF YOU WILL OR WILL NOT BE ATTENDING.  THEY ARE TRYING TO GET A FINAL HEAD COUNT

I will call TransAlta and let them know if you are attending or not.

Thank you

Angela 

I hope stock goes to $35 so I can buy it at reasonable levels.  Things are well here.

Hey John:

Will be in your old town next week, plan to get together with Fisher and
Cunningham and to meet Meghan Fisher for the first time.....

You have any thoughts/insight on when the bleeding stops on your stock, and
others like ILA, RRI, DYN, EPG?  Looks to me like investors are no longer
wowed by big earnings from the western markets and are very concerned about
sustainability of some very high earnings growth rate projections.  Also
curious as to how this has impacted morale vis a vis stock options and if
management is commenting.....

Hope all is well with you!

_____________________________________________________
Dale F. Meyerhoeffer
Millennium Partners, L.P.
(212) 841-4162

Please give Enpower access to Murray Fichten, John Messenger, Mike Taylor, Tyler Seminuk

garrett, you should look into buying an advanced ticket to come up to calgary for a week in a week or so, we can go through next steps, fundies, etc.

BTW, we got 3 feet of snow in the mountains this weekend, powder everywhere!!!

To continue getting familiar with Ontario, please review the document OEFC_demandSupp_UBS.ppt on your I:/common/OEFC directory.  It is a presentation we gave to OEFC in the fall.

Here is a spreadsheet with additional information.
 << File: QuickINFO.xls >> 
Some intertie information may vary from source to source.  This is due to the IMO's regular small adjustments to the capacity numbers.

GT

Dear Travelocity.ca Customer,

We were excited to see a major fare sale today and wanted to share
this Special Offer with you! Air Canada has lowered airfares to
many popular summer destinations. This major summer fare sale has
return fares starting from $128!* But hurry, tickets must be
purchased by June 22nd!

Here are some sample return fares:
      - $128   Vancouver - Calgary
      - $198   Toronto -  Montreal
      - $349   Vancouver - San Francisco
      - $429   Calgary - Toronto
      - $549   Ottawa - Vancouver
      - $549   Toronto - Vancouver
*Prices are in Canadian Dollars.

Click below for more details!
http://go.travelocity.com/cgi-bin/j2.cgi?cid=4120027507aa

Here are a few details to keep in mind when considering this offer:
 - Tickets must be purchased by June 22, 2001.
 - For Canadian and U.S. destinations, travel must be completed
   by August 30, 2001.
 - 7-day advance purchase required.
 - Prices quoted are return fares, quoted in Canadian dollars and
    subject to inventory allocation.

ACT FAST...
Most of these airfares are available for sale only through early
next week! Book online today for the best selection. Use the
Travelocity.ca Best Fare Finder or Dream Maps feature to see the
best return airfares to your destination!

Enjoy your Summer vacation!

Regards,

The Travelocity.ca Staff
http://www.travelocity.ca/

If you don't want to receive information on other great offers
like this from Travelocity.ca, please click on the following
link:
http://dps1.travelocity.com:80/promoptout.ctl?email=JOHN.ZUFFERLI@ENRON.COM

*Total fare per passenger, including all charges, will always be
displayed to you prior to final ticket purchase.  Please note
that fares are subject to restrictions, may not be available on
all flights, and may change without notice.  For detailed
descriptions of the fare rules, click on the corresponding rules
link.

 

John,

I did not receive the Alberta Power Hedge Summary yesturday.  Could you please send it to me.

Thanks

k

Kimberly Hillis
Assistant to the President and CEO
Enron Americas
713-853-0681 - Phone
713-646-3227 - Fax

Group,

Going forward we will be transacting with Enron Canada Corp on an over-the-counter basis.  We will provide them with a bid and an offer suitable for non-firm energy trades.  Enron Canada will contact us each morning to inquire about possibilities for export and import.  We should be familiar with the Alberta Power Pool forecast and be aware of the conversion from CDD to USD.  The lead or NW trader will provide Enron Canada with their estimate or feel of the market each morning and throughout the day.  

Enron Canada will be trying to obtain non-firm transmission nearly every hour.  WE need to tell them if this is an unwise practice from a risk-reward standpoint based on our understanding of the market, as they will lose around $7 per mw (CDD) on unused transmission with zero chance for return.  

Further, Enron Canada wants the opportunity to transact with other counterparties at the BC Border.  They will give us the first look, but if we cannot use their energy, they will contact WWP, IPC, TransAlta or other counterparty in an attempt to recoup some of their loss.  I do not see a need for this and I think it leaves us open to tainted customer relationships, financial loss, and embarrassment.  If we are in contact with Enron Canada before the fact (start of the day, top of the hour, etc.) we should be able to get them the best price for their energy.  Be very clear in your dealings with NW counterparties that you are buying or selling a non-firm product.  Determine a book-out price to solve problems with physical flow if necessary.  We are basically buying a put or a call and should pay our counterparty appropriately.

Thanks,
Bill

		Attached, please find a draft set of meeting notes from our
meeting. Please advise if there are any errors or omissions in the notes.
I've also attached copies of the presentations made at the meeting. If you
have any questions, please don't hesitate to call.
		 <<MtgNotes_gen_outage_010614draft.doc>>  <<ppa-ipp
meeting_010612.ppt>>  <<Presentation to workgroup_010614.ppt>>
		Fred Ritter, P. Eng.
		Technical Services
		ESBI Alberta Ltd.
		Phone: (403) 705-5224
		Cell: (403) 813-9471
		Web site: www.eal.ab.ca <http://www.eal.ab.ca>

				-----Original Message-----
				You, or a representative from your
organization, are invited to attend a meeting on June 14, 2001 from 10am to
12pm in our offices. It has been some time since the group has met and in
the mean time we have put some processes in place to address the ongoing
supply adequacy concerns within Alberta. Thank you for your support. We
would like to review how the current processes are working and examine areas
for improvement. We have proposed the following agenda.

*	Review of current coordination practices
*	Information posting practices
*	System Controller practices - re: coordination
*	Information requirements for 2002 - update of maintenance by October
*	System Restoration requirements
*	Other issues?

				Please confirm your attendance by June 8,
2001. If you are unable to attend, perhaps you would like to be telephone
conferenced into the meeting. Please confirm.
				Also, please advise if you have any other
agenda items.

				Thanks.

				Fred Ritter, P. Eng.
				Technical Services
				ESBI Alberta Ltd.
				Phone: (403) 705-5224
				Cell: (403) 813-9471
				Web site: www.eal.ab.ca
<http://www.eal.ab.ca>

 - MtgNotes_gen_outage_010614draft.doc 
 - ppa-ipp meeting_010612.ppt 
 - Presentation to workgroup_010614.ppt 

I was meaning to give you a call this week and inquire as to when you guys are planning to come up.  Things are good here.  Feeling poor as well.

How are things going up there?  Kristen and I are trying to come with some way to come see you guys, even as our wealth is slowly going down with the ENE ship!

John

John Lavorato already said that he would make JD report directly to Canada.

John, one thing to consider with your nat gas org is the reporting of disturnal to john arnold. From my standpoint, this was an unfortunate move and is similar to us losing the east gas desk to Houston. You will want to give this careful consideration, particularly if you are looking to disturnal to trade alberta power options. With the change in leadership we should discuss whether we want to grab disturnal back (solid line reporting) and suggest dotted line to arnold.

fyi - his P&L for accounting purposes continues to roll-up to canada. However, for internal mgmt reporting, his p&l rolls up to arnold. 

Here are my comments on the original guarantee

My phone is 974-6749

 

Herer are some more.  look at hwy 59 right by our house!!!! love you - jess
> amazingly unbelievably astounding!!!
>

 - FLOOD1.jpg 
 - flood2.jpg 
 - flood3.jpg 
 - flood4.jpg 
 - flood5.jpg 

Check these out!  Will you be late again?  Like 8pm or so?  Progress on the
yard but no mudders.  Can you ask about Derek's wife's doctor?  lemme know
what time you might be home.  love, jess
>
>
> Thought you would find this interesting.  The pictures are of the tunnels
in
> Houston.  Have you heard from Lori?  Did they get flooded?
 - MVC00064.JPG 
 - MVC00046.JPG 
 - MVC00050.JPG 

Here is the list updated with responsibility names.

 

Here is the spreadsheet that I sent you at the beginning of the year when we set the curve marks to show the NPV 600,0000 CDN.
These are the heat rates that I am referencing in the Hedge Summary sheet.

 

 
If you look at the Cal 03-Cal 10 period, you see that there are roughly 25,000,000 MWh.  Two days ago, 1 had only 6.5 contracts/day hedged.
In the past two days, I sold 2.5 contracts/day.  In the past two days, the Cal 03-10 swap has increased C$0.47.

 
If you look at the Cal 03-Cal 10 period, you see that there are roughly 25,000,000 MWh.  Two days ago, 1 had only 6.5 contracts/day hedged.
In the past two days, I sold 2.5 contracts/day.  In the past two days, the Cal 03-10 swap has increased C$0.47.

Does this information reflect the additions of the IBOC or not? Otherwise the info seems to be what is going on right now.

Attached is what is apparently a revised export level chart that discloses export levels relative to intra-Alberta load.  Are we in a position to agree/disagree with these figures and/or provide any comments back to EAL? 

Dear All,

In keeping with work-overload-tradition the wrong attachment was added to
the previous email (below).  Attached is the table discussed in the email
sent out earlier this afternoon.

   <<op-333-update.xls>>
Please accept our apologies for this inconvenience.

Jennifer M. Churchill-Browne
Engineering Clerk
ESBI Alberta Ltd.
Phone: 403-705-5264
Fax: 403-266-2128
Email: jennifer.churchill-brown@eal.ab.ca
For the latest information from Alberta's Transmission Administrator, visit
our web site at www.eal.ab.ca

 - op-333-update.xls << File: op-333-update.xls >> 

		For those wishing to conference into the meeting , please
note the following:

Those outside of Calgary would call 1 888 832 0082 and then Enter Code 2345
and then the pound key (#)

Those in Calgary would call 216 0900 and enter code 2345 and then the pound
key(#)

		Let me know if you have any questions.
		Thanks

		Fred Ritter, P. Eng.
		Technical Services
		ESBI Alberta Ltd.
		Phone: (403) 705-5224
		Cell: (403) 813-9471
		Web site: www.eal.ab.ca <http://www.eal.ab.ca>

				-----Original Message-----
				You, or a representative from your
organization, are invited to attend a meeting on June 14, 2001 from 10am to
12pm in our offices. It has been some time since the group has met and in
the mean time we have put some processes in place to address the ongoing
supply adequacy concerns within Alberta. Thank you for your support. We
would like to review how the current processes are working and examine areas
for improvement. We have proposed the following agenda.

*	Review of current coordination practices
*	Information posting practices
*	System Controller practices - re: coordination
*	Information requirements for 2002 - update of maintenance by October
*	System Restoration requirements
*	Other issues?

				Please confirm your attendance by June 8,
2001. If you are unable to attend, perhaps you would like to be telephone
conferenced into the meeting. Please confirm.
				Also, please advise if you have any other
agenda items.

				Thanks.

				Fred Ritter, P. Eng.
				Technical Services
				ESBI Alberta Ltd.
				Phone: (403) 705-5224
				Cell: (403) 813-9471
				Web site: www.eal.ab.ca
<http://www.eal.ab.ca>

				

Yes I am

John,

Are you available at tomorrow at 2:30 CNTR (Houston time) to meet with John?  I will call you.

k

Kimberly Hillis
Assistant to the President and CEO
Enron Americas
713-853-0681 - Phone
713-646-3227 - Fax

I was wondering why I am not eligible yet.  I sent gave my agreement forms to Tricia Henry yesterday.

1) For a full requirements deal, I would like some sense of the load shape of the customer.  Having just monthly total energy consumption is not enough to price a deal.
2) The all requirements price may be less or greater than the peak price, it is dependent on load shape.
3) That is correct.

John
I would like to clarrify how the load following deals for electricity look.  I understand that you are willing to price full load following deals for ED customers for both cummulative and interval meter sites.

1.  What information do you require us to provide you to price a full requirements deal?  We generally see 12 months of average monthly consumption for cummulative meter sites.  Do you need to know which utility the customer is with?  i.e. for NSLS purposes.
2.  How would an all requirements price compare to a peak hour price?
3.  If you were to provide us with a full requirements deal I am assuming that ED would charge/pay  ECC for the delta between the fixed price and the pool price.

The ED standard contract currently does not contemplate a true all requirements deal.  The standard deal structure being used for cummulative meter sites is for a fixed price / volume block of power and for interval meter sites it is a defined volume by hour of the day  for weekdays and weekends by calendar month.

We would appreciate clarrification from you.

 Many thanks

Kate

Danielle, in general we need everything that Houston gets in addition to the info that is listed as Calgary on your spreadsheet.  One information source in not listed on your sheet.

IHS Accumap		Priority 2	Contact: Carmen (403) 770-4503 phone, (403) 874-4218 cell

Can you tell me if anyone in Houston is working on setting up accounts with NOVA, Power Pool of Alberta, OASIS, ESBI?  These are gas and power related entities that we have to have accounts with the schedule physical gas and electricity.

John:

Here are the contracts we are currently creating with UBS.  Please verify that we have not missed any applications/publications or subscriptions.  

Highlight in Red the systems you will need and mark the priority from 1-5,  1 being critical.

Thank you,

Danielle 

 << File: md.xls >>   

can we possibly move this meeting up from 3:30 PM to sooner?

they are working it still

I actually meant for employment :-)  that was the larger concern for me.

love, jess
> subject to mechanical inspection from the Vancouver Porsche dealership.
>
>     -----Original Message-----

subject to mechanical inspection from the Vancouver Porsche dealership.

The pictures are pretty sweetie.  Looks in  great shape.  Did you sign the original documents today?   
 
love, jess

We have traditionally have had currency issues in Canada regarding P&L preservation versus cashflow preservation.

We have been valued in P&L under the US$ but due to Revenue Canada reasons our functional currency has been C$ (i.e.  the preponderence of cashflows were in C$ from the legacy gas deals, PetroCanada, Suncour, etc, and the PPA position).  Since trader evaluation at year end has been in US$, traders would hedge C$ positions immediately as the trade occured.  The hedge would extend until the position rolled of his book.  From a P&L systems point of view, this would preserve the trader's P&L in US$.  However, from a treasury point of view currency risk would still exist until cash exchange hands; these cash exchange dates were different for financial trades, physical trades and inter-company trades.  There was also some currency risk (albeit small) between billing dates from SAP and settlement dates of the respective trade type.

It is my opinion that the functional currency should match the evaluation currency in order to mitigate many of the above problems.  To a certain extent, I am indifferent if it is US$ or C$.

The timeline of the decision is being driven by our accounting group who need to set up the SAP system.  They are trying to work within a deadline to have the company capable of performing transactions by Jan 29.  This is the date that they have been told to meet by Houston.  As a result, we would need a determinination of the functional currency by Mon Jan 28.

you should request this from eric ledain or derek davies, they have the current list

John,

Please provide the list of Canadian Originators.

Thank you,

Stephanie Sever
713-853-3465

Hi John,

The attached are the pictures of the 1996 Carrera 4S.

If you need more pics,please call us again.

Edward Chan

_________________________________________________________________
Send and receive Hotmail on your mobile device: http://mobile.msn.com

 - DSCN0108.JPG 
 - DSCN0109.JPG 
 - DSCN0110.JPG 
 - DSCN0111.JPG 
 - DSCN0112.JPG 
 - DSCN0114.JPG 
 - DSCN0115.JPG 
 - DSCN0116.JPG 
 - DSCN0117.JPG 
 - DSCN0118.JPG 
 - DSCN0119.JPG 
 - DSCN0121.JPG 

yes i gave him a verbal

John, we may be able to do something for Tyler on this issue.  However, I have no record on file of his seeking approval to take the courses (CFA, I believe).  Can you confirm that you gave him verbal approval or that you were aware that he was taking the course, etc.  Thanks....

Dawn,
Is there any way that I can make a tuition reimbursement claim for the fall? The courses finished before I was let go from Enron, but I didn't receive my grades until recently. Cash is getting a bit tight these days, so I would appreciate it very much if there's anything you can do. Let me know.
-Tyler
 
MSN Photos is the easiest way to share and print your photos: Click Here << File: 'http://go.msn.com/bql/hmtag3_etl_EN.asp' >> 

i lifted it last night for 82,000
Hi John,

The attached are the pictures of the 1996 Carrera 4S.

If you need more pics,please call us again.

Edward Chan

_________________________________________________________________
Send and receive Hotmail on your mobile device: http://mobile.msn.com

 - DSCN0108.JPG 
 - DSCN0109.JPG 
 - DSCN0110.JPG 
 - DSCN0111.JPG 
 - DSCN0112.JPG 
 - DSCN0114.JPG 
 - DSCN0115.JPG 
 - DSCN0116.JPG 
 - DSCN0117.JPG 
 - DSCN0118.JPG 
 - DSCN0119.JPG 
 - DSCN0121.JPG 

will this be video conferenced in calgary

UBS have organized an important meeting  will be held tomorrow for all empl=
oyees who :=20

1) have accepted offers or=20
2) intend to accept offers ( to the best of their knowledge) but who have i=
ssues that are being resolved

All employees in these categories should attend

Buses will be provided for those who do not have their own transport and wi=
ll pick up from the south side of the north building - please assemble in t=
he Java plaza area from 8.30am  to 9.30am ( last bus leaves  @ 9.30 am )

The meeting will last until approximately 1pm  and will be presented by sen=
ior managers from UBS on the firm and it's strategy.

There will be breakfast available at the Hotel from 9am to 10am and there w=
ill be sandwiches afterwards. =20

If traveling independently please make sure you leave sufficient time to pa=
rk (it will be very busy) and get to the Grand ballroom

Employees need to bring their id's or drivers license with them to gain acc=
ess to the meeting

I'm sorry for the short notice on this - please call out to anyone who shou=
ld be attending who will not get this message in time=20

Tammie Schoppe=20
on behalf of UBS HR

Can you send me the Jan 18 trades and marks as well as today's trades and marks before 3:00 PM today,  thanks

John 
 

A buddy of mine is selling this stuff and is just starting out, if you need a helmet, contact him.

Howdy!

Here's a better "less busy" flyer to share with all the
snow riders you know!  Thanx.

Smith :)

 - head trip flyer_2002.doc 

no the packages haven't come in.  Kacz's called a we are going to pick up the gift.  Warburg is still progressing, just waiting on offer letters.  I will be in charge of canadian trading, that will include ontario power - a new market that i will have to learn about.

john,

did the package come in?  i can't get a hold of anyone at canada post
did you pick up the gift for jessica?
what's going on with the ubs warburg stuff -- have you worked out your
role?

livia

can you prepare how the ontario market works presentation for myself and derek davies

No I never got the sweater. I was thinking about that on the weekend.  I'll pick up the gift for you.

Hey John,

Did you ever get the sweater i sent you?  If so, does it fit?

Also, i know i'm a bit late (i thought the shower was next week) but i
bought Jess a gift at Kacz' Kids.  Could you pick it up for me?

Lee

hey janet, i haven't received the new phone in number yet, not sure if you have it yet

     Hi.

     The Market Risk Meeting has been scheduled for today at 5:15
     p.m. Houston Time.

     The dial in information is as follows:

     Dial In Number:  203-719-0070

     Freephone within the U.S.:  877-315-5218

     Pin Number:  808787

     Mercy, please reserve a conference room for those participants in
     Houston.

     Thanks.

     jm

Visit our website at http://www.ubswarburg.com

This message contains confidential information and is intended only
for the individual named.  If you are not the named addressee you
should not disseminate, distribute or copy this e-mail.  Please
notify the sender immediately by e-mail if you have received this
e-mail by mistake and delete this e-mail from your system.

E-mail transmission cannot be guaranteed to be secure or error-free
as information could be intercepted, corrupted, lost, destroyed,
arrive late or incomplete, or contain viruses.  The sender therefore
does not accept liability for any errors or omissions in the contents
of this message which arise as a result of e-mail transmission.  If
verification is required please request a hard-copy version.  This
message is provided for informational purposes and should not be
construed as a solicitation or offer to buy or sell any securities or
related financial instruments.

WOW, that was higher than I thought.  That is not much different than mine and higher than other Directors in the office.  I am not blowing smoke, but given my experience, there is nothing that I can do at the immediate time.  

175,000

i don't even know your salary now.

Has there been any real explanation why it is no.....  One small difference between the two is I am not talking about an equalization between C$ and US$ salaries.  Mine is just simply a case of Enron paying under market because they could in the past.  I don't believe that is the case anymore.  Two years ago I was willing to accept less than market to see behind the curtain, but that is no longer the case.  I am not saying that it needs to be in the UBS document, but I would need your word you would do everything in your power to fix it.  If you can honestly tell me that I am paid the max. that is available to Directors I will drop it. 

I am reading your mail, I have asked for the same thing regarding my base. Especially since I came up here with a base salary converted at 1.48 CDN/USD and with no raise since being here at 1.61 CDN/USD I have received a 9% pay cut relative to my peers in Houston.  Not to mention that my base salary is $50-$100 USD/year lower than what other shops are offering.  However, after three attempts, I have been unsuccessful in championing my own cause.

Zuff

Just a quick note after my first look at the numbers.  The only concern I have is with the base number.  Seeing as there is no money up front, the future payments look a lot more like long term comp. than any real signing or retention bonus.  When I came to Enron two years ago I took a $35,000 decrease in base pay in exchange for options and the opportunity to trade for number 1.  That is no longer the case (no options and UBS is not #1) therefore I would look for my base to better reflect market on a go forward basis.  If you are able to accommodate a reasonable adjustment in base I would be very excited about the opportunity to sign with UBS.

I would like to talk about this on Monday, after I have had a chance to look at the paper in full.

Chris.

i don't even know your salary now.

Has there been any real explanation why it is no.....  One small difference between the two is I am not talking about an equalization between C$ and US$ salaries.  Mine is just simply a case of Enron paying under market because they could in the past.  I don't believe that is the case anymore.  Two years ago I was willing to accept less than market to see behind the curtain, but that is no longer the case.  I am not saying that it needs to be in the UBS document, but I would need your word you would do everything in your power to fix it.  If you can honestly tell me that I am paid the max. that is available to Directors I will drop it. 

I am reading your mail, I have asked for the same thing regarding my base. Especially since I came up here with a base salary converted at 1.48 CDN/USD and with no raise since being here at 1.61 CDN/USD I have received a 9% pay cut relative to my peers in Houston.  Not to mention that my base salary is $50-$100 USD/year lower than what other shops are offering.  However, after three attempts, I have been unsuccessful in championing my own cause.

Zuff

Just a quick note after my first look at the numbers.  The only concern I have is with the base number.  Seeing as there is no money up front, the future payments look a lot more like long term comp. than any real signing or retention bonus.  When I came to Enron two years ago I took a $35,000 decrease in base pay in exchange for options and the opportunity to trade for number 1.  That is no longer the case (no options and UBS is not #1) therefore I would look for my base to better reflect market on a go forward basis.  If you are able to accommodate a reasonable adjustment in base I would be very excited about the opportunity to sign with UBS.

I would like to talk about this on Monday, after I have had a chance to look at the paper in full.

Chris.

I am reading your mail, I have asked for the same thing regarding my base. Especially since I came up here with a base salary converted at 1.48 CDN/USD and with no raise since being here at 1.61 CDN/USD I have received a 9% pay cut relative to my peers in Houston.  Not to mention that my base salary is $50-$100 USD/year lower than what other shops are offering.  However, after three attempts, I have been unsuccessful in championing my own cause.

Zuff

Just a quick note after my first look at the numbers.  The only concern I have is with the base number.  Seeing as there is no money up front, the future payments look a lot more like long term comp. than any real signing or retention bonus.  When I came to Enron two years ago I took a $35,000 decrease in base pay in exchange for options and the opportunity to trade for number 1.  That is no longer the case (no options and UBS is not #1) therefore I would look for my base to better reflect market on a go forward basis.  If you are able to accommodate a reasonable adjustment in base I would be very excited about the opportunity to sign with UBS.

I would like to talk about this on Monday, after I have had a chance to look at the paper in full.

Chris.

Can you send my curves and trades for Jan 18 

Can Dorland and Chad meet me and Mili in Video 1 at 9:30 and when these guys come back can Cowan and Lambie come to Video 1

After some brief discussions with UBS in Houston, we must wait before we can make final determination of our functional currency.  We may be evaluated in Canadian dollars rather than American.  I must get some direction from UBS

403-974-6706
Zuf:

Howdy!  I hope all is well.

What is your fax# @ work?

Brother Smith

do you have the internet addresses and directory details put togethor yet

Rob,

Markets
My marks show how we believe the market would trade if the market were open today, considering neighboring markets, transmission/wheeling costs, and fuel costs.  More of a expected liquidation value vs. the current Ontario market players bids and offers.

The market on 3yr 7x24 is being shown by a broker: $46-$48, and on the wholesale side I doubt the bid is actually there, or if so it is only a piece deep (50MW).  

As a result, I would show an actually two way of $43-$47.50 and be coming from the sell side to the industrial customers who may pay in the $46-$47 range.

Peak, my 3yr mark is $52, but given the often bullish nature of new markets, I would be a bid for this summer and then look to offer the 3yr in the low fifties.  Upcoming changes in the Ontario system (Nodal vs. Zonal pricing) would have an effect on these term deals.

Staffing and Services

Trading
On the trading side, I will need to rehire personnel for the roles we laid off (an analyst and a temp IT programmer for fundies development).  Analyst wise, I am interested in bringing Brian Loy back if he is still available.  He has a good knowledge of the NUG contracts and is a good fit for a trading desk.  As our need for providing IMO Energy and Operating Reserve Services (bidding for specific NUGS and Dispatchable Loads) grows, it may be a good idea to bring Heather Mcillmurray over from the settlements group.  I have had initial discussions with Richard Crouch, Paul Devries and Heather on this matter.

Origination
This is your area of expertise. I would suggest two originators and an analyst.  If Dan Dorland is staying, he could continue on the origination side providing education to our new origination team, and being the analyst to assist the OEFC-NUG point personnel (Brian Loy's previous role).  

IT
Implementing the trading and VMS systems is a very important issue where timing will become an issue. I would suggest a short term (6mo) contract with Mike Marryott to manage the system's side of this process and to integrate with the Estate and NETCO on trading and settlements systems (specifically David Posten's VMS team).  His location should be in Toronto.  

Let's get on these issues as soon as possible.

On specific personnel, I would have liked to have retained Jeff Borg and Chris Gaffney. 

Office Space
Tembec, our neighbor on this floor, has often indicated that they are interested in some of our office space. If that interest remains, we could examine leasing all of the space passed the flat screens (the origination desk/pod, one conference room and storage area, not to include our server room).  This would leave us with space for up to 24 people, two conference rooms, & kitchen.  As an alternative, we could consider moving upstairs into the Enron Direct location.

Potential Conflict of Interest
I would suggest releasing employees that will not be part of Estate or UBS relatively soon.  Specifically, the group that is leaving here, but will be participating in the Ontario market.  UBS Ontario information and resources are proprietary and confidential.  If personnel are being kept on to wind-down specific activities, their access to UBS power & gas curves should be restricted.

As time becomes available, we should get together and discuss Ontario's business plan. 

Thank you
Garrett

Garrett, I take that these are your mids. Where would your 3yr two-way be?

	
CAD	Peak		7x24
1yr	$50.00		$42.75
3yr	$52.00		$44.00
5yr	$52.50		$44.00

I can't afford to bump anyone, unfortunately all the people on this list are top notch.  We are trying to separate the cream from the cream.  Given that, and working on the assumption that Dan D is a rock star (i.e. not knowing him from Adam otherwise) I think we should relace Lalani with him.

Guys, I believe Dan would like to go to UBS. I'm not sure that I will be successful at moving our headcount up to accomodate him. Any thoughts on who we would bump? The current list is as follows (headcount = 20):

Marketing:			Trading:
Milnthorp			Zufferli
Davies				Cowan
Le Dain				Clark
Biever				Dorland, C.
Drozdiak			Draper
Sangwine			Lambie
Burnham (TO)			Richey
McPhee 			Watt
Oh (TO)				Tripp (TO)
Lalani				Brodeur (TO)*

* possibly unneccessary if D. Dorland is in. however, could support marketing

Cooper is doing fine he is still breathing according to him

Things are going well here. We have been working on cleaning up Dec. I cautiously optimistic about UBS. I think the fact that they put no money up front could make things difficult with the creditors. I am not sure if they will accept the fact that will only get money from profits that we make. There are no guarantees that we will be profitable.

Yeah, the last few weeks are hard. I am sure she is at the point she just wants it over with. Are you ready for your life to get flipped around. It's a lot of fun but difficult for the first 2 months. After that it get's easier as you go.

So I assume you are riding it out with UBS? Not sure how I feel about the situation. Could be just the fear of the unknown.

How is Cooper doing?

John

things are going well,hectic but more steady now that we are bought by UBS, at least steady in mind

jess is doing well, just 6 weeks left, she is getting to the uncomfortable phase now

how are you doing in portland?

John, thought I would drop a line and see how things are going. Not much to report here, just waiting to see what the fall out from the sale will be. How is Jessica and baby to be doing?

John

Check out www.segalmotorcar.com

things are going well,hectic but more steady now that we are bought by UBS, at least steady in mind

jess is doing well, just 6 weeks left, she is getting to the uncomfortable phase now

how are you doing in portland?

John, thought I would drop a line and see how things are going. Not much to report here, just waiting to see what the fall out from the sale will be. How is Jessica and baby to be doing?

John

Yes, he worked for me, he ran the AECO option book, we let him go since we were not sure of our future at the time, he is setting up the BP Amoco options desk

He is a very smart guy and understand options very well, he is late thirties and has been trading for some time

John, 

Do you know a John Distroll from the Calgary office, gas options I believe......

-GJW

congrats to Ali

I had to fly to houston on monday on last minute notice, we have been bought by UBS Warburg, I hope that the deal works out and looks good for me, don't know yet but I am excited, how is the condo going?

Ali got into STANFORD!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  He just found out today!  I
can't believe it!  He was so upset after being dinged by Wharton and then
look what happens!  It's so bizarre how the different schools select /
screen.  Anyhoo...California
rocks!

Talk to you soon,
Lee

http://server3003.freeyellow.com/automatch/94Por3.6T.html

can er make this earlier, not sure I'll be in fri aft

Issues to discuss:
1)  Having NETCO's functional currency as US$
2)  Treasury role in NETCO

Kathy

Is is possible to import a lotus elise and get it converted to left-hand drive and road compliant?

I was wondering if you knew how to do it and how much it would cost

Thank you.

Respond by January 10, 2002 and no later than 4:00 p.m.

We expect to be in position to sign the purchase documents upon completion =
of the auction scheduled for Thursday, January 10, 2002.  Unfortunately, th=
at means we need your responses to the questionnaire as soon as possible, a=
nd in no event later than 4:00 p.m. of January 10, 2002.

=20
Regards,

Mark E. Haedicke

Here is a list of products and counterparties
 

JOHN, NO LIST ATTACHED.  PLEASE RESEND. THANKS, NELLA

Nella here is a list of products that we would launch on EOL in NETCO.  Assume the the products listed under the Financial heading are launched on day 1 and the the products listed under the Physical heading are launched at a later date.

Nella here is a list of products that we would launch on EOL in NETCO.  Assume the the products listed under the Financial heading are launched on day 1 and the the products listed under the Physical heading are launched at a later date.

Enron Canada Power Corp acknowledges the change in the sink asset from CH1A to CH1U for contract #1947 for the period of Jan 01, 2002 HE1 to Dec 31, 2002 HE24

Thank you
John Zufferli

i waited for 15 min, i guess the conference call was cancelled?

     Hi.

     The Market Risk Meeting has been scheduled for today at 5:15
     p.m. Houston Time.

     The dial in information is as follows:

     Dial In Number:  203-719-0070

     Freephone within the U.S.:  877-315-5218

     Pin Number:  808787

     Mercy, please reserve a conference room for those participants in
     Houston.

     Thanks.

     jm

Visit our website at http://www.ubswarburg.com

This message contains confidential information and is intended only
for the individual named.  If you are not the named addressee you
should not disseminate, distribute or copy this e-mail.  Please
notify the sender immediately by e-mail if you have received this
e-mail by mistake and delete this e-mail from your system.

E-mail transmission cannot be guaranteed to be secure or error-free
as information could be intercepted, corrupted, lost, destroyed,
arrive late or incomplete, or contain viruses.  The sender therefore
does not accept liability for any errors or omissions in the contents
of this message which arise as a result of e-mail transmission.  If
verification is required please request a hard-copy version.  This
message is provided for informational purposes and should not be
construed as a solicitation or offer to buy or sell any securities or
related financial instruments.

what is your number at work?

okay, thanks for responding so quickly

                    John.Zufferli@
Dad asked if I wanted to lend you some money but I am reluctant to do it at
this point in time since:

a) I am not completely at liberty to touch all the cash that I have
received lately for concern that it may be taken bank under potential
creditor action against Enron.  Unfortunatelty, without this cash, I really
can't afford to lend any.  The cash that I received recently represents 80%
of the cash that I have and I am not sure when I can count on this cash
with any degree of certainty.  Therefore, I am reluctant to touch this
money for at least 6 months.

b) As of right now, I don't have a job after Feb. 28.  The new company deal
that Enron is trying to structure with its traders and a new buyer will not
be
done until the month.  If this deal falls through, then I have to find a
job with another company.  In this case, it is most likely that I will have
to move back to the
US since my contacts and the most lucrative opportunities (i.e. compared
the the new Enron deal) are there.

c) If I had the cash to give, Dad asked that I could give you a discount to
the bank mortgage.  With discount rates near 5%, even if I gave you a
mortgage at
4%, I don't think the monthly interest saving for you would be material
enough.

d) I think it is good for you to develop a credit rating with a bank
through a mortgage.  It is very beneficial for later on in life.  Paying
visa bills does help you a bit in this
category, but not like a mortgage.

Hopefully, you can get the financing from a bank.  I think that this is the
best solution in the long run.

    -----Original Message-----
   Hi John,

   Wanted to talk to you about the house stuff.  Dad told me that he was
   talking to you about financing options.  I just wanted to say that I
   don't
   want you to feel compelled to write a mortgage for me -- dad's just
   trying
   to explore different options.  I know it's a lot of cash, and I would
   never
   want to impose on you.  I'm sure that I can get a mortgage from the bank
   at
   a decent rate, as long as I can put down the 25% down payment so that I
   can
   avoid the mortgage insurance, which is costly.  I'm cashing in some GICs
   and other bonds, and Ali's going to lend me $10K, so I will be able to
   come
   up with the $55K for the down payment.

   If writing the mortgage is something that you would like to do for a
   stable
   investment, then we can talk too.  My time horizon on the condo is 5-7
   years, so i recognize that that would hold up your capital for a long
   while.  Anyway, I have to go ahead and get the guarantee of financing
   within 5 days or so, so I have to make a decision in the next day either
   way.  Maybe you can call, or email me?

   Livia

If the legacy deals move to NETCO then we need the ability to trade Canadian gas.  Canada would not be out of business if we only traded US denominated financial products but it reduce our daily transactions by 75%.

John, 
Dealing with Canadian issues and NETCO.  Original thought was that legacy deals go away and we can do in Canada as we do in US.  Unfortunately feedback is that currency issue will still exist.  In your minds eye, will it put Canada out of biz if we require that during first 45 days only "US like" transactions occur?  

Your feedback would be great.
Thanks,
Frank

Dad asked if I wanted to lend you some money but I am reluctant to do it at this point in time since:

a) I am not completely at liberty to touch all the cash that I have received lately for concern that it may be taken bank under potential
creditor action against Enron.  Unfortunatelty, without this cash, I really can't afford to lend any.  The cash that I received recently represents 80% of the cash that I have and I am not sure when I can count on this cash with any degree of certainty.  Therefore, I am reluctant to touch this money for at least 6 months.

b) As of right now, I don't have a job after Feb. 28.  The new company deal that Enron is trying to structure with its traders and a new buyer will not be 
done until the month.  If this deal falls through, then I have to find a job with another company.  In this case, it is most likely that I will have to move back to the 
US since my contacts and the most lucrative opportunities (i.e. compared the the new Enron deal) are there.

c) If I had the cash to give, Dad asked that I could give you a discount to the bank mortgage.  With discount rates near 5%, even if I gave you a mortgage at
4%, I don't think the monthly interest saving for you would be material enough.

d) I think it is good for you to develop a credit rating with a bank through a mortgage.  It is very beneficial for later on in life.  Paying visa bills does help you a bit in this
category, but not like a mortgage.

Hopefully, you can get the financing from a bank.  I think that this is the best solution in the long run.  

Hi John,

Wanted to talk to you about the house stuff.  Dad told me that he was
talking to you about financing options.  I just wanted to say that I don't
want you to feel compelled to write a mortgage for me -- dad's just trying
to explore different options.  I know it's a lot of cash, and I would never
want to impose on you.  I'm sure that I can get a mortgage from the bank at
a decent rate, as long as I can put down the 25% down payment so that I can
avoid the mortgage insurance, which is costly.  I'm cashing in some GICs
and other bonds, and Ali's going to lend me $10K, so I will be able to come
up with the $55K for the down payment.

If writing the mortgage is something that you would like to do for a stable
investment, then we can talk too.  My time horizon on the condo is 5-7
years, so i recognize that that would hold up your capital for a long
while.  Anyway, I have to go ahead and get the guarantee of financing
within 5 days or so, so I have to make a decision in the next day either
way.  Maybe you can call, or email me?

Livia

I am interested in a program for myself.  I am 33 years old, have been inactive for 6 months.  I am 6' 1'' and 225 lbs.  I can easily ride 50 km at about 27 km/h on flat terrain.  I would like to lose 15 lbs, improve my speed an definitely improve my hill climbing ability.  I live at 3800 ft altitude and hill climbing is very difficult.  I hit lactate threshold fairly quick.

Thanks

yes

This is the first that I have heard of this.  Something for Mike to look at ?

Mark

 - WC deficiency notice.doc << File: WC deficiency notice.doc >> 
 - EAL Deferral Summary November 2001.doc << File: EAL Deferral Summary November 2001.doc >> 

Its OK

John Zufferli

Contract Name: Leth_iron_aug-dec01
Contract Number: 933
Contract Create On: Fri Dec 21 13:43:41 MST 2001

Eligible Direct Seller: Enron Canada Power Corp
Direct Sales Source: SD3 Sundance #3

Pool Purchaser: Lethbridge Iron Works Co. Ltd
Direct Sales Sink: LI1L LIW SR#1

Contract Begin: Aug 1, 2001 00:00
Contract End: Jan 1, 2002 00:00
MW
HE	Mon	Tues	Wed	Thur	Fri	Sat	Sun
1	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	0.0	0.0
2	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	0.0	0.0
3	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	0.0	0.0
4	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	0.0	0.0
5	2.0	2.0	2.0	2.0	2.0	0.0	0.0
6	2.0	2.0	2.0	2.0	2.0	0.0	0.0
7	3.0	3.0	3.0	3.0	3.0	0.0	0.0
8	3.0	3.0	3.0	3.0	3.0	0.0	0.0
9	3.0	3.0	3.0	3.0	3.0	0.0	0.0
10	3.0	3.0	3.0	3.0	3.0	0.0	0.0
11	3.0	3.0	3.0	3.0	3.0	0.0	0.0
12	2.0	2.0	2.0	2.0	2.0	0.0	0.0
13	2.0	2.0	2.0	2.0	2.0	0.0	0.0
14	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	0.0	0.0
15	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0
16	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0
17	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0
18	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0
19	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0
20	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0
21	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0	0.0
22	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	0.0	0.0
23	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	0.0	0.0
24	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	1.0	0.0	0.0

Please confirm that this change is correct.

Karen Mazuryk
Power Pool of Alberta
Participant Liaison
Tel: (403) 705-8509
Fax: (403) 543-0388
karen.mazuryk@powerpool.ab.ca

you can increase the direct sale to include Dec 31, 2001

Thank you

John Zufferli

I can use your email as a request to edit the contract, if I get an email
from Enron confirming the request to edit.  Or you could enter another
contract for the 1 day.  Let me know what you would like to do.
Hi Karen - Lethbridge Ironwork's physical deal is registered incorrectly -
contract 933.  It does not include Dec 31.  How can we fix this?

Thanks,

Katrina Ferguson
Director, Retail Services
Valeo Power Corporation

403-770-1176
401-770-1171 (fax)

you can increase the direct sale to include Dec 31, 2001

Thank you 

John Zufferli

You should talk to Jess about that, she is due March 2 but I am not sure when her mom is coming and going.  I would think that the 2 week in march is good though.  Look forward to seeing you tomorrow.

when is jessica due?  i want to book tickets out to see you guys in feb /
march, but i want to make sure that you have time to get settled before i
come.  i have to order tickets by dec 24th, as ali has a special 2 for 1
coupon so he can come with me too.

what timing is best?

  

John, I understand you have been approached separately to provide this information.  If so, could I please have a copy of your worksheets.

Thanks, Nella

Rob:
Please populate the attached worksheets for Stack Manager & Website Access. I have added the Canada product types and a drop down for each user/product type to populate with READ, EXECUTE or NONE.  For READ ONLY Website ID's, additional population is NOT necessary.  Please return to me once complete.  Let me know if you have any questions.
 << File: Can Gas Stack & Website for New Version 121901.xls >> 

Thank you,

Stephanie Sever
EnronOnline
713-853-3465

Here is the update list that you requested. Mike Cowan, Chris Lambie, Chad Clark, Chris Dorland, Lon Draper Cooper Richey, John Zufferli also needs access to the Nymex EOL website.  Mike Cowan, Chris Lambie, Chad Clark, Chris Dorland need access to US west and east basis markets as well.

  

i am waiting on the conference call and no one is on it yet?

     Hi.

     The Market Risk Meeting has been scheduled for today at 5:15
     p.m. Houston Time.

     The dial in information is as follows:

     Dial In Number:  203-719-0070

     Freephone within the U.S.:  877-315-5218

     Pin Number:  808787

     Mercy, please reserve a conference room for those participants in
     Houston.

     Thanks.

     jm

Visit our website at http://www.ubswarburg.com

This message contains confidential information and is intended only
for the individual named.  If you are not the named addressee you
should not disseminate, distribute or copy this e-mail.  Please
notify the sender immediately by e-mail if you have received this
e-mail by mistake and delete this e-mail from your system.

E-mail transmission cannot be guaranteed to be secure or error-free
as information could be intercepted, corrupted, lost, destroyed,
arrive late or incomplete, or contain viruses.  The sender therefore
does not accept liability for any errors or omissions in the contents
of this message which arise as a result of e-mail transmission.  If
verification is required please request a hard-copy version.  This
message is provided for informational purposes and should not be
construed as a solicitation or offer to buy or sell any securities or
related financial instruments.

hey there.  dad told me that you got your bonus -- congratulations!  that's
a piece of good news at least.

i got some bad news about bonuses today -- we usually get them paid out
this week, but we just got an email from our CEO saying that only a few
"exceptional performers" will get some sort of bonus but they won't
disclose the information until the end of January.  given that i have to
have a new place to live for february, i don't think that I'll be able buy
a condo anymore (the bonus money would have been for the down payment).
anyway, kind of annoying but i guess i should be grateful that i have a
job.

mom's size is large -- she's 5'4" and about 145 pounds.  could you pass
this on to jess?

by the way, our flight comes in at around 10pm on saturday, but i'll call
to confirm

livia

Everything from Ops, Trading, Marketing, and Development in Calgary, plus Mike's inputs from Toronto, has been consolidated into one master index.  The file is located at 

	I:\NewCo\00_README.xls

If you have additional items to add to your directories, or I have not yet received inputs from you, please update the master index.  There is one tab for each department.

Thanks,
Richard C. McKeel
Enron Canada Corp.
Phone: 403-974-6742
Fax: 403-974-6706

nothing new here, when is your flight? have you found any condos yet?

hey -- how are things going this week?  any new developments (that are
public -- i haven't read the papers all week as i've been here until 1am
every night)

ali just found out that he got dinged for the 'early rolling round' at
columbia, but they reinvited him to apply for normal rounds in January.
he's really disappointed, because he was most bullish on his chances at
columbia.  i don't get it though -- his gmat and marks are awesome, he has
good work experience (4 years), he has a masters degree, and apparently, he
said the interview went really well.  kinda shitty.  he has an interview
with stanford next week is at least positive.

write me and give me an update (you're bad for keeping in touch!)

lee

In addition to a list of software and systems that is being compiled for th=
e Calgary office, all required spreadsheets for the Calgary trading operati=
ons (i.e. the sheets that the traders use) has been compiled in "secure on =
'ectcal\calgary'(I:)\Trading\NewCo"
As we move forward in the planning stages for NETCO we need to identify all=
 systems which need to be moved or copied into the entity.  We have identif=
ied the great majority of the systems to be moved but we may not be able to=
 identify particular tools used by your group or you individually.  This wo=
uld include spreadsheets etc.

Please send lists of systems and software required to Anne Koehler by close=
 of business today.

To be clear we can (subject to the negotiation) move/copy systems and some =
data however, we CANNOT move either transaction data if counterparty specif=
ic or data obtained from a counterparty under a confidentiality agreement.

For Houston traders, Geof Storey is compiling your lists.

Thanks

Louise

Please set up access for the digital certificate under Enron for TAU and I understand that they will have access to report viewing and submissions.

Thank you.

John Zufferli

		>                 You, or a representative from your
organization, are invited > to attend a meeting on December 11, 2001 from
2pm to 4pm in our offices. It > has been some time since the group has met
and in the mean time we, as well as the System Controller, have put > some
processes in place to address the ongoing supply adequacy concerns > within
Alberta. We would like to review how the > current processes are working and
examine areas for improvement.  We have received, from the majority, the
2002 maintenance plans. I would propose the following draft agenda and would
request additional agenda items from yourself prior to the meeting. A final
agenda would be issued before the meeting.

		1.Review of adequacy forecasts and presentation of
information.
		2.Adequacy projections for the 2001 winter peak and 2002.
		3.System restoration plans and roles.
		4.PSS/AVR reporting and the WSCC RMS program
		5.Loss factors - 2003 base cases - use of maintenance data.

		Please confirm your attendance by December 4, 2001 by return
e-mail. Also, please advise any additional agenda items.

		Fred Ritter, P. Eng.
		Technical Services
		ESBI Alberta Ltd.
		Phone: (403) 705-5224
		Cell: (403) 813-9471
		Web site: www.eal.ab.ca <http://www.eal.ab.ca>

				 

going great.  Even the weather has been record warm for us!  What do you
think will happen?  It looks like a bank will step up and buy you
guys...(trading arm).   What is Jessica up to?

John

>  -----Original Message-----
 - winmail.dat 

John, please check with Louise as how to get the attached to her.

 

Here is the info for the commercial staff

John Z
John, please check with Louise as how to get the attached to her.

 

Enron is willing to perform the operation under question (1) but not (2) and (3) as we have no control over these processes and only have control over process (1).
The System Controller can contact Enron Canada Power Corp at the number in your files.
in case you didn't get this

As I have discussed with many of you, we are revising the Power Pool Supply
Shortfall Procedures (POP 801) in accordance with Transmission Operating
Policy OP-107.  POP 801 contains several steps from the time all the energy
in the energy market merit order has been dispatched up, to the time when a
firm load directive will be issued by the System Controller to curtail firm
load. In order to gather the information required to develop the procedure,
would you please answer the following questions.  Any action you choose to
take is on a voluntary and best effort basis, without any obligation on your
behalf.

In an effort to reduce the amount of, or possibility of having to issue, a
firm load directive to curtail load, would you please reply whether you will
comply with any of the following requests from the System Controller prior
to the issuing of a firm load directive to curtail load.  Please reply not
applicable (N/A) to the questions that do not apply to you.  If you will
comply to any of these requests, we will include the request(s) in the steps
identified in POP 801.  Also, if you will comply to any of these requests,
please indicate the appropriate party for the System Controller to contact.
If you choose not to comply with any of these requests please reply that you
will not.  This will let us know not to make a request for something that
will not be provided, which otherwise could cause confusion and waste
valuable time during the management of this type of an event.

1. Would you provide available generation energy that was not offered into
the energy market merit order if requested to do so by the System Controller
prior to a firm load directive to curtail load?

Name of Plant:				Response (Y/N):
If yes, please indicate who the System Controller is to contact:

Name of Plant:				Response (Y/N):
If yes, please indicate who the System Controller is to contact:

Name of Plant:				Response (Y/N):
If yes, please indicate who the System Controller is to contact:

2. Would you reduce non-essential station service loads at your plant(s) if
requested to do so by the System Controller prior to a firm load directive
to curtail load?

Name of Plant:				Response (Y/N):
If yes, please indicate who the System Controller is to contact:

Name of Plant:				Response (Y/N):
If yes, please indicate who the System Controller is to contact:

Name of Plant:				Response (Y/N):
If yes, please indicate who the System Controller is to contact:

3. Would you reduce non-essential drag line loads (if applicable) if
requested to do so by the System Controller prior to a firm load directive
to curtail load?

Location:				Response (Y/N):
If yes, please indicate who the System Controller is to contact:

Location:				Response (Y/N):
If yes, please indicate who the System Controller is to contact:

4. Would you provide a 3% (or another value) reduction in distribution
voltage if requested to do so by the System Controller prior to a firm load
directive to curtail load?

Name of Wire Service Provider:

If yes, please indicate who the System Controller is to contact:

Please email or fax your response to me by December 12.  If you have any
questions please contact me. Your reply (either way) is appreciated.

Thank you,
Ken Gardner
Pool Code Analyst
Power Pool of Alberta
Phone: (403) 233-6416
Fax: (403) 543-0388

I will have 4 books:

CAND-MGMT-BAS for all AECO and DAWN BASIS
CAND-MGMT-GD for fixed price AECO and DAWN 
CAND-MGMT-PR for NYMEX
CAND-MGMT-PWR fot Alberta, MID-C, Ontario, NY, NEPOOL, PJM, Cinergy power

Tim and John, I wanted to touch base with you regarding a problem that we have run into between EOL and a trader having multiple trading books. EOL has been set up to have a trader associated with one and only one trading book in the stack manager. As a result, when creating the interface between EOL and Enpower we can cannot assign multiple trading books to one person. David Poston in the Enpower IT support group in Houston has been working with the EOL group and has come up with a solution.

1. If you definitely plan to be trading on EOL for all trading books associated with your name, EOL IT can define certain products to each trading book. If this is the approach that you would like to take, I will need a list of what products you want to trade and to which trading book they are affiliated with. 

2. The other option is that you will just use one trading book under your name. If that is the case, no changes will have to be made.

If the plan is to use the first option, please let me know so we can make the changes and do the necessary testing on this.

John

 

Nicole and everyone, I think the directory is i:\canadian\energy service\integrated solutions\counterparty talks.xls

Good morning everyone,
As you know we will be calling our counterparties today to discuss the Court Case slated for Wednesday. I have created a spreadsheet that lists which counterparties you have been assigned to contact. It can be found at I:/Canadian Energy Services/Counterparty Talks.xls. Please keep it updated throughout the day. It is a shared file; therefore, more than one user can access it at the same time. Just hit "F9" to update changes other users have made to the sheet throughout the day.
John - Can you please let your group know about the sheet and assign your traders to the counterparties listed under "Traders"?
Thank you,
Nicole
 

not yet, rob has been in the court house all day

No eagle, huh?
 
love, jess

Good to hear your voice again, old buddy.  I'm happy to hear that you and
Jessica (??) have a baby on the way.  Hopefully Lisa and I will follow suit
shortly...

My home contact info is:

1932 N Hudson, Unit 1
Chicago, IL 60614
312-335-1031

Larry Lerner
Vice President
Investment Strategy & Development
Citadel Investment Group, L.L.C.
225 West Washington Street
Chicago, IL 60606
312.384.7088

very busy, jess is ok just scared

Hi,

Are things a little less crazy today?  Did you and Jess work things out
last night?  Why was she so upset (besides the obvious reason on the work
front).

I just went to the cardiologist for my follow up heart tests.  They said
everything looks okay, and i just need to go back once a year for stress
tests.

I'm going to look at condos on Monday.  Starting in the Yonge and
Davisville area, then going to look at St. Lawrence Market (lofts mostly),
King & Bathurst and Bay / Bloor.  Still not sure if I should buy....

Livia

This is a trade with OIL-SPEC-HEDGE-NG (John Lavorato's book) and John Zufferli's book CAND-PWR-PR

CAND-PWR-PR buys from OIL-SPEC-HEDGE-NG Nymex Gas

Cal 03			38,500 MMBtu/day		$3.2978
Cal 04-Cal 05		35,000 MMBtu/day		$3.4482
Cal 06-Cal 10		40,000 MMBtu/day		$3.7369
Cal 11-Cal 15		18,500 MMBtu/Day		$4.2057

Please Confirm Receipt

John Z

Some of my position is with the Alberta Term book, I will send you only the positions that I have directly with ENA. 

2

Morning John,
I'm still working on the mini-PRC for Lavo.  Sean Lalani has not yet been ranked and rumour has it that he reports to you now.  Can you confirm and send me a number.  Thanks!

Analyst					Rank

Stephane Brodeur			1
Chad Clark				1
Ian Cooke				3
Lon Draper				1
Fabian Taylor				2
Carlos Torres				3
Ryan Watt				1

Associate

Cooper Richey				1

i think the YMCA has a class that is for people recovering from heart-attacks
i remeber something about that

i don't know about the heart classes.  i'll look into it, but her dr (ravi)
isn't offering up any suggestions or anything.  she saw him before the
surgery in august, and he said things were okay.  i really don't think he's
too helpful.

she is lazy -- but it really frustrates me that she doesn't want to help
herself.  i told her that not walking is like not taking her heart
medication.  that didn't seem to resonate.  dad is going to go to the YMCA
tomorrow and maybe get a membership for both of them -- they have a walking
track there (at least it's something to do in the winter).  when she was
down this weekend, we walked around the craft show (at the Exhibition
place) and she said that was a lot of exercise (2 hrs).  The only problem
is that we were just strolling, and not really walking very fast.

                    John.Zufferli@
just send the essay at home

I don't know what to do about mom, i don't think fear is the only thing
holding her back , i think she is lazy

is there a heart health class in Sudbury that has excercise regimines as
well as diets?

when is the last time she saw her doctor

    -----Original Message-----
   Hi John

   How was Thanksgiving?  Was the baby shower fun?

   I was wondering if you'd have some time to read over Ali's Chicago
   essays
   later tonight?  He's going to submit them on Wednesday.  Let me know if
   that's okay.  Do you have a printer at home?  Can I send them to your
   home
   account?  (I don't think Ali will be done before about 8pm or so
   tonight).

   PS:  We need to talk about mom.  I saw her this weekend -- she's gained
   a
   lot of weight, and hasn't been exercising at all.  Dad's pretty
   frustrated
   because all she does is watch tv.  I had a talk with her yesterday
   telling
   her that she has more risk of having a heart attack if she doesn't walk
   /
   exercise than if she exerts herself when exercising (i think she's
   afraid
   of having a heart attack while exercising).  We need to do something --
   she's 170lbs now, and should be at around 140lbs to be healthy.

   Livia

